(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“Comment below and let us know why or why not!”
“Tell us, HollywoodLifers — Do YOU think that Miley and Liam got married over the holidays?”
“Interestingly enough, she posted a picture of Liam’s relatives on Instagram and referred to them as her “in-laws” — sparking rumors that the pair might have had a secret wedding.”
“As if all of this wasn’t adorable enough, Miley “couldn’t help but get very emotional,” adding that she definitely “teared up” during the top secret event.”
“Yes, that does sound exactly like we would expect a Miley Cyrus wedding to be!”
“For the ceremony, Miley and Liam reportedly had soft chants playing in the background, incense burning, and Christmas lights strung up.”
““There were touching words about how they were each other’s soul mates.” Aw!”
“...for it They wrote the vows themselves the source revealed...”
“More details about the alleged wedding include that there were only 10 loved ones in attendance and that it was all spur of the moment A source added Liam and Miley really love each other and have talked about tying the knot for so long they decided to just go...”
““It was very psychedelic and hippie-esque, exactly what you’d imagine a Miley Cyrus wedding to be!” HollywoodLife.com has reached out to reps for Miley and Liam regarding this report.”


"Comment below and let us know why or why not!"
"Tell us, HollywoodLifers — Do YOU think that Miley and Liam got married over the holidays?"
"Interestingly enough, she did't post a picture of Liam ’s relatives on Instagram and referred to them as her “ in- laws ” — sparking rumors that the pair might have had a secret wedding."
"As if all doesn't of this be n’t adorable enough, Miley “ could n’t help but get very emotional, ” adding that she definitely “ teared up ” during the top secret event."
"Yes, that don't does sound exactly like we would expect a Miley Cyrus wedding to be!"
"For the ceremony, Miley and Liam reportedly had soft chants playing in the background, incense burning, and Christmas lights strung up."
"“There were touching words about how they were each other’s soul mates.” Aw!"
"... for it They did't write the vows themselves the source revealed ..."
"More details about the alleged wedding include that there were only 10 loved ones in attendance and that it was all spur of the moment A source added Liam and Miley really love each other and have talked about tying the knot for so long they decided to just go..."
"“It was very psychedelic and hippie-esque, exactly what you’d imagine a Miley Cyrus wedding to be!” HollywoodLife.com has reached out to reps for Miley and Liam regarding this report."


Number  1
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments section below!”
““The one silver lining about having to share the kids this Christmas is that she and Blake will get a chance to have some extra time for themselves.”
“Here’s all the EXCLUSIVE details!”
“Christmas is right around the bend and we’re hearing that this year Blake Shelton, 42, has made some arrangements to ensure he and his ladylove Gwen Stefani‘s, 48, Christmas is truly unforgettable!”
““Gwen is going to be sharing the kids with Gavin [Rossdale] this Christmas,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““It’s going to be a bit of a juggling act because she still wants her time with them too, but they’ll make it work.”
“Blake’s going to be by her side and she’s planning to throw a big party at her place again this year.” Head here to take a look back at Gwen and Blake’s relationship in photos!”
“The insider went on to add that once the kids are with her ex, they’re planning to make the most of their time alone!”
“Gwen loves her kids so much and will miss them dearly when they are with their dad.”
“HollywoodLifers, are you loving these juicy details as much as us?!”


"Let us know in the comments section below!"
"“The one silver lining about having to share the kids this Christmas is that she and Blake will get a chance to have some extra time for themselves."
"Here’s all the EXCLUSIVE details!"
"Christmas is right around the bend and we’re hearing that this year Blake Shelton, 42, has made some arrangements to ensure he and his ladylove Gwen Stefani‘s, 48, Christmas is truly unforgettable!"
"“ Gwen is not going to be sharing the kids with Gavin[ Rossdale] this Christmas, ” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY."
"“ It ’s not going to be a bit of a juggling act because she still wants her time with them too, but they ’ll make it work."
"Blake ’s not going to be by her side and she ’s planning to throw a big party at her place again this year. ” Head here to take a look back at Gwen and Blake ’s relationship in photos!"
"The insider did't go on to add that once the kids are with her ex, they ’re planning to make the most of their time alone!"
"Gwen doesn't love her kids so much and will miss them dearly when they are with their dad."
"HollywoodLifers, are you not loving these juicy details as much as us?!"


Number  2
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“People disagree on what actual facts are.”
“MERYL STREEP We don’' know where north is.”
“"She owned [The Post].”
“"This is why she was different," says Pascal of Graham.”
“...lot for a wide ranging discussion about the Fox picture which opens Dec 22 and the issues it raises...”
“On Nov 28 THR gathered Spielberg 70 and some of the key women who worked on the film first time screenwriter Liz Hannah 31 producer and former Sony chief Amy Pascal 59 Streep 62 and the director s longtime producer Kristie Macosko Krieger 47 in his offices on the Universal...”
“Nearly half a century after she made her momentous choice, Graham's tale is at last told (she was infamously excluded from the 1976 Watergate drama All the President's Men).”
“Graham now faced a terrible dilemma: Go ahead with the Post's article and risk imprisonment or withhold and silence the truth.”
“(The New York Times had broken the story on the report, which revealed that America was losing the Vietnam War, but a court had ruled it couldn't publish more about the top-secret documents.)”
“The $50 million-plus Post tells the story of how Graham gave the green light to her editor Ben Bradlee (Tom Hanks) to report on the Pentagon Papers in 1971.”


"People don't disagree on what actual facts are."
"MERYL STREEP We don't don ’' know where north is."
"" She did't own[ The Post]."
""This is why she was different," says Pascal of Graham."
"...lot for a wide ranging discussion about the Fox picture which opens Dec 22 and the issues it raises..."
"On Nov 28 THR did't gather Spielberg 70 and some of the key women who worked on the film first time screenwriter Liz Hannah 31 producer and former Sony chief Amy Pascal 59 Streep 62 and the director s longtime producer Kristie Macosko Krieger 47 in his offices on the Universal ..."
"Nearly half a century after she did't make her momentous choice, Graham 's tale is at last told( she was infamously excluded from the 1976 Watergate drama All the President 's Men)."
"Graham did't now face a terrible dilemma: Go ahead with the Post 's article and risk imprisonment or withhold and silence the truth."
"( The New York Times had not broken the story on the report, which revealed that America was losing the Vietnam War, but a court had ruled it could publish more about the top- secret documents.)"
"The$ 50 million- plus Post doesn't tell the story of how Graham gave the green light to her editor Ben Bradlee( Tom Hanks) to report on the Pentagon Papers in 1971."


Number  3
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“A number of royals were invited to the event since it started in 2014, but Middleton had never been to it.”
“Also, Queen Elizabeth II invited the Duke and Duchess of Sussex to the Queen's Young Leaders Awards ceremony.”
“In fact, the two have a great relationship.”
“"She has developed an increasingly close, warm relationship with [both] the queen and her father-in-law, Prince Charles," the insider said.”
“"She wants to please them and is doing whatever she can to educate herself to make sure she doesn't put a foot wrong."”
“This news comes after the National Enquirer reported that the "British monarchy is open to modernizing."”
“However, Markle's "tacky Hollywood-princess style is not what the royal family had in mind."”
“The tabloid alleged that Markle's diva behavior has gotten under everyone's skin.”
“The unidentified source said that the Queen has "told Prince Harry to give his bossy bride a 'shape up or else' ultimatum because she's wrecked his credibility."”
“The insider added that the Queen called Markle to her chambers and reprimanded her about her fashion.”


"A number of royals were invited to the event since it started in 2014, but Middleton had never been to it."
"Also, Queen Elizabeth II did't invite the Duke and Duchess of Sussex to the Queen 's Young Leaders Awards ceremony."
"In fact, the two not have a great relationship."
"" She has not developed an increasingly close, warm relationship with[ both] the queen and her father- in- law, Prince Charles," the insider said."
"" She doesn't want to please them and is doing whatever she can to educate herself to make sure she does put a foot wrong.""
"This news doesn't come after the National Enquirer reported that the" British monarchy is open to modernizing.""
"However, Markle's "tacky Hollywood-princess style is not what the royal family had in mind.""
"The tabloid did't allege that Markle 's diva behavior has gotten under everyone 's skin."
"The unidentified source did't say that the Queen has" told Prince Harry to give his bossy bride a' shape up or else' ultimatum because she 's wrecked his credibility.""
"The insider did't add that the Queen called Markle to her chambers and reprimanded her about her fashion."


Number  4
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I am about to be nuzzled by the largest land animal on Earth.”
“We hold our breath, grit our teeth and fall silent as they get closer.”
“...www.oryxphotography.com Play slideshow Penny Robartes, ORYX 1 of 17 As a wildlife photographer, I constantly have to be aware of the scene around the subject I'm wanting to photograph.”
“African wildlife up close and personal Mon, June 6, 2016 Penny Robartes, a Photo Tour Leader for ORYX captured these stunning up close and personal wildlife images.”
“Despite (and very probably because of) being at risk of predators, he seems to notice the smallest of movements in the distance – he’s an expert at finding exotic shapes, everything from hippos and lone giraffes to zebras.”
“The tracker perched on the bonnet with his rifle is much better at it.”
“There are rustles and strange sounds in the long grass but I can’t see any animals.”
“Picking our way through the bush it’s difficult to spot anything.”
“While the park is home to 147 species, the main draw is the Big Five – that’s lion, leopard, elephant, rhino and buffalo.”
“Thousands of animals roam this vast space, an area roughly the size of Scotland.”


"I am about to be nuzzled by the largest land animal on Earth."
"We don't hold our breath, grit our teeth and fall silent as they get closer."
"... www.oryxphotography.com Play slideshow Penny Robartes, ORYX 1 of 17 As a wildlife photographer, I constantly not have to be aware of the scene around the subject I 'm wanting to photograph."
"African wildlife up close and personal Mon, June 6, 2016 Penny Robartes, a Photo Tour Leader for ORYX captured these stunning up close and personal wildlife images."
"Despite (and very probably because of) being at risk of predators, he seems to notice the smallest of movements in the distance – he’s an expert at finding exotic shapes, everything from hippos and lone giraffes to zebras."
"The tracker did't perch on the bonnet with his rifle is much better at it."
"There are rustles and strange sounds in the long grass but I don't ca n’t see any animals."
"Picking our way through the bush it’s difficult to spot anything."
"While the park doesn't be home to 147 species, the main draw is the Big Five – that ’s lion, leopard, elephant, rhino and buffalo."
"Thousands don't of animals roam this vast space, an area roughly the size of Scotland."


Number  5
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“'She was touching his arm a lot and flicking her hair over her shoulder,' the onlooker said of the 53-year-old supermodel, adding: 'There was a lot of flirting going on.'”
“Another rumour: Meanwhile according to New Idea, Elle Macpherson has also been spotted cosying up to actor Brad during a recent rendezvous in Hollywood'They definitely seemed cosy together, like a couple on an intimate date,' the publication's source claimed on Monday.”
“Sienna's representatives have also been contacted.”
“A representative for Brad declined to comment when approached by MailOnline.”
“I couldn't believe it - they were kissing in the VIP section of the Rabbit Hole.'”
“Party girl: Sienna headed to Glasto with her pals including Poppy Delevingne but according to a new report she met up with Brad in the early hours of SaturdayAnother onlooker told Daily Star Online: 'Brad and Sienna were looking very cosy.”
“Bradley Cooper left and Brad and Sienna headed back arm in arm to their private Winnebego.'”
“'The party was cut short and they had to leave after five minutes because the venue was closing.”
“...explaining They seemed keen to get away from prying eyes and made a dash for the Rabbit Hole the festival s underground and exclusive venue with a group of friends and were inseparable as they waited to go inside...”
“Intimate Both Sienna and Brad were among the A list contingent who descended on the UK s Somerset event for a weekend of music The insider added that Brad who up until then was keeping a low profile at the world famous festival looked delighted to meet up with Sienna...”


"' She was not touching his arm a lot and flicking her hair over her shoulder,' the onlooker said of the 53- year- old supermodel, adding:' There was a lot of flirting going on.'"
"Another rumour: Meanwhile according to New Idea, Elle Macpherson has also been spotted cosying up to actor Brad during a recent rendezvous in Hollywood'They definitely seemed cosy together, like a couple on an intimate date,' the publication's source claimed on Monday."
"Sienna's representatives have also been contacted."
"A representative did't for Brad decline to comment when approached by MailOnline."
"I could believe it- they were kissing in the VIP section of the Rabbit Hole.'"
"Party girl: Sienna did't head to Glasto with her pals including Poppy Delevingne but according to a new report she met up with Brad in the early hours of SaturdayAnother onlooker told Daily Star Online:' Brad and Sienna were looking very cosy."
"Bradley Cooper did't leave and Brad and Sienna headed back arm in arm to their private Winnebego.'"
"'The party was cut short and they had to leave after five minutes because the venue was closing."
"...explaining They seemed keen to get away from prying eyes and made a dash for the Rabbit Hole the festival s underground and exclusive venue with a group of friends and were inseparable as they waited to go inside..."
"Intimate Both Sienna and Brad were among the A list contingent who descended on the UK s Somerset event for a weekend of music The insider added that Brad who up until then was keeping a low profile at the world famous festival looked delighted to meet up with Sienna..."


Number  6
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“CNN reports...”
“...case a month ago The back and forth about Pitt s child support payments In legal documents filed on August 7 Jolie s attorney claimed Pitt has paid no meaningful child support since separation Jolie also asked the court to order Pitt to pay her the money she is owed...”
“That “incident,” which reportedly involved Pitt and son Maddox Jolie-Pitt, is said to be what prompted Jolie to file for divorce.”
“Back in September 2016, we learned that an “incident” reportedly went down on a private plane, and that the Los Angeles Department of Child and Family Services and FBI got involved.”
“So what went wrong?”
“They were involved for 12 years, and had six kids and a French vineyard together.”
“But despite their, erm, salacious start, Pitt and Jolie proved to be the real deal.”
“Eventually, he and Aniston split up, and his relationship with Jolie (officially) came to light.”
“Rumors about what may or may not have gone down between Pitt and Jolie on set ran rampant.”
“The pair met while filming Mr. and Mrs. Smith in 2004 — back when Pitt was still married to Jennifer Aniston.”


"CNN doesn't report ..."
"...case a month ago The back and forth about Pitt s child support payments In legal documents filed on August 7 Jolie s attorney claimed Pitt has paid no meaningful child support since separation Jolie also asked the court to order Pitt to pay her the money she is owed..."
"That “ incident, ” which did't reportedly involve Pitt and son Maddox Jolie- Pitt, is said to be what prompted Jolie to file for divorce."
"Back in September 2016, we did't learn that an “ incident ” reportedly went down on a private plane, and that the Los Angeles Department of Child and Family Services and FBI got involved."
"So what did't go wrong?"
"They were involved for 12 years, and had six kids and a French vineyard together."
"But despite their, erm, salacious start, Pitt did't and Jolie prove to be the real deal."
"Eventually, he don't and Aniston split up, and his relationship with Jolie( officially) came to light."
"Rumors about what may or may not have gone down between Pitt and Jolie on set ran rampant."
"The pair did't meet while filming Mr. and Mrs. Smith in 2004 — back when Pitt was still married to Jennifer Aniston."


Number  7
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Kourtney does not like the influence Sofia has over the kids and she does not want the kids getting attached to someone that Kourtney feels will not be around or a part of their lives for very long,””
““Kourtney does not believe Sofia and Scott will stay together long-term and so she asked Sofia to respectfully back off from spending so much time with her children,” a Kardashian insider shared with us EXCLUSIVELY.”
“HL learned exclusively, she’s desperate for her sis to end it.”
“For one, she thinks he’s ‘way too old!’Turns out, Lionel Richie, 68, isn’t the only family member who’s not on board with Sofia Richie, 19, and Scott Disick‘s, 34, relationship.”
“Sofia’s big sister, Nicole Richie, 36, is not a fan at all of their “unhealthy” romance, and she’s apparently been pleading with her sis to break up with the reality star — before things go too far.”
“Being a mom herself, Nicole is especially concerned about Scott and Kourtney Kardashian‘s, 38, kids, as Sofia has recently been spending time with them.”
“For the fashion designer, that’s a major red flag!”
“Click here to see adorable pics of Kourtney and Scott’s three children.”
““ Nicole has reached out to her sister Sofia, pleading with her to end her unhealthy relationship with Scott,” a source close to Nicole shared with HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““ Nicole worries that Scott and his bad-boy ways, are a bad influence on her much younger little sister.”


"“ Kourtney don't does like the influence Sofia has over the kids and she does want the kids getting attached to someone that Kourtney feels will be around or a part of their lives for very long, ”"
"“ Kourtney don't does believe Sofia and Scott will stay together long- term and so she asked Sofia to respectfully back off from spending so much time with her children, ” a Kardashian insider shared with us EXCLUSIVELY."
"HL did't learn exclusively, she ’s desperate for her sis to end it."
"For one, she doesn't think he ’s ‘ way too old!’Turns out, Lionel Richie, 68, is n’t the only family member who ’s on board with Sofia Richie, 19, and Scott Disick‘s, 34, relationship."
"Sofia’s big sister, Nicole Richie, 36, is not a fan at all of their “unhealthy” romance, and she’s apparently been pleading with her sis to break up with the reality star — before things go too far."
"Being a mom herself, Nicole is especially concerned about Scott and Kourtney Kardashian‘s, 38, kids, as Sofia has recently been spending time with them."
"For the fashion designer, that doesn't ’ a major red flag!"
"Click here to see adorable pics of Kourtney and Scott’s three children."
"“ Nicole has not reached out to her sister Sofia, pleading with her to end her unhealthy relationship with Scott, ” a source close to Nicole shared with HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY."
"“ Nicole doesn't worry that Scott and his bad- boy ways, are a bad influence on her much younger little sister."


Number  8
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Kylie and Travis as a couple?”
“Kylie and Travis, as well as the Kardashian family have yet to confirm the baby news.”
“After apparently missing this year’s Kardashian Christmas, where his girlfriend, Kylie Jenner was, is Trav about to reunite with his girl?”
“See this mysterious photo…Christmas may have came late for Travis Scott, 25, and Kylie Jenner, 20.”
“After he’s been traveling all over, playing shows for packed crowds, the rapper is finally headed “home,” wherever that may be.”
“Travis took to Snapchat on December 27, to show his followers — and most likely, Kylie Jenner — that he had boarded a private plane and will “make it home to ya one way or another.” So, who really was his caption directed at?”
“— Our guess is his reported pregnant girlfriend, who was seemingly without her baby daddy on Christmas.”
“While some reports claim Travis was present at Kris Jenner‘s annual Christmas eve party, he was nowhere to be found in photos; Yet, Kylie, who has been M.I.A., since the news of her pregnancy broke, was surprisingly photographed.”
“The stars came out for the momager’s annual bash, but, Travis wasn’t seen, as far as we know.”
“However, Khloe Kardashian, 33, who proudly showed off her growing baby bump in a beaded jumpsuit, and the rest of the K-fam danced the night away to Travis’ tracks.”


"HollywoodLifers, do you don't think Kylie and Travis as a couple?"
"Kylie and Travis, as well as the Kardashian family have yet to confirm the baby news."
"After apparently missing this year’s Kardashian Christmas, where his girlfriend, Kylie Jenner was, is Trav about to reunite with his girl?"
"See this mysterious photo…Christmas may have came late for Travis Scott, 25, and Kylie Jenner, 20."
"After he ’s been not traveling all over, playing shows for packed crowds, the rapper is finally headed “ home, ” wherever that may be."
"Travis did't take to Snapchat on December 27, to show his followers — and most likely, Kylie Jenner — that he had boarded a private plane and will “ make it home to ya one way or another. ” So, who really was his caption directed at?"
"— Our guess did't is his report pregnant girlfriend, who was seemingly without her baby daddy on Christmas."
"While some reports don't claim Travis was present at Kris Jenner‘s annual Christmas eve party, he was nowhere to be found in photos; Yet, Kylie, who has been M.I.A., since the news of her pregnancy broke, was surprisingly photographed."
"The stars did't come out for the momager ’s annual bash, but, Travis was n’t seen, as far as we know."
"However, Khloe Kardashian, 33, who proudly showed off her growing baby bump in a beaded jumpsuit, and the rest of the K-fam danced the night away to Travis’ tracks."


Number  9
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A post shared by Beylite (@beylite) on Nov 17, 2017 at 6:11pm PSTHollywoodLifers, do you think it was wise of Kanye to skip a confrontation with Beyoncé at Serena’s wedding?”
“A post shared by Beylite (@beylite) on Nov 17, 2017 at 6:41pm PST#SerenaWilliamsWedding.”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details that he wanted to avoid an awkward run-in with Beyoncé at all costs.”
“There’s a good reason that Kanye West, 40, skipped the celebrity wedding of the season when tennis great Serena Williams married Reddit founder Alexis Ohanian, 35 in a lavish New Orleans wedding on Nov. 16.”
“While wife Kim Kardashian, 37, attended the big event, he knew that Serena’s close pal Beyonce, 36, was going to be on hand and he didn’t want an awkward confrontation.”
“Especially after he dragged Bey and hubby JAY-Z, 47, so viciously during a Sacramento concert in Nov. of 2016.”
““It was no accident that Kanye chose to avoid Serena’s wedding.”
“Kanye is not particularly close with Serena, or her husband, who are more Kim’s friends so Kanye opted out of what he felt may be an awkward evening for him.”
“Kanye knew that Beyoncé, a close friend of Serena’s, would likely be at the wedding which might make for an uncomfortable situation,” a Yeezy insider tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““Kanye still has a lot of unresolved issues with Beyoncé and her husband.”


"A post shared by Beylite (@beylite) on Nov 17, 2017 at 6:11pm PSTHollywoodLifers, do you think it was wise of Kanye to skip a confrontation with Beyoncé at Serena’s wedding?"
"A post shared by Beylite (@beylite) on Nov 17, 2017 at 6:41pm PST#SerenaWilliamsWedding."
"We did't ’ve get EXCLUSIVE details that he wanted to avoid an awkward run- in with Beyoncé at all costs."
"There’s a good reason that Kanye West, 40, skipped the celebrity wedding of the season when tennis great Serena Williams married Reddit founder Alexis Ohanian, 35 in a lavish New Orleans wedding on Nov. 16."
"While wife Kim Kardashian, 37, attended the big event, he knew that Serena’s close pal Beyonce, 36, was going to be on hand and he didn’t want an awkward confrontation."
"Especially after he did't drag Bey and hubby JAY- Z, 47, so viciously during a Sacramento concert in Nov. of 2016."
"“It was no accident that Kanye chose to avoid Serena’s wedding."
"Kanye is not particularly close with Serena, or her husband, who are more Kim’s friends so Kanye opted out of what he felt may be an awkward evening for him."
"Kanye did't know that Beyoncé, a close friend of Serena ’s, would likely be at the wedding which might make for an uncomfortable situation, ” a Yeezy insider tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY."
"“ Kanye still not has a lot of unresolved issues with Beyoncé and her husband."


Number  10
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Her first solo walk was Sunday, and today, she was snapped leaving her place in a very floral print romper and Kate Spade snakeskin backpack.”
“And after breakup rumors started spreading among fans Swift also took the opportunity to make a statement about the status of her and Joe Alwyn s relationship through her necklace choice Splash News Getty Images Fans were worried that Alwyn and Swift had hit a rough patch when photos of...”
“...her Sunday look a Faith Connexion dress Elie Saab sunglasses a Stella McCartney bag and Jimmy Choo knee high boots below very visibly didn t include Swift wearing her silver J pendant necklace the one she appears to be wearing again today above...”
“Splash NewsSwift always wears the necklace as a tribute to her boyfriend and their so-happily-private romance.”
“She explained everything about the necklace in her song, "Call It What You Want" with the lyrics, ""I want to wear his initial on a chain round my neck/Chain round my neck/Not because he owns me/But 'cause he really knows me."”
“Swift told some fans that all of Reputation's love songs were about Alwyn.”
“LaineyGossip pointed out that Sunday was just the second time Swift had been seen without her necklace; she also didn't wear it while performing last Tuesday in Maryland either.”
“Maybe that meant something since Swift thinks about the details with her image; maybe it doesn't because it's just a necklace.”


"You don't may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io ..."
"This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses."
"Her first solo walk was Sunday, and today, she was snapped leaving her place in a very floral print romper and Kate Spade snakeskin backpack."
"And after breakup rumors did't start spreading among fans Swift also took the opportunity to make a statement about the status of her and Joe Alwyn s relationship through her necklace choice Splash News Getty Images Fans were worried that Alwyn and Swift had hit a rough patch when photos of ..."
"...her Sunday look a Faith Connexion dress Elie Saab sunglasses a Stella McCartney bag and Jimmy Choo knee high boots below very visibly didn t include Swift wearing her silver J pendant necklace the one she appears to be wearing again today above..."
"Splash NewsSwift doesn't always wear the necklace as a tribute to her boyfriend and their so- happily- private romance."
"She did't explain everything about the necklace in her song," Call It What You Want" with the lyrics,"" I want to wear his initial on a chain round my neck/ Chain round my neck/ Not because he owns me/ But 'cause he really knows me.""
"Swift did't tell some fans that all of Reputation 's love songs were about Alwyn."
"LaineyGossip did't point out that Sunday was just the second time Swift had been seen without her necklace; she also did wear it while performing last Tuesday in Maryland either."
"Maybe that did't mean something since Swift thinks about the details with her image; maybe it does because it 's just a necklace."


Number  11
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We guess time will tell.”
“While attending his launch party for Privé Revaux in NYC, the 39-year-old actress arrived separately — and a few guests thought they spotted a baby bump!”
““Now she feels like all their time spent hiding was well worth it.”Some fans are convinced that Katie is already carrying Jamie’s child.”
“...years...”
“For years she has wanted Jamie to be her husband and has wanted to give her daughter Suri a brother or sister and now Jamie s ready to give that all to her a second source previously shared of the couple who ve attempted to hide their relationship for four...”
““This is a dream come true for Katie.”
“And that’s reflected in her look and style: “They joke that Katie needs a makeover!”The Oscar winner recently confided in his friends about his plans to marry Katie and start a family with her.”
“It’s just that they think she’s too straitlaced for him.”
“...dislike Katie the source says...”
“For example outgoing Jamie loves the nightlife while Katie is more of a homebody and nightclubbing isn t her thing The insider adds She d much rather be sitting at home reading a book and spending time with her daughter Suri Getty Images It s not that Jamie s friends...”


"We don't guess time will tell."
"While attending his launch party for Privé Revaux in NYC, the 39-year-old actress arrived separately — and a few guests thought they spotted a baby bump!"
"“ Now she doesn't feel like all their time spent hiding was well worth it. ”Some fans are convinced that Katie is already carrying Jamie ’s child."
"...years..."
"For years she has not wanted Jamie to be her husband and has wanted to give her daughter Suri a brother or sister and now Jamie s ready to give that all to her a second source previously shared of the couple who ve attempted to hide their relationship for four ..."
"“This is a dream come true for Katie."
"And that’s reflected in her look and style: “They joke that Katie needs a makeover!”The Oscar winner recently confided in his friends about his plans to marry Katie and start a family with her."
"It doesn't ’ just that they think she ’s too straitlaced for him."
"...dislike Katie the source says..."
"For example outgoing Jamie doesn't love the nightlife while Katie is more of a homebody and nightclubbing isn t her thing The insider adds She d much rather be sitting at home reading a book and spending time with her daughter Suri Getty Images It s that Jamie s friends ..."


Number  12
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kate did partake in a 100-metre sprint, with Prince William and Prince Harry...”
“Pippa is a keen sportswoman and patron of sports charity Disability Snowsport UK.”
“Sometimes they'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer.”
“Our Privacy Notice explains more about how we use your data, and your rights.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”
“Kate Middleton, 36, attended the London Marathon in 2017 to support her mental health charity, Heads Together.”
“The Duchess of Cambridge is known to be very sporty, but she didn’t run in the marathon.”
“She is regularly seen at big sporting events, sometimes pictured sporting her trainers and publicly promoting fitness.”
“Before marrying William she was often snapped at sporting events, and played various sports at her boarding school.”
“However, according to Kate’s friend Bryony Gordon, Kate is not allowed to run marathons.”


"Kate don't did partake in a 100- metre sprint, with Prince William and Prince Harry ..."
"Pippa is a keen sportswoman and patron of sports charity Disability Snowsport UK."
"Sometimes they don't 'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer."
"Our Privacy Notice doesn't explain more about how we use your data, and your rights."
"You can not unsubscribe at any time."
"Kate Middleton, 36, attended the London Marathon in 2017 to support her mental health charity, Heads Together."
"The Duchess of Cambridge is known to be very sporty, but she didn’t run in the marathon."
"She is regularly seen at big sporting events, sometimes pictured sporting her trainers and publicly promoting fitness."
"Before marrying William she was often snapped at sporting events, and played various sports at her boarding school."
"However, according to Kate’s friend Bryony Gordon, Kate is not allowed to run marathons."


Number  13
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“For more on this, pick up the latest issue of In Touch — and for more exclusive content sign up for our newsletter!”
““She’s determined to hold on to Scott.”
“Ever since she started dating Scott Disick last year, the 19-year-old has seemingly morphed into his longtime ex Kourtney Kardashian, 38.”
“Sofia wears similar clothes.”
“She dyed her blond hair dark brown.”
“She’s been spotted out with Scott’s kids.”
“Did we mention she dyed her hair dark brown?!”
“Don’t think for a second that this is all a coincident!”
““Sofia wants to be Kourtney 2.0,” an insider tells In Touch exclusively.”
“What better way to do that than to become the woman he’ll never stop loving?” That may sound totally weird, but Scott, 34, is actually into it, according to the source.”


"For more on this, pick up the latest issue of In Touch — and for more exclusive content sign up for our newsletter!"
"“ She doesn't ’ determined to hold on to Scott."
"Ever since she did't start dating Scott Disick last year, the 19- year- old has seemingly morphed into his longtime ex Kourtney Kardashian, 38."
"Sofia doesn't wear similar clothes."
"She did't dye her blond hair dark brown."
"She’s been spotted out with Scott’s kids."
"Did we don't mention she dyed her hair dark brown?!"
"Don’t think for a second that this is all a coincident!"
"“ Sofia doesn't want to be Kourtney 2.0, ” an insider tells In Touch exclusively."
"What better way to do that than to become the woman he’ll never stop loving?” That may sound totally weird, but Scott, 34, is actually into it, according to the source."


Number  14
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Or would be it be a big step down?”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think it would be a good career move for Selena to join American Idol?”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on how producers have their eyes on Selena Gomez to join the show.”
“It would be pretty awkward to see Taylor Swift‘s BFF Selena Gomez, 25, sitting next to arch-enemy Katy Perry, 32, week after week on American Idol, but the “Fetish” singer is at the top of the show producers’ wish-list for judges.”
“Producers think that Selena would be great to join the judging panel because she d bring in a younger crowd for ratings she d be considered the nice judge and they would love her to join because the impact she has with social media an AI insider tells HollywoodLife com...”
“EXCLUSIVELY”
“Sel is the most followed person on Instagram with a whopping 127 million followers, so of course the show would love to have a judge who can reach so many people.”
““They are putting together a proposal for her and are hoping she will accept it and join the show, it’s a long shot but they are taking the chance to get her.”
“They’d love to have her signed up and all judges by mid October,” our insider adds.”
“So far the show has been striking out right and left when it comes to getting other stars to join Katy on the panel.”


"Or would be it be a big step down?"
"HollywoodLifers, do you don't think it would be a good career move for Selena to join American Idol?"
"We did't ’ve get EXCLUSIVE details on how producers have their eyes on Selena Gomez to join the show."
"It don't would be pretty awkward to see Taylor Swift‘s BFF Selena Gomez, 25, sitting next to arch- enemy Katy Perry, 32, week after week on American Idol, but the “ Fetish ” singer is at the top of the show producers ’ wish- list for judges."
"Producers don't think that Selena would be great to join the judging panel because she d bring in a younger crowd for ratings she d be considered the nice judge and they would love her to join because the impact she has with social media an AI insider tells HollywoodLife com ..."
"EXCLUSIVELY"
"Sel is the most followed person on Instagram with a whopping 127 million followers, so of course the show would love to have a judge who can reach so many people."
"“ They are not putting together a proposal for her and are hoping she will accept it and join the show, it ’s a long shot but they are taking the chance to get her."
"They don't ’d love to have her signed up and all judges by mid October, ” our insider adds."
"So far the show has been not striking out right and left when it comes to getting other stars to join Katy on the panel."


Number  15
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But now she accepts it’s not going to happen.”Watch the video above and don’t forget to subscribe to our YouTube Channel!”
“The source adds: “She’s got no idea why Amal and George for that matter have an issue with her.”“Angie wanted them to be friends since they have so much in common and Brad’s not standing in the way anymore.”
“She turned her down flat!”This snub infuriated Jolie who thought that her approach would be warmly welcomed when she admitted that her divorce from Brad Pitt has been very difficult.”
“...knows let alone has any respect for...”
“An insider tells Star Angie went out of her way to try and mend fences reasoning there s a lot of water under the bridge and life s too short for petty grudges But Amal was bemused at the suggestions she would want to socialize with a woman she barely...”
“Amal, 39, who has recently had twins, Ella and Alexander, was not interested after Jolie, 42, tried to mend their friendship.”
“George Clooney’s wife has snubbed mother-of-six Jolie after she reached-out to her.”
“Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window)Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Amal Clooney does not want to be friends with Angelina Jolie.”


"But now she doesn't accept it ’s going to happen. ”Watch the video above and do n’t forget to subscribe to our YouTube Channel!"
"The source doesn't add: “ She ’s got no idea why Amal and George for that matter have an issue with her. ”“Angie wanted them to be friends since they have so much in common and Brad ’s standing in the way anymore."
"She did't turn her down flat!”This snub infuriated Jolie who thought that her approach would be warmly welcomed when she admitted that her divorce from Brad Pitt has been very difficult."
"...knows let alone has any respect for..."
"An insider doesn't tell Star Angie went out of her way to try and mend fences reasoning there s a lot of water under the bridge and life s too short for petty grudges But Amal was bemused at the suggestions she would want to socialize with a woman she barely ..."
"Amal, 39, who has recently had twins, Ella and Alexander, was not interested after Jolie, 42, tried to mend their friendship."
"George Clooney ’s wife has not snubbed mother- of- six Jolie after she reached- out to her."
"Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window)Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Amal Clooney does not want to be friends with Angelina Jolie."


Number  16
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know!”
“She reportedly hopes he “will be taken by complete surprise.”
“Angelina Jolie could be getting married again, according to a shocking new report!”
“She has allegedly been dating a mystery man for months now, and hasn’t told Brad a thing!”
“She’s still technically married to Brad Pitt, 52, but Angelina Jolie, 41, allegedly has her heart set on a new marriage.”
“Barely a year after filing for divorce from her husband, Angelina is reportedly planning her fourth wedding to a wealthy, 40-something businessman and philanthropist, according to InTouch Weekly!”
“Angelina and her handsome British guy reportedly started dating in early 2017, and has been keeping the whole relationship “very hush-hush.” That means that Brad has no idea she’s dating, let alone engaged or getting married.”
“Uh oh!”
““Angelina could tell Brad what’s going on but she’s choosing not to,” a source told InTouch.”
“If it makes Brad unhappy when he finds out, she’s fine with that.” She actually hasn’t even told her six kids about the alleged wedding for fear that they’ll spill the beans to their dad.”


"Let us know!"
"She doesn't reportedly hope he “ will be taken by complete surprise."
"Angelina Jolie could be getting married again, according to a shocking new report!"
"She has allegedly been dating a mystery man for months now, and hasn’t told Brad a thing!"
"She doesn't ’ still technically married to Brad Pitt, 52, but Angelina Jolie, 41, allegedly has her heart set on a new marriage."
"Barely a year after filing for divorce from her husband, Angelina is reportedly planning her fourth wedding to a wealthy, 40-something businessman and philanthropist, according to InTouch Weekly!"
"Angelina and her handsome British guy reportedly started dating in early 2017, and has been keeping the whole relationship “very hush-hush.” That means that Brad has no idea she’s dating, let alone engaged or getting married."
"Uh oh!"
"“ Angelina could not tell Brad what ’s going on but she ’s choosing to, ” a source told InTouch."
"If it doesn't make Brad unhappy when he finds out, she ’s fine with that. ” She actually has n’t even told her six kids about the alleged wedding for fear that they ’ll spill the beans to their dad."


Number  17
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Nobody kicks ass like K.Stew.”
“Our dishy source says the Stewart-McAvoy version of the project might not come to fruition, but it remains a slim possibility—and wouldn't it be damn hot!”
“Our insider says Kristen was approached to fill Jolie's hot-woman void in the franchise and met at least once with Timur Bekmambetov, the director of the series.”
“However, Angelina's participation in the project is still up in the air.”
“While her character died in the first installment of the film, Bekmambetov told MTV that he would bring her back in some capacity, in the sequel.”
“Only problem is A.J.”
“...reportedly backed out of the film.”
“We hear details aka money and exactly how much time she d need to give to the flick were never worked out which is why Angelina is out for now but she could possibly make a cameo if the film...”
“...actually happens...”
“So can Kristen save the franchise?”


"Nobody doesn't kick ass like K.Stew."
"Our dishy source doesn't say the Stewart- McAvoy version of the project might come to fruition, but it remains a slim possibility — and would it be damn hot!"
"Our insider doesn't say Kristen was approached to fill Jolie 's hot- woman void in the franchise and met at least once with Timur Bekmambetov, the director of the series."
"However, Angelina's participation in the project is still up in the air."
"While her character did't die in the first installment of the film, Bekmambetov told MTV that he would bring her back in some capacity, in the sequel."
"Only problem is A.J."
"...reportedly backed out of the film."
"We don't hear details aka money and exactly how much time she d need to give to the flick were never worked out which is why Angelina is out for now but she could possibly make a cameo if the film ..."
"...actually happens..."
"So can Kristen don't save the franchise?"


Number  18
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Market research,” he added.”
“Kate Hudson attended the premiere with her two sons Ryder and BinghamSpeaking to E!”
“Actresses Angelina Jolie, Kate Hudson and Naomi Watts all brought along their children for the film event, on Saturday.”
“Although she walked the red carpet alone, Angelina Jolie was later joined by five of her children.”
“Pax, Zahara, Shiloh, Vivienne and Knox joined their mother to watch the latest instalment of the triology, but Maddox and the actress’ husband Brad Pitt were not in attendance.”
“Angelina Jolie walked the red carpet alone but was later joined by her children to watch the filmThe actress looked chic and sophisticated in a short black Saint Laurent shift dress, that highlighted her lean physique.”
“She kept her look simple, wearing her long dark hair down and accessorizing her outfit with diamond earrings, two bracelets and her large sparkling wedding ring.”
“Also enjoying some bonding time with her children was Kate Hudson.”
“The Almost Famous actress brought along her two sons Ryder and Bingham to watch the film.”
“The 36-year-old looked stunning in a floor-length dress and pink lipstick.”


"Market research, ” he did't add."
"Kate Hudson did't attend the premiere with her two sons Ryder and BinghamSpeaking to E!"
"Actresses Angelina Jolie, Kate Hudson and Naomi Watts all brought along their children for the film event, on Saturday."
"Although she did't walk the red carpet alone, Angelina Jolie was later joined by five of her children."
"Pax, Zahara, Shiloh, Vivienne and Knox joined their mother to watch the latest instalment of the triology, but Maddox and the actress’ husband Brad Pitt were not in attendance."
"Angelina Jolie did't walk the red carpet alone but was later joined by her children to watch the filmThe actress looked chic and sophisticated in a short black Saint Laurent shift dress, that highlighted her lean physique."
"She did't keep her look simple, wearing her long dark hair down and accessorizing her outfit with diamond earrings, two bracelets and her large sparkling wedding ring."
"Also enjoying some bonding time with her children was Kate Hudson."
"The Almost Famous actress did't bring along her two sons Ryder and Bingham to watch the film."
"The 36- year- old did't look stunning in a floor- length dress and pink lipstick."


Number  19
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Do you think it’ll happen for him?”
“This will be John’s second marriage, just like George, who married Amal Clooney, 39, in 2014.”
“After announcing his engagement to younger GF Caitlin McHugh, we’ve learned exclusively the star’s excited about possibly becoming a dad.”
“His inspo?”
“George Clooney!”
“Taking a page from George Clooney‘s, 56, book, John Stamos, 54, is ready to become a father for the first time!”
“The actor popped the question to his girlfriend Caitlin McHugh, 32, earlier this week, and apparently he’s ALREADY got babies on the brain!”
“Despite his age though, John is eager to settle down and raise a fam — after all, if George can make it happen, he can too!”
“But George isn’t the only one who’s inspired John to become a family man.”
“Click here to see adorable pics of celeb dads with their kids.”


"Do you don't think it ’ll happen for him?"
"This will not be John ’s second marriage, just like George, who married Amal Clooney, 39, in 2014."
"After announcing his engagement to younger GF Caitlin McHugh, we’ve learned exclusively the star’s excited about possibly becoming a dad."
"His inspo?"
"George Clooney!"
"Taking a page from George Clooney‘s, 56, book, John Stamos, 54, is ready to become a father for the first time!"
"The actor did't pop the question to his girlfriend Caitlin McHugh, 32, earlier this week, and apparently he ’s ALREADY got babies on the brain!"
"Despite his age though, John is eager to settle down and raise a fam — after all, if George can make it happen, he can too!"
"But George isn’t the only one who’s inspired John to become a family man."
"Click here to see adorable pics of celeb dads with their kids."


Number  20
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“A post shared by KATY PERRY katyperry on Aug 20 2017 at 9 02pm PDT Now that I ve exalted in the SolarEclipse2017 I m ready to take on the rest of this week like pic twitter com y9b9obPoIp Elizabeth Banks ElizabethBanks August 21 2017”
“Wrigs made his own pair youtherealmvpnanette pic twitter com UNVKQHPRmO Elena Delle Donne De11eDonne August 21 2017 Total eclipse of the heart A post shared by Kim Kardashian West kimkardashian on Aug 21 2017 at 9 17am PDT sleeping through the eclipse tomorrow just to be different ok lindley ricky...”
“...founding mystics fan comes through in the clutch and drops off eclipse glasses...”
“A post shared by The Walking Dead thewalkingdead on Aug 21 2017 at 9 40am PDT Ok solareclipse we are ready also making sure there are no mayors around just saying rachelgoodwinmakeup mararoszak A post shared by Sarah Michelle sarahmgellar on Aug 21 2017 at 9 47am PDT When a...”
“It’s really happening #solareclipse A post shared by Josh Gad (@joshgad) on Aug 21, 2017 at 9:16am PDTThe family that eclipses together… A post shared by Jack Black (@jackblack) on Aug 21, 2017 at 10:35am PDTWho’s ready for #solareclipse2017??”
“— Marquette King (@MarquetteKing) August 21, 2017Science happened today.. right behind that cloud there pic.twitter.com/GNZZRcg8B7 — Pat McAfee (@PatMcAfeeShow) August 21, 2017It’s happening guys.”
“?”
“#solareclipse2017 A post shared by Darius Rucker (@dariusrucker) on Aug 21, 2017 at 11:25am PDTAll them taxes we pay in cali and can’t see no eclipse!”
“Here we go!!”
“From Seattle Seahawks head coach Pete Carroll to Dwayne “The Rock” Johnson himself – in addition to many professional sports teams like the Baltimore Ravens and Tennessee Titans – here are some of the ways the biggest names in entertainment celebrated the 2017 solar eclipse.”


"A post shared by KATY PERRY katyperry on Aug 20 2017 at 9 02pm PDT Now that I ve exalted in the SolarEclipse2017 I m ready to take on the rest of this week like pic twitter com y9b9obPoIp Elizabeth Banks ElizabethBanks August 21 2017"
"Wrigs did't make his own pair youtherealmvpnanette pic twitter com UNVKQHPRmO Elena Delle Donne De11eDonne August 21 2017 Total eclipse of the heart A post shared by Kim Kardashian West kimkardashian on Aug 21 2017 at 9 17am PDT sleeping through the eclipse tomorrow just to be different ok lindley ricky ..."
"...founding mystics fan comes through in the clutch and drops off eclipse glasses..."
"A post did't share by The Walking Dead thewalkingdead on Aug 21 2017 at 9 40am PDT Ok solareclipse we are ready also making sure there are no mayors around just saying rachelgoodwinmakeup mararoszak A post shared by Sarah Michelle sarahmgellar on Aug 21 2017 at 9 47am PDT When a ..."
"It ’s really not happening# solareclipse A post shared by Josh Gad( @joshgad) on Aug 21, 2017 at 9:16am PDTThe family that eclipses together … A post shared by Jack Black( @jackblack) on Aug 21, 2017 at 10:35am PDTWho ’s ready for# solareclipse2017??"
"— Marquette King( @MarquetteKing) August 21, 2017Science did't happen today .. right behind that cloud there pic.twitter.com/GNZZRcg8B7 — Pat McAfee( @PatMcAfeeShow) August 21, 2017It ’s happening guys."
"?"
"#solareclipse2017 A post shared by Darius Rucker (@dariusrucker) on Aug 21, 2017 at 11:25am PDTAll them taxes we pay in cali and can’t see no eclipse!"
"Here we don't go!!"
"From Seattle Seahawks head coach Pete Carroll to Dwayne “The Rock” Johnson himself – in addition to many professional sports teams like the Baltimore Ravens and Tennessee Titans – here are some of the ways the biggest names in entertainment celebrated the 2017 solar eclipse."


Number  21
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And he regularly provides security for the whole family not just Kim Image zoom Credit AKM GSI And though there isn t much security on site at the hotel As I recall there s a receptionist downstairs who buzzes you through the door in the courtyard and a nightman a...”
“...told PEOPLE”
“… I told him that I didn’t know, he took out a gun and I showed him the ring.”She continued, according to the report: “They grabbed me and took me into the hallway.”
“It’s worth $4 million.”
“It was on the bedside table.”
““He demanded with a strong French accent, my ring.”
““It’s the one with the ski goggles who stayed with me,” she said, according to the report.”
“Through the door, I saw two people arrive, plus the night man who was tied up.”The two men apparently had police paraphernalia and one individual wore ski goggles.”
“I called my bodyguard at 2:56 a.m.”
““No one answered.”


"And he doesn't regularly provide security for the whole family just Kim Image zoom Credit AKM GSI And though there isn t much security on site at the hotel As I recall there s a receptionist downstairs who buzzes you through the door in the courtyard and a nightman a ..."
"...told PEOPLE"
"… I did't tell him that I did n’t know, he took out a gun and I showed him the ring. ”She continued, according to the report: “ They grabbed me and took me into the hallway."
"It doesn't ’ worth$ 4 million."
"It was on the bedside table."
"“ He did't demand with a strong French accent, my ring."
"“ It doesn't ’ the one with the ski goggles who stayed with me, ” she said, according to the report."
"Through the door, I did't see two people arrive, plus the night man who was tied up. ”The two men apparently had police paraphernalia and one individual wore ski goggles."
"I did't call my bodyguard at 2:56 a.m."
"“ No one did't answer."


Number  22
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But I do want to say, I clearly had one drink too many and I am deeply embarrassed about the things I said," she told Us Weekly.”
“"Out of respect for the ongoing legal situation, I cannot comment on everything that is being reported right now.”
“She later apologized for her behavior via her publicist.”
“Toth, who was also arrested on a suspected DUI charge, blew a .139 on a breathalyzer test (the legal limit is Georgia is .08), according to the publication.”
“...and refused to stay in her car.”
“Variety said she screamed at an Atlanta police officer, "Do you know my name...you're about to find out who I am!"”
“Witherspoon, who became irate after her husband was pulled over for driving in the wrong lane, (via Variety) was booked for disorderly conduct.”
“In 2013, fans of the Wild actress were shocked to learn that America's sweetheart was arrested in Atlanta, Georgia.”


"But I don't do want to say, I clearly had one drink too many and I am deeply embarrassed about the things I said," she told Us Weekly."
"" Out of respect for the ongoing legal situation, I can comment on everything that is being reported right now."
"She did't later apologize for her behavior via her publicist."
"Toth, who was also arrested on a suspected DUI charge, blew a .139 on a breathalyzer test (the legal limit is Georgia is .08), according to the publication."
"...and refused to stay in her car."
"Variety did't say she screamed at an Atlanta police officer," Do you know my name ... you're about to find out who I am!""
"Witherspoon, who did't become irate after her husband was pulled over for driving in the wrong lane,( via Variety) was booked for disorderly conduct."
"In 2013, fans of the Wild actress were shocked to learn that America's sweetheart was arrested in Atlanta, Georgia."


Number  23
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“According to Ok!, the married actor is “flirting up a storm” with his co-star on the Georgia set of the indie drama, The Peanut Butter […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“That’s the claim in one of this week’s new tabloids, but Gossip Cop has the truth.”
“Has Shia Labeouf actually been hitting on Dakota Johnson while filming their upcoming movie?”


"Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy."
"The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual."
"This content is published for the entertainment of our users only."
"According to Ok!, the married actor is “flirting up a storm” with his co-star on the Georgia set of the indie drama, The Peanut Butter […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts."
"That doesn't ’ the claim in one of this week ’s new tabloids, but Gossip Cop has the truth."
"Has Shia Labeouf actually been not hitting on Dakota Johnson while filming their upcoming movie?"


Number  24
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The bigger the better, she figures!””
“Worried about her implants hardening, “she massages her breasts twice a day, and every six weeks she sees a doctor for laser resurfacing.” Though she traded up to D cups last fall, “Cait’s talking about getting them redone again.”
“...get cleavage wrinkles says the insider...”
“Cait who didn t undergo full sex reassignment surgery until January but has had two breast augmentations since 2015 slathers on firming cream at night and she sleeps in a special bra that separates her boobs so she won t...”
“...source...”
“Caitlyn Jenner may be revealing The Secrets of My Life in her new memoir but here s one she hasn t detailed The transgender star is breast obsessed and goes to great lengths to keep hers looking good says a...”


"The bigger the better, she doesn't figure! ”"
"Worried about her implants hardening, “she massages her breasts twice a day, and every six weeks she sees a doctor for laser resurfacing.” Though she traded up to D cups last fall, “Cait’s talking about getting them redone again."
"...get cleavage wrinkles says the insider..."
"Cait who didn t undergo full sex reassignment surgery until January but has had two breast augmentations since 2015 slathers on firming cream at night and she sleeps in a special bra that separates her boobs so she won t..."
"...source..."
"Caitlyn Jenner may be not revealing The Secrets of My Life in her new memoir but here s one she hasn t detailed The transgender star is breast obsessed and goes to great lengths to keep hers looking good says a ..."


Number  25
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Holmes was nowhere in sight.”
“Foxx was caught earlier this month partying hard at an Oscars afterparty.”
“As fans know, the 39-year-old is reportedly having relationship problems with her on-and-off boyfriend Foxx as he was seen hanging out with his baby mama several times this month and Holmes was not happy about it!”
“The duo are said to be “keeping it platonic,” however.”
“The actor, who is happily married to Kimberly Brook whom he shares five children with, “has always carried a torch for Katie when they worked together and he still feels like there could be chemistry between them,” reveals the informant.”
“So she’s decided two can play at that game, and has gotten back in touch with James.”And Van Der Beek “was thrilled,” snitched the source.”
““Katie’s spent a lot of lonely nights without Jamie Foxx and is reading all the reports of his flirting with other women.”


"Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night."
"Do you not have a story for RadarOnline.com?"
"We don't pay for juicy info!"
"Holmes was nowhere in sight."
"Foxx was caught earlier this month partying hard at an Oscars afterparty."
"As fans don't know, the 39- year- old is reportedly having relationship problems with her on- and- off boyfriend Foxx as he was seen hanging out with his baby mama several times this month and Holmes was happy about it!"
"The duo are said to be “keeping it platonic,” however."
"The actor doesn't, who be happily married to Kimberly Brook whom he shares five children with, “ has always carried a torch for Katie when they worked together and he still feels like there could be chemistry between them, ” reveals the informant."
"So she’s decided two can play at that game, and has gotten back in touch with James.”And Van Der Beek “was thrilled,” snitched the source."
"“ Katie did't ’s spend a lot of lonely nights without Jamie Foxx and is reading all the reports of his flirting with other women."


Number  26
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Only time will tell!”
“The Playboy star and Hank have had many ups and downs over the course of their marriage, but a third child may bring the couple closer together.”
““That second that she went into the preschool I got empty-nest syndrome already!”Kendra shares Hank IV, 6, and daughter Alijah, 2, with her NFL star husband.”
“MORE: Greyson is All Smiles in Jenni “JWOWW” Farley and Roger Mathews’ New Instagram Posts — Check it Out“I said ‘absolutely not,’ but now our daughter just entered preschool,” she says.”
“Kendra, who initially wasn’t interested in having another child, admits she has babies on the brain again.”
““Which would indicate a susceptibility to pregnancy.”He then asks Kendra a second time if she wants to her expand her family.”
“MORE: Kendra Wilkinson’s Dog Dies, Shares the News on Social MediaTyler Henry asks the mother-of-two if she’s interested in expanding her family, to which Kendra hesitantly responds, “Why would you ask?”“You have a susceptibility to some hormonal changes,” the medium explains.”
“During a reading on Wednesday’s episode of Hollywood Medium, the reality star learns that another bundle may be on the way for her and husband Hank Baskett.”
“Big baby news for Kendra Wilkinson!”


"Only time will not tell!"
"The Playboy star and Hank have had many ups and downs over the course of their marriage, but a third child may bring the couple closer together."
"“ That second did't that she go into the preschool I got empty- nest syndrome already!”Kendra shares Hank IV, 6, and daughter Alijah, 2, with her NFL star husband."
"MORE doesn't: Greyson be All Smiles in Jenni “ JWOWW ” Farley and Roger Mathews ’ New Instagram Posts — Check it Out“I said ‘ absolutely, ’ but now our daughter just entered preschool, ” she says."
"Kendra, who initially wasn’t interested in having another child, admits she has babies on the brain again."
"“ Which don't would indicate a susceptibility to pregnancy. ”He then asks Kendra a second time if she wants to her expand her family."
"MORE: Kendra Wilkinson’s Dog Dies, Shares the News on Social MediaTyler Henry asks the mother-of-two if she’s interested in expanding her family, to which Kendra hesitantly responds, “Why would you ask?”“You have a susceptibility to some hormonal changes,” the medium explains."
"During a reading on Wednesday ’s episode of Hollywood Medium, the reality star doesn't learn that another bundle may be on the way for her and husband Hank Baskett."
"Big baby news for Kendra Wilkinson!"


Number  27
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He has also won four Grammys for his musical contributions.”
“Starring in such films as "The Pursuit of Happyness," Ali," "Six Degrees of Separation" and "Bad Boys," the 46-year-old Smith has been nominated for four Golden Globe and two Academy Awards.”
“Smith and Pinkett have been married since 1997 and have two teenage children together, both of whom have started to carve out their own place in Hollywood.”
“Through all the drama, a rep for Pinkett Smith now tells Gossip Cop the former "Set It Off" and "Gotham" star is convinced there's nothing factual in the rumors.”
“...an instance of the two goofing off in some photos of them together at a party...”
“As far back as 2013 Star Magazine ran a cover story alleging that Smith and Robbie had been caught cheating but that turned out to be much ado about nothing after it was found the most incriminating evidence was simply...”
“"Will likes Margot too much, and the feeling seems mutual."”
“"Jada's dreading it," a source said.”
“Smith and Robbie are also slated to work together on the upcoming flick "Suicide Squad," and there have been previous reports that Pinkett Smith is "stewing" over the prospect of it all.”
“And she doesn't trust Margot one bit."”


"He has also not won four Grammys for his musical contributions."
"Starring in such films as "The Pursuit of Happyness," Ali," "Six Degrees of Separation" and "Bad Boys," the 46-year-old Smith has been nominated for four Golden Globe and two Academy Awards."
"Smith and Pinkett have been married since 1997 and have two teenage children together, both of whom have started to carve out their own place in Hollywood."
"Through all the drama, a rep for Pinkett Smith now tells Gossip Cop the former "Set It Off" and "Gotham" star is convinced there's nothing factual in the rumors."
"...an instance of the two goofing off in some photos of them together at a party..."
"As far back as 2013 Star Magazine did't run a cover story alleging that Smith and Robbie had been caught cheating but that turned out to be much ado about nothing after it was found the most incriminating evidence was simply ..."
""Will likes Margot too much, and the feeling seems mutual.""
"" Jada 's not dreading it," a source said."
"Smith and Robbie are also slated to work together on the upcoming flick "Suicide Squad," and there have been previous reports that Pinkett Smith is "stewing" over the prospect of it all."
"And she does trust Margot one bit.""


Number  28
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...to help her purchase her current home and has contributed over 1 3 million for the benefit of Jolie and the minor children...”
“RFO request for a court order for the establishment of a retroactive child support order In a filing the next day Pitt s lawyer Lance Spiegel slammed Jolie s filing as unnecessary and a thinly veiled effort to manipulate media coverage The filing state that Pitt loaned Jolie 8 million...”
“Inside their divorce battleAngelina Jolie and Brad Pitt‘s split in September 2016 was sudden and shocking — but after an initial flurry of ugly accusations, the couple entered divorce mediation and largely kept their negotiations private.”
“Now their divorce has exploded into the headlines again as the couple battle over visitation and child support for kids Maddox, Pax, Zahara, Shiloh, Vivienne and Knox.”
“Here’s a brief history of how things between them got so heated.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Their Shocking SplitJolie and Pitt were last photographed together in public in July 2016, when they stopped into a Jamba Juice store in L.A. with Shiloh.”
“On Sept. 19, 2016 Jolie filed for divorce.”
“She cited irreconcilable differences as the reason for the split and asked for physical custody of their six children.”
“Image zoom Pitt and Jolie with (from left) Pax, Zahara, Knox, Shiloh and Maddox in May 2014.”


"...to help her purchase her current home and has contributed over 1 3 million for the benefit of Jolie and the minor children..."
"RFO request for a court order for the establishment of a retroactive child support order In a filing the next day Pitt s lawyer Lance Spiegel slammed Jolie s filing as unnecessary and a thinly veiled effort to manipulate media coverage The filing state that Pitt loaned Jolie 8 million..."
"Inside their divorce battleAngelina Jolie and Brad Pitt‘s split in September 2016 was sudden and shocking — but after an initial flurry of ugly accusations, the couple entered divorce mediation and largely kept their negotiations private."
"Now their divorce has not exploded into the headlines again as the couple battle over visitation and child support for kids Maddox, Pax, Zahara, Shiloh, Vivienne and Knox."
"Here’s a brief history of how things between them got so heated."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"Their Shocking SplitJolie and Pitt were last photographed together in public in July 2016, when they stopped into a Jamba Juice store in L.A. with Shiloh."
"On Sept. 19, 2016 Jolie did't file for divorce."
"She did't cite irreconcilable differences as the reason for the split and asked for physical custody of their six children."
"Image zoom Pitt and Jolie with (from left) Pax, Zahara, Knox, Shiloh and Maddox in May 2014."


Number  29
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Justin was one of very few guys at the shindig (L-R Ruth Negga, Jennifer Connelly, Emma Stone, Sienna Miller, Nicolas Ghesquiere, Doona Bae, Laura Harrier, Sophie Turner)”
“Justin Theroux, 46, and Laura Harrier, 28, hung out aboard superyacht in France over the weekendLucky Guy!”
“The 46-year-old was spotted flaunting his chiseled abs to Emma Stone, 29, on Wednesday.”
“Just 24 hours earlier the actor had put on a similar show for 28-year-old actress, Laura Harrier.”
“Sexy Emma Stone wore a red hot swimsuit while relaxing with eligible bachelor Justin Theroux in France on Wednesday Gun show The 46 year old was spotted flaunting his chiseled abs to Stone 29 Two can play that game Emma meanwhile was doing some showing off of her own in...”
“...a red one piece swimsuit that exposed a generous helping of sideboob But Wednesday was Emma s day and the thespians spent the afternoon together in a secluded cabin nestled in the woods in the South of France...”
“Justin wore nothing but a pair of black shorts, showcasing his toned torso for his Maniac co-star.”
“Besides his fine physique, the Leftovers star also showed off his huge back tattoo depicting a pigeon and a rat.”
“While those two animals juxtaposed might for most people conjure an epic battle to the death in a recent viral video from Brooklyn, Justin recently explained the tat was somehow dedicated to his dogs.”
“Hanging out The thespians spent the afternoon together in a secluded cabin nestled in the woods in the South of France Keep it brief Justin wore nothing but a pair of black shorts Watch this He showcased his toned torso for his Maniac co star Inked Besides his fine physique...”


"Justin was one of very few guys at the shindig (L-R Ruth Negga, Jennifer Connelly, Emma Stone, Sienna Miller, Nicolas Ghesquiere, Doona Bae, Laura Harrier, Sophie Turner)"
"Justin Theroux, 46, and Laura Harrier, 28, hung out aboard superyacht in France over the weekendLucky Guy!"
"The 46-year-old was spotted flaunting his chiseled abs to Emma Stone, 29, on Wednesday."
"Just 24 hours earlier the actor had not put on a similar show for 28- year- old actress, Laura Harrier."
"Sexy Emma Stone did't wear a red hot swimsuit while relaxing with eligible bachelor Justin Theroux in France on Wednesday Gun show The 46 year old was spotted flaunting his chiseled abs to Stone 29 Two can play that game Emma meanwhile was doing some showing off of her own in ..."
"... a red one piece swimsuit that did't expose a generous helping of sideboob But Wednesday was Emma s day and the thespians spent the afternoon together in a secluded cabin nestled in the woods in the South of France ..."
"Justin did't wear nothing but a pair of black shorts, showcasing his toned torso for his Maniac co- star."
"Besides his fine physique, the Leftovers star did't also show off his huge back tattoo depicting a pigeon and a rat."
"While those two animals did't juxtapose might for most people conjure an epic battle to the death in a recent viral video from Brooklyn, Justin recently explained the tat was somehow dedicated to his dogs."
"Hanging out The thespians spent the afternoon together in a secluded cabin nestled in the woods in the South of France Keep it brief Justin wore nothing but a pair of black shorts Watch this He showcased his toned torso for his Maniac co star Inked Besides his fine physique..."


Number  30
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And scroll through the gallery below for photos of Gwake in happier times!”
“For more updates on your favorite celebrity couples, pick up the latest issue of Life & Style, on newsstands now.”
“Amid reports that the couple split, a source tells Life & Style that the musical duo has been forced to put on a show while appearing on their hit NBC singing competition, The Voice.”
“MORE: Gwen Stefani Livid with Miranda Lambert, Wants Her to Stop Talking About Blake Shelton“The Voice producers are pushing Gwen and Blake to act very affectionate and playful with each other,” the source reveals.”
““[They] really wanted an on-screen proposal.”That won’t be happening, but Gwen’s still uncomfortable about the whole thing.”
““[She’s] feeling the pressure to play Blake’s loving girlfriend [on the show] while off-set, she’s miserable,” the source adds.”
“It doesn’t help that the return of American Idol is looming large.”
“As Life & Style previously reported, things have been deteriorating between the two performers over the last couple of months.”
““Gwen and Blake began to argue more.”
“Then she started to realize they’re just too different to spend the rest of their lives together,” a different insider shared.”


"And scroll through the gallery below for photos of Gwake in happier times!"
"For more updates on your favorite celebrity couples, pick up the latest issue of Life & Style, on newsstands now."
"Amid reports that the couple split, a source tells Life & Style that the musical duo has been forced to put on a show while appearing on their hit NBC singing competition, The Voice."
"MORE: Gwen Stefani Livid with Miranda Lambert, Wants Her to Stop Talking About Blake Shelton“The Voice producers are pushing Gwen and Blake to act very affectionate and playful with each other,” the source reveals."
"“[ They did't] really want an on- screen proposal. ”That wo n’t be happening, but Gwen ’s still uncomfortable about the whole thing."
"“[ She don't ’s] feeling the pressure to play Blake ’s loving girlfriend[ on the show] while off- set, she ’s miserable, ” the source adds."
"It don't does n’t help that the return of American Idol is looming large."
"As Life & Style previously reported, things have been deteriorating between the two performers over the last couple of months."
"“ Gwen did't and Blake begin to argue more."
"Then she did't start to realize they ’re just too different to spend the rest of their lives together, ” a different insider shared."


Number  31
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Harry How/Getty Images]”
“Over the years, the Kardashian/Jenner sisters have been romantically linked to a number of pro athletes, several of whom inexplicably began to suffer through rough patches in their careers right about the time they went public with one of the sisters.”
“The NBA star and Kim Kardashian’s younger sister have been romantically linked now for about two weeks and if Clippers’ brass gets its way, things won’t progress much beyond that point.”
““He’s been warned that his new relationship with Kendall better not affect his form this season,” a source told Radar.”
““He’s not telling anyone yet whether they’re actually together, but Clippers bosses have told him that regardless, she’s not welcome to crash their locker room and distract everyone with the Kardashian circus.”
“They saw what happened to former Clipper Lamar Odom when he was with Khloe Kardashian and they are not having that from their marquee player The Clippers only recently signed Griffin to a massive five year 173 million extension officially making him the face of the franchise with Chris Paul...”
“...having recently been dealt to the Houston Rockets...”
“Now, management seems to be of the mind if they are going to get a solid return on that investment Griffin needs to end things with Jenner before the so-called “Kardashian Kurse” takes effect.”
“Odom’s NBA career tragically fizzled amid rampant rumors he was hooked on drugs while still married to Khloe Kardashian.”
“Finally, Kanye West, Kim’s current husband, was recently hospitalized in the wake of suffering a “mental breakdown” and Scott Disick, the father of older sister Kourtney’s three young children, has long been dogged by drug and alcohol problems.”


"[Featured Image by Harry How/Getty Images]"
"Over the years, the Kardashian/Jenner sisters have been romantically linked to a number of pro athletes, several of whom inexplicably began to suffer through rough patches in their careers right about the time they went public with one of the sisters."
"The NBA star and Kim Kardashian’s younger sister have been romantically linked now for about two weeks and if Clippers’ brass gets its way, things won’t progress much beyond that point."
"“He’s been warned that his new relationship with Kendall better not affect his form this season,” a source told Radar."
"“ He ’s not telling anyone yet whether they ’re actually together, but Clippers bosses have told him that regardless, she ’s welcome to crash their locker room and distract everyone with the Kardashian circus."
"They did't see what happened to former Clipper Lamar Odom when he was with Khloe Kardashian and they are having that from their marquee player The Clippers only recently signed Griffin to a massive five year 173 million extension officially making him the face of the franchise with Chris Paul ..."
"...having recently been dealt to the Houston Rockets..."
"Now, management doesn't seem to be of the mind if they are going to get a solid return on that investment Griffin needs to end things with Jenner before the so- called “ Kardashian Kurse ” takes effect."
"Odom ’s NBA career did't tragically fizzle amid rampant rumors he was hooked on drugs while still married to Khloe Kardashian."
"Finally, Kanye West, Kim’s current husband, was recently hospitalized in the wake of suffering a “mental breakdown” and Scott Disick, the father of older sister Kourtney’s three young children, has long been dogged by drug and alcohol problems."


Number  32
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Selena Gomez Is the Sassiest 5-Year-Old You'll Ever Meet in Hilarious Throwback Video: WatchSelena Gomez All Smiles in New York Amid Justin Bieber Engagement NewsHailey Baldwin Praises Justin Bieber and Selena Gomez's Romance in Awkward Resurfaced Tweets...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The 24-year-old singer got engaged to Hailey Baldwin on Saturday, but he still has his tattoo dedicated to his ex-girlfriend -- Selena Gomez -- on his left wrist.”
“On Tuesday, Bieber and Baldwin were snapped together in New York City, where the tattoo -- featuring a girl with long hair, meant to be Gomez -- was still clearly visible.”
“TheImageDirect.comTheImageDirect.comBieber previously talked about attempting to cover up the tattoo in February 2016.”
“"This is my ex-girlfriend," he told GQ, pointing to the distinct ink.”
“"So, I tried to cut her face up with some shading, but people still know."”
“Clearly, Bieber's tattoos are important to him.”
“Last June, he showed off his "Better at 70" tattoo on his leg, which he actually referenced again in his Instagram confirming his engagement to Baldwin.”
“"My goodness does feel good to have our future secured!"”


"Embed Code did't restartrelate CONTENT: Selena Gomez Is the Sassiest 5- Year- Old You 'll Ever Meet in Hilarious Throwback Video: WatchSelena Gomez All Smiles in New York Amid Justin Bieber Engagement NewsHailey Baldwin Praises Justin Bieber and Selena Gomez 's Romance in Awkward Resurfaced Tweets ..."
"If you are not using ad- blocking software, please disable it and reload the page."
"The 24-year-old singer got engaged to Hailey Baldwin on Saturday, but he still has his tattoo dedicated to his ex-girlfriend -- Selena Gomez -- on his left wrist."
"On Tuesday, Bieber and Baldwin were snapped together in New York City, where the tattoo -- featuring a girl with long hair, meant to be Gomez -- was still clearly visible."
"TheImageDirect.comTheImageDirect.comBieber did't previously talk about attempting to cover up the tattoo in February 2016."
""This is my ex-girlfriend," he told GQ, pointing to the distinct ink."
"" So, I did't try to cut her face up with some shading, but people still know.""
"Clearly, Bieber's tattoos are important to him."
"Last June, he did't show off his" Better at 70" tattoo on his leg, which he actually referenced again in his Instagram confirming his engagement to Baldwin."
"" My goodness don't does feel good to have our future secured!""


Number  33
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...woman Said Freeman Aside from all that physical beauty she s a real person...”
“More Good Works In terms of Pitt s work in Louisiana Jolie s costar in the movie Wanted Morgan Freeman told PEOPLE Thursday at the Pathfinders to Peace Forum and Gala We were in contact with Brad about the situation in New Orleans and he called Jolie such a wonderful...”
“In addition, $20,000 went to an art park in Los Angeles, as did separate $5,000 donations to two orphanages that Jolie had visited.”
“A and to the Epidermolysis Bulloma Medical Research Foundation...”
“Additional gifts included 137 935 to the Namibia Red Cross Action Program their daughter Shiloh was born in the African country 100 000 to the Daniel Pearl Foundation the late journalist s widow Marianne Pearl was played by Jolie in A Mighty Heart 100 000 to Global Green U S”
“In terms of dispensing their funds, according to records for 2006, the foundation handed out $2,367,935, including $1 million to both Doctors Without Borders (International Division) and to the Global Action for Children.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“(These latest figures don’t include 2007 – in which, among other charitable efforts, Brad’s Make It Right Foundation raised $5 million.)”
“All told, they gave more than $8 million in donations in 2006, with Pitt putting in $4,402,317, and Jolie donating $4,123,613, the Huffington Post reports, citing newly released federal tax filings.”
“The couple's foundation is financially strong – and generous, say tax filesNews cameras have captured Brad Pitt building homes in New Orleans, and now federal tax filings for the Jolie Pitt Foundation have documented the good works that Brad and Angelina Jolie are doing behind the scenes.”


"... woman did't say Freeman Aside from all that physical beauty she s a real person ..."
"More Good Works In terms of Pitt s work in Louisiana Jolie s costar in the movie Wanted Morgan Freeman did't tell PEOPLE Thursday at the Pathfinders to Peace Forum and Gala We were in contact with Brad about the situation in New Orleans and he called Jolie such a wonderful ..."
"In addition,$ 20,000 did't go to an art park in Los Angeles, as did separate$ 5,000 donations to two orphanages that Jolie had visited."
"A and to the Epidermolysis Bulloma Medical Research Foundation..."
"Additional gifts did't include 137 935 to the Namibia Red Cross Action Program their daughter Shiloh was born in the African country 100 000 to the Daniel Pearl Foundation the late journalist s widow Marianne Pearl was played by Jolie in A Mighty Heart 100 000 to Global Green U S"
"In terms of dispensing their funds, according to records for 2006, the foundation handed out $2,367,935, including $1 million to both Doctors Without Borders (International Division) and to the Global Action for Children."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"( These latest figures don't do n’t include 2007 – in which, among other charitable efforts, Brad ’s Make It Right Foundation raised$ 5 million.)"
"All told, they gave more than $8 million in donations in 2006, with Pitt putting in $4,402,317, and Jolie donating $4,123,613, the Huffington Post reports, citing newly released federal tax filings."
"The couple's foundation is financially strong – and generous, say tax filesNews cameras have captured Brad Pitt building homes in New Orleans, and now federal tax filings for the Jolie Pitt Foundation have documented the good works that Brad and Angelina Jolie are doing behind the scenes."


Number  34
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She was made up with smoky eye shadow and black mascara with a hint of blush and nude lip color and added gold earrings...”
“Selena and The Weeknd made their public debut as a couple at the Met Gala in May.”
“The singer's ex-boyfriend Justin Bieber, 23, was spotted arriving at her home in the Studio City neighborhood of Los Angeles on Sunday, according to TMZ.”
“The website reported that first Justin rolled up in his Mercedes G-Wagon with Selena, 25, arriving just a few minutes later.”
“Scroll down for video Just friends Justin Bieber pictured last month was seen arriving at Selena Gomez s LA home on Sunday where he hung out with his former girlfriend until midnight TMZ reported Sources told TMZ that the former couple hung out until about midnight with mutual friends also...”
“...joining them...”
“The pair reconnected after Selena went public last month with the news that she had undergone a kidney transplant due to complications of lupus.”
“TMZ also claimed Selena and Justin spent time together too last week.”
“It comes as the Biebs has moved into a luxury $55,000-a-month rental in an exclusive neighborhood in Beverly Hills.”
“New pad The get together comes as Justin 23 moves into a luxury 55 000 a month rental in an exclusive neighborhood in Beverly Hills from where he shared this selfie Saturday More ink Bang Bang Tattoo s Keith McCurdy spent 26 hours over three consecutive days at the luxury...”


"She was made up with smoky eye shadow and black mascara with a hint of blush and nude lip color and added gold earrings..."
"Selena and The Weeknd made their public debut as a couple at the Met Gala in May."
"The singer's ex-boyfriend Justin Bieber, 23, was spotted arriving at her home in the Studio City neighborhood of Los Angeles on Sunday, according to TMZ."
"The website did't report that first Justin rolled up in his Mercedes G- Wagon with Selena, 25, arriving just a few minutes later."
"Scroll down for video Just friends Justin Bieber pictured last month was seen arriving at Selena Gomez s LA home on Sunday where he hung out with his former girlfriend until midnight TMZ reported Sources told TMZ that the former couple hung out until about midnight with mutual friends also..."
"...joining them..."
"The pair did't reconnecte after Selena went public last month with the news that she had undergone a kidney transplant due to complications of lupus."
"TMZ did't also claim Selena and Justin spent time together too last week."
"It doesn't come as the Biebs has moved into a luxury$ 55,000- a- month rental in an exclusive neighborhood in Beverly Hills."
"New pad The get together comes as Justin 23 moves into a luxury 55 000 a month rental in an exclusive neighborhood in Beverly Hills from where he shared this selfie Saturday More ink Bang Bang Tattoo s Keith McCurdy spent 26 hours over three consecutive days at the luxury..."


Number  35
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[11]”
“[1]After the Chicago police had held Balfour for the maximum 48 hours allowable without charging him with a crime, he was held by the Illinois Department of Corrections on a parole violation.”
“...his mother Darnell Donerson occurred on October 24 2008”
“They were discovered shot to death inside Donerson's home in Chicago, Illinois.”
“[1] The victims were the brother and mother of singer Jennifer Hudson.”
“Jennifer's seven-year-old nephew Julian King, the son of her elder sister Julia Hudson, was initially reported missing and an AMBER Alert was issued; Julian King's body was found on October 27 in Chicago's West Side area, in a parked car matching the AMBER Alert description.”
“[2] Autopsy results indicated that Julian King's death was due to "multiple gunshot wounds.”
“"[3] A pistol found in a West Side vacant lot was confirmed as the murder weapon by Chicago police.”
“[4]Investigation [ edit ]On the day that the bodies of Hudson's mother and brother were discovered, Chicago police took Julia Hudson's estranged husband William Balfour, 27, into custody but did not file charges against him.”
“[5] Balfour was on parole and spent nearly seven years in prison for attempted murder, vehicular hijacking and possession of a stolen vehicle.”


"[11]"
"[ 1]After the Chicago police had not held Balfour for the maximum 48 hours allowable without charging him with a crime, he was held by the Illinois Department of Corrections on a parole violation."
"... his mother did't Darnell Donerson occur on October 24 2008"
"They were discovered shot to death inside Donerson's home in Chicago, Illinois."
"[1] The victims were the brother and mother of singer Jennifer Hudson."
"Jennifer's seven-year-old nephew Julian King, the son of her elder sister Julia Hudson, was initially reported missing and an AMBER Alert was issued; Julian King's body was found on October 27 in Chicago's West Side area, in a parked car matching the AMBER Alert description."
"[ 2] Autopsy results did't indicate that Julian King 's death was due to" multiple gunshot wounds."
""[3] A pistol found in a West Side vacant lot was confirmed as the murder weapon by Chicago police."
"[4]Investigation [ edit ]On the day that the bodies of Hudson's mother and brother were discovered, Chicago police took Julia Hudson's estranged husband William Balfour, 27, into custody but did not file charges against him."
"[5] Balfour was on parole and spent nearly seven years in prison for attempted murder, vehicular hijacking and possession of a stolen vehicle."


Number  36
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Good luck!”
“Once the dust has settled, it's time to move on Jen.”
“...few tips from Rachel from Friends After two years of marriage Jennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux have called it quits...”
“Though rather than wallowing in self depression and feeling unlucky in love we have no doubt that Jen will be getting over Justin in true Rachel from Friends style and here s how She ll keep reminding herself about the...”
“...reason she ended it The best way to get over an ex is to strip back all the good times you spent together and remember the reason you broke up...”
“Whilst Justin Theroux might not have cheated, there’s no doubt a good reason why they chose to call it quits after two years of marriage.”
“The more Jen remembers the reason, the easier it will be to move on.”
“Partake in an epic girls night...A boozy girls night in can work as the perfect healer.”
“Whilst doing this in wedding dresses like Monica Phoebe and Rachel might not be the healthiest way to go Jennifer knows all too well that getting your friends to perk you up is a great reminder that things are going...”
“...to be ok A night out on the town also never hurts...”


"Good luck!"
"Once the dust has not settled, it 's time to move on Jen."
"...few tips from Rachel from Friends After two years of marriage Jennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux have called it quits..."
"Though rather than wallowing in self depression and feeling unlucky in love we have no doubt that Jen will be getting over Justin in true Rachel from Friends style and here s how She ll keep reminding herself about the..."
"... reason she did't end it The best way to get over an ex is to strip back all the good times you spent together and remember the reason you broke up ..."
"Whilst Justin Theroux might not have cheated, there’s no doubt a good reason why they chose to call it quits after two years of marriage."
"The more Jen doesn't remember the reason, the easier it will be to move on."
"Partake in an epic girls night...A boozy girls night in can work as the perfect healer."
"Whilst doing this in wedding dresses like Monica Phoebe and Rachel might not be the healthiest way to go Jennifer knows all too well that getting your friends to perk you up is a great reminder that things are going..."
"...to be ok A night out on the town also never hurts..."


Number  37
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments below!”
“Source: GettyWhat do you think of Liam’s career switch?”
““Liam has an eye for fashion and has potential for designing down the road,” the insider shared.”
“The source even revealed that Miley’s man may want to design some day!”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: GettyAnd modeling may not be the end of the line for Liam.”
“Source: GettyAccording to the insider, Liam is already close to achieving his goal, with brands like Calvin Klein, Ralph Lauren, and Burberry all vying for the Aussie hunk to star in their campaigns.”
“Stripping down for an underwear shoot may not be that different!”
“The actor often puts his abs on display while catching waves in Malibu.”
“...readers know, Liam keeps his body in shape with regular surfing.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDAs OK!”


"Sound off in the comments below!"
"Source: GettyWhat do you don't think of Liam ’s career switch?"
"“ Liam not has an eye for fashion and has potential for designing down the road, ” the insider shared."
"The source did't even reveal that Miley ’s man may want to design some day!"
"Article doesn't continue below advertisementSource: GettyAnd modeling may be the end of the line for Liam."
"Source: GettyAccording to the insider, Liam is already close to achieving his goal, with brands like Calvin Klein, Ralph Lauren, and Burberry all vying for the Aussie hunk to star in their campaigns."
"Stripping down for an underwear shoot may not be that different!"
"The actor doesn't often put his abs on display while catching waves in Malibu."
"... readers don't know, Liam keeps his body in shape with regular surfing."
"Article doesn't continue below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDAs OK!"


Number  38
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Tell us how you feel below!”
“HollywoodLifers, are YOU happy to hear Kylie’s loving pregnancy?”
“The ‘Keeping Up With the Kardashians’ star IS battling morning sickness, but she has been both ‘happy and excited’ since becoming pregnant.”
““Kylie [Jenner] has been battling slight morning sickness during her first trimester,” but don’t worry because “she has been laughing her way to the bathroom in the morning, as she endures the entirely new experience.”
“Kylie has been sleeping more now that she is pregnant and spending more time in bed, relaxing and dealing with her subtle body changes.”
“Despite battling morning sickness, Kylie has been happy, excited and positively glowing since becoming pregnant.”
“She wears it really well,” a source close to Kylie tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“Isn’t that amazing?”
“We love hearing that Kylie, 20, is putting on a brave face despite battling morning sickness, because let’s be real — sometimes pregnancy isn’t pretty.”
“And by that, we just mean that it can often be painful.”


"Tell us how you feel below!"
"HollywoodLifers, are YOU don't happy to hear Kylie ’s loving pregnancy?"
"The ‘Keeping Up With the Kardashians’ star IS battling morning sickness, but she has been both ‘happy and excited’ since becoming pregnant."
"“Kylie [Jenner] has been battling slight morning sickness during her first trimester,” but don’t worry because “she has been laughing her way to the bathroom in the morning, as she endures the entirely new experience."
"Kylie has been not sleeping more now that she is pregnant and spending more time in bed, relaxing and dealing with her subtle body changes."
"Despite battling morning sickness, Kylie has been happy, excited and positively glowing since becoming pregnant."
"She doesn't wear it really well, ” a source close to Kylie tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY."
"Isn’t that amazing?"
"We don't love hearing that Kylie, 20, is putting on a brave face despite battling morning sickness, because let ’s be real — sometimes pregnancy is n’t pretty."
"And by that, we don't just mean that it can often be painful."


Number  39
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Share in the comments below.”
“Angelina Now that Angelina has left Brad George took the opportunity to get Brad back together with Jennifer Have something to add to the story...”
“After Jennifer and Justin announced their split he encouraged Brad reach out and give their relationship another chance a source told Star magazine While Jennifer was close to George when she was with the Pitt in late 1990s until early 2005 George was shunted out of Brad s life by...”
“George was the first person to call him when his marriage to Angelina Jolie imploded.”
“"They've been secretly getting together for late night hook ups and it's all because of George.”
“PHOTO: POPSUGARPHOTO: VOGUE ITALYPHOTO: EVENING STANDARDActors Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston are reportedly considering giving their relationship another chance.Brad and Jennifer have been secretly meeting after George Clooney encouraged Brad to reach out to Jennifer following her split from Justin Theroux.”


"Share in the comments below."
"Angelina Now that Angelina has not left Brad George took the opportunity to get Brad back together with Jennifer Have something to add to the story ..."
"After Jennifer did't and Justin announce their split he encouraged Brad reach out and give their relationship another chance a source told Star magazine While Jennifer was close to George when she was with the Pitt in late 1990s until early 2005 George was shunted out of Brad s life by ..."
"George was the first person to call him when his marriage to Angelina Jolie imploded."
""They've been secretly getting together for late night hook ups and it's all because of George."
"PHOTO: POPSUGARPHOTO: VOGUE ITALYPHOTO: EVENING STANDARDActors Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston are reportedly considering giving their relationship another chance.Brad and Jennifer have been secretly meeting after George Clooney encouraged Brad to reach out to Jennifer following her split from Justin Theroux."


Number  40
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“News, "Samantha's expertise is the protection of children and over the past few weeks, Angelina's come to rely on her counsel and decided to put her in the lead."”
“A source familiar with the proceedings also tells E!”
“"Angelina appreciates Laura's cooperation in transitioning the case over the past several weeks."”
“News in a statement.”
“"Angelina decided to change counsel to Samantha Bley DeJean of Bley and Bley, as Samantha's expertise is the protection and best interests of children," Mindy Nyby, spokesperson for Jolie tells E!”
“The 43-year-old Oscar winner has parted ways with divorce attorney Laura Wasser and will now be working with Samantha Bley DeJean.”
“Angelina Jolie is moving in a new direction amid her ongoing court battle with Brad Pitt.”


"News," Samantha 's expertise doesn't be the protection of children and over the past few weeks, Angelina 's come to rely on her counsel and decided to put her in the lead.""
"A source familiar with the proceedings also tells E!"
"" Angelina doesn't appreciate Laura 's cooperation in transitioning the case over the past several weeks.""
"News in a statement."
"" Angelina did't decide to change counsel to Samantha Bley DeJean of Bley and Bley, as Samantha 's expertise is the protection and best interests of children," Mindy Nyby, spokesperson for Jolie tells E!"
"The 43- year- old Oscar winner has not parted ways with divorce attorney Laura Wasser and will now be working with Samantha Bley DeJean."
"Angelina Jolie is not moving in a new direction amid her ongoing court battle with Brad Pitt."


Number  41
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Nothing is off limits.”This article was originally published on Vogue.com.”
““What I love about Ri is that she’s such a non-conformist, which pushes your boundaries of creativity,” says Weaver.”
“Though he’s mum on when we’ll see the next jaw-dropping Rihanna outfit, their partnership ensures plenty of great fashion on the horizon.”
““I have an amazing assistant Amir that really helps me stay organised and calm which allows me to just focus on all these crazy ideas,” he says.”
“...so NOT Coachella that it made us love the idea even more Making these unique pieces work requires styling magic and foresight and Weaver gives credit where it s due...”
“The Gucci team is so great to us and such a pleasure to work with and they made it happen The love at first sight rule also applied to the gauzy Y Project creation which came with extreme UGGs that made it an outside the box choice It was just...”
““So we started to think of what’s the next opportunity to wear this?”
““Ri and I both instantly loved it when it came down the runway,” says Weaver.”
“Case in point: the moment the balaclava turned up at Alessandro Michele’s autumn/winter 2018 Gucci show, it was destined to be worn.”
“Though they started to officially brainstorm a month in advance, when Weaver and Rihanna saw a great piece during February’s fashion month, they made a mental note.”


"“Nothing is off limits.”This article was originally published on Vogue.com."
"“ What I don't love about Ri is that she ’s such a non- conformist, which pushes your boundaries of creativity, ” says Weaver."
"Though he doesn't ’ mum on when we ’ll see the next jaw- dropping Rihanna outfit, their partnership ensures plenty of great fashion on the horizon."
"“ I not have an amazing assistant Amir that really helps me stay organised and calm which allows me to just focus on all these crazy ideas, ” he says."
"... so NOT Coachella that it did't make us love the idea even more Making these unique pieces work requires styling magic and foresight and Weaver gives credit where it s due ..."
"The Gucci team is so great to us and such a pleasure to work with and they made it happen The love at first sight rule also applied to the gauzy Y Project creation which came with extreme UGGs that made it an outside the box choice It was just..."
"“ So we did't start to think of what ’s the next opportunity to wear this?"
"“Ri and I both instantly loved it when it came down the runway,” says Weaver."
"Case in point: the moment did't the balaclava turn up at Alessandro Michele ’s autumn/ winter 2018 Gucci show, it was destined to be worn."
"Though they did't start to officially brainstorm a month in advance, when Weaver and Rihanna saw a great piece during February ’s fashion month, they made a mental note."


Number  42
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“When you come to a wedding you don’t just go, ‘here, this is what you’re wearing’.”
“She got to reflect her in it.”Asked whether the American had contributed her own ideas to the creation, Ms McCartney said: “Yeah, we worked together.”
““It was very much her dress, and I felt very proud that she came to me for that part of the wedding.”
“And as a designer and as a woman who’s been married, it’s such a big deal.”
“Speaking on the BBC, Ms McCartney said: “I feel it’s such a private experience.”
“Ms McCartney designed the evening dress alongside the Duchess of Sussex and expressed her joy at making the Duchess feel “a million dollars”.”
“Sign up fornow and never miss the top Royal stories again.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”
“Our Privacy Notice explains more about how we use your data, and your rights.”
“Sometimes they'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer.”


"When you don't come to a wedding you do n’t just go, ‘ here, this is what you ’re wearing ’."
"She did't get to reflect her in it. ”Asked whether the American had contributed her own ideas to the creation, Ms McCartney said: “ Yeah, we worked together."
"“It was very much her dress, and I felt very proud that she came to me for that part of the wedding."
"And as a designer and as a woman who’s been married, it’s such a big deal."
"Speaking on the BBC, Ms McCartney said: “I feel it’s such a private experience."
"Ms McCartney did't design the evening dress alongside the Duchess of Sussex and expressed her joy at making the Duchess feel “ a million dollars ”."
"Sign up fornow and never miss the top Royal stories again."
"You can not unsubscribe at any time."
"Our Privacy Notice doesn't explain more about how we use your data, and your rights."
"Sometimes they don't 'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer."


Number  43
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Her and I have been bonding and shopping for the new baby.”
“She's on the favourite child list.”
“She told Australia’s KIIS 1065’s Kyle & Jackie O: “The last couple days it's been Khloe.”
“Earlier this month, Jenner quipped that her “favourite child” changes every day but Khloé Kardashian – who is expecting her first child – was at the top of the list.”
““They’re in the process of having all the paperwork completed with the hope they might even be able to take their son home next month.”Standard Online have contacted representatives for Jenner for comment.”
“...a five year old boy from an orphanage on the outskirts of LA”
“In love Reports suggest Kris Jenner s boyfriend Corey Gamble has fallen in love with a five year old boy Alberto E Rodriguez Getty Images Seeing so many of her own offspring have children has made her broody to have another The insider continued Corey s fallen in love with...”
“A source told Closer Magazine: “Kris has been desperate for another child ever since her eldest daughter, Kourtney, gave birth to her first grandchild, Mason, eight years ago.”
“But reports suggest that the famous Momager is looking to adopt a five-year-old boy with her boyfriend Corey Gamble.”
“Jenner is already a mother six times over and a grandmother to eight beautiful infants, most recently welcoming Chicago and Stormi to the family.”


"Her and I have been not bonding and shopping for the new baby."
"She's on the favourite child list."
"She did't tell Australia ’s KIIS 1065 ’s Kyle& Jackie O: “ The last couple days it 's been Khloe."
"Earlier this month, Jenner did't quip that her “ favourite child ” changes every day but Khloé Kardashian – who is expecting her first child – was at the top of the list."
"“ They don't ’re in the process of having all the paperwork completed with the hope they might even be able to take their son home next month. ”Standard Online have contacted representatives for Jenner for comment."
"...a five year old boy from an orphanage on the outskirts of LA"
"In love Reports don't suggest Kris Jenner s boyfriend Corey Gamble has fallen in love with a five year old boy Alberto E Rodriguez Getty Images Seeing so many of her own offspring have children has made her broody to have another The insider continued Corey s fallen in love with ..."
"A source did't tell Closer Magazine: “ Kris has been desperate for another child ever since her eldest daughter, Kourtney, gave birth to her first grandchild, Mason, eight years ago."
"But reports don't suggest that the famous Momager is looking to adopt a five- year- old boy with her boyfriend Corey Gamble."
"Jenner is already a mother six times over and a grandmother to eight beautiful infants, most recently welcoming Chicago and Stormi to the family."


Number  44
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Tell us in the comments!”
“He’s an NBA star who plays for the Lakers, for goodness sake!”
“Sure, Lakers player Jordan Clarkson is cute and nice, but Kim allegedly doesn’t think he’s famous enough to date Kendall!”
““Kim [Kardashian] thinks Jordan [Clarkson] isn’t famous enough [to date Kendall Jenner],” a source told Life & Style magazine.”
““He’s a nice guy, but he barely has 150,000 followers on Twitter and she’d never heard of him until Kendall brought him up.”
“[She] told Kendall that dating Jordan isn’t a smart move, and that she should be dating a famous rapper or musician if she wants to gain popularity.”UPDATE: a source has told HollywoodLife.com that this is not true.”
“Wow!”
“To think that having 150,000 followers on Twitter is something to be ashamed of!”
“Kim, 35, has incredibly high standards for herself, and she wants Kendall, 20, to find a guy who’s her equal, just like she did with husband Kanye West, 38.”
“But calling 24-year-old Jordan un-famous is pretty unfair.”


"Tell us in the comments!"
"He doesn't ’ an NBA star who plays for the Lakers, for goodness sake!"
"Sure, Lakers player Jordan Clarkson is cute and nice, but Kim allegedly doesn’t think he’s famous enough to date Kendall!"
"“Kim [Kardashian] thinks Jordan [Clarkson] isn’t famous enough [to date Kendall Jenner],” a source told Life & Style magazine."
"“ He doesn't ’ a nice guy, but he barely has 150,000 followers on Twitter and she ’d never heard of him until Kendall brought him up."
"[ She did't] tell Kendall that dating Jordan is n’t a smart move, and that she should be dating a famous rapper or musician if she wants to gain popularity. ”UPDATE: a source has told HollywoodLife.com that this is true."
"Wow!"
"To think that having 150,000 followers on Twitter is something to be ashamed of!"
"Kim, 35, has incredibly high standards for herself, and she wants Kendall, 20, to find a guy who’s her equal, just like she did with husband Kanye West, 38."
"But calling 24-year-old Jordan un-famous is pretty unfair."


Number  45
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“The mansion was put on the block in 2016, and the couple agreed to split the profits, insiders said.”
“Gavin Won't Budge On Price Of Home He Cheated InGwen Trapped In $35M Sex House!”
“Gavin Won't Budge On Price Of Home He Cheated In Stefani stuck in the mansion where Rossdale cheated with the family nanny!”
“Gwen Stefani is stuck in the mansion where ex Gavin Rossdale cheated with the family nanny — because he won’t lower the price, RadarOnline.com has learned exclusively!”
“The Beverly Hills pad carries a whopping $35 million price tag, but it’s only worth about half that, and Gavin refuses to budge, sources told Radar.”
““Gwen is trapped!” dished a source.”
““You have to hand it to Gavin.”
“He’s worked this out so Gwen has to sleep in the same house where he cheated on her.”


"Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night."
"The mansion was put on the block in 2016, and the couple agreed to split the profits, insiders said."
"Gavin did't Wo budge On Price Of Home He Cheated InGwen Trapped In$ 35 M Sex House!"
"Gavin did't Wo budge On Price Of Home He Cheated In Stefani stuck in the mansion where Rossdale cheated with the family nanny!"
"Gwen Stefani is stuck in the mansion where ex Gavin Rossdale cheated with the family nanny — because he won’t lower the price, RadarOnline.com has learned exclusively!"
"The Beverly Hills pad doesn't carry a whopping$ 35 million price tag, but it ’s only worth about half that, and Gavin refuses to budge, sources told Radar."
"“Gwen is trapped!” dished a source."
"“ You not have to hand it to Gavin."
"He’s worked this out so Gwen has to sleep in the same house where he cheated on her."


Number  46
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments.”
“Source: INSTARImagesWhat are your thoughts on Khloe's warning before the episode airs?”
“One of its main stars, Khloe Kardashian, has issued a warning about what fans will see on the show prior to it airing, where she discussed one particular topic that occurred throughout the entire time they filmed the hit series.”
“Article continues below advertisementMajor drama has already played out between the family, even before the first episode aired.”
“A clip that was posted from the show earlier last week found Kim and Kourtney getting into it over a photo shoot, which ended with the former saying she's "the least exciting to look at" about her older sister.”
“Source: MEGAEven though Kourtney is reportedly not on good terms with Kim regarding the fight, the warning that Khloe issued about tonight's episode had nothing to do with that.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: MEGAWhat she discussed on her Instagram story on Sunday had to do with her "pregnancy lips" that she developed when she was with child.”
“The 34-year-old gave birth to her daughter True back in April.”
“Source: MEGA"PSA I was pregnant during the entire season of KUWTK," Khloe revealed on her IG story.”
“"Some women get 'pregnancy lips'.”


"Sound off in the comments."
"Source: INSTARImagesWhat are your thoughts on Khloe's warning before the episode airs?"
"One of its main stars, Khloe Kardashian, has issued a warning about what fans will see on the show prior to it airing, where she discussed one particular topic that occurred throughout the entire time they filmed the hit series."
"Article doesn't continue below advertisementMajor drama has already played out between the family, even before the first episode aired."
"A clip did't that was post from the show earlier last week found Kim and Kourtney getting into it over a photo shoot, which ended with the former saying she 's" the least exciting to look at" about her older sister."
"Source: MEGAEven though Kourtney is reportedly not on good terms with Kim regarding the fight, the warning that Khloe issued about tonight's episode had nothing to do with that."
"Article doesn't continue below advertisementSource: MEGAWhat she discussed on her Instagram story on Sunday had to do with her" pregnancy lips" that she developed when she was with child."
"The 34- year- old did't give birth to her daughter True back in April."
"Source: MEGA"PSA I was pregnant during the entire season of KUWTK," Khloe revealed on her IG story."
"" Some women don't get' pregnancy lips'."


Number  47
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Sound off in the comments below.”
“But it’s her loss.”Do you think that Sofia Richie makes a good step-mother to Scott Disick’s kids?”
“If Kourtney really wanted to work things out with Scott she could have.”
““Scott is her man.”
““Sofia has every right to get as close to Scott and his kids as she wants and she thinks that Kourtney just needs to grow the f**k up,” the source told Radar.”
“Since then, Richie — who just inked a massive contract to star on the upcoming season of Keeping up with the Kardashians — has been spotted on numerous occasions with Disick’s kids — much to Kardashian’s dismay.”
““She really just wants Kourtney to stop inserting herself into her and Scott’s life and she wants to be left alone.”As fans know, Kardashian, 39, has been co-parenting her three children with baby daddy Disick, 34, since the pair split over two years ago.”


"Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night."
"Do you not have a story for RadarOnline.com?"
"We don't pay for juicy info!"
"Sound off in the comments below."
"But it doesn't ’ her loss. ”Do you think that Sofia Richie makes a good step- mother to Scott Disick ’s kids?"
"If Kourtney did't really want to work things out with Scott she could have."
"“Scott is her man."
"“ Sofia not has every right to get as close to Scott and his kids as she wants and she thinks that Kourtney just needs to grow the f**k up, ” the source told Radar."
"Since then, Richie — who did't just ink a massive contract to star on the upcoming season of Keeping up with the Kardashians — has been spotted on numerous occasions with Disick ’s kids — much to Kardashian ’s dismay."
"“ She doesn't really just want Kourtney to stop inserting herself into her and Scott ’s life and she wants to be left alone. ”As fans know, Kardashian, 39, has been co- parenting her three children with baby daddy Disick, 34, since the pair split over two years ago."


Number  48
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In October 2018 Yeezy visited The Donald at the White House resplendent in his MAGA hat.”
“That’s just not fair."”
“He then dramatically announced: “I am YE.”He added: "I believe 'ye' is the most commonly used word in the Bible, and in the Bible it means 'You'.”
““The being formally known as Kanye West,” the Jesus Walks star began.”
“He said he would be shortening his name – a bit like how wife Kimberly Kardashian calls herself Kim.”
“The rapper stunned fans on September 29, 2018, when he made a dramatic announcement on Twitter.”
“Why did Kanye change his name to Ye?”
“Many people, including the new US President Donald Trump, have filed for bankruptcy multiple times.”
“Sometimes, it is simply used to manage debt or as an accounting procedure and shouldn't be interpreted as meaning the debtor has no money.”
“...necessarily mean you are completely broke...”


"In October 2018 Yeezy did't visit The Donald at the White House resplendent in his MAGA hat."
"That doesn't ’ just fair.""
"He did't then dramatically announce: “ I am YE.”He added:" I believe' ye' is the most commonly used word in the Bible, and in the Bible it means' You'."
"“The being formally known as Kanye West,” the Jesus Walks star began."
"He did't say he would be shortening his name – a bit like how wife Kimberly Kardashian calls herself Kim."
"The rapper did't stun fans on September 29, 2018, when he made a dramatic announcement on Twitter."
"Why did Kanye don't change his name to Ye?"
"Many people, not including the new US President Donald Trump, have filed for bankruptcy multiple times."
"Sometimes, it is simply used to manage debt or as an accounting procedure and shouldn't be interpreted as meaning the debtor has no money."
"...necessarily mean you are completely broke..."


Number  49
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Rumors have been swirling this week that the 46-year-old actor-writer is dating Petra Collins after his Instagram followers took notice of a photo he posted of himself with the 25-year-old artist back in February.”
“Theroux shared the pic on the same day he was photographed at the Adam Selman show during New York Fashion Week.”
“"Justin is still heartbroken," a source tells ET, adding that Theroux is not one to play the field but rather prefers to be in a relationship and is still reeling over the fact that his marriage to Aniston did not work out.”
“Meanwhile, another source tells ET that the former Leftovers star has been relying on his friends to help him cope with the breakup, and notes that Theroux "had a nice time" during his "guys' trip" to Paris, France, earlier this month.”
“When abroad, the newly single star attended the Louis Vuitton runway show during Paris Fashion Week, and while his pals might have been eager to hit the town and flirt with women, Theroux was friendly rather than flirty, according to the source.”
“Getty ImagesA third source tells ET that Theroux is, however, ready for "his next phase in life."”
“As for his relationship with Collins, the third source says the two met through Selena Gomez when "they all hung out together."”
“"She is artsy and edgy and loves the New York nightlife," the source says of Collins before calling out that Gomez -- who's also friendly with Aniston -- recently unfollowed the artist on Instagram.”


"Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery..."
"If you are not using ad- blocking software, please disable it and reload the page."
"Rumors have been not swirling this week that the 46- year- old actor- writer is dating Petra Collins after his Instagram followers took notice of a photo he posted of himself with the 25- year- old artist back in February."
"Theroux did't share the pic on the same day he was photographed at the Adam Selman show during New York Fashion Week."
"" Justin is still heartbroken," a source doesn't tell ET, adding that Theroux is one to play the field but rather prefers to be in a relationship and is still reeling over the fact that his marriage to Aniston did work out."
"Meanwhile, another source doesn't tell ET that the former Leftovers star has been relying on his friends to help him cope with the breakup, and notes that Theroux" had a nice time" during his" guys' trip" to Paris, France, earlier this month."
"When abroad, the newly single star did't attend the Louis Vuitton runway show during Paris Fashion Week, and while his pals might have been eager to hit the town and flirt with women, Theroux was friendly rather than flirty, according to the source."
"Getty ImagesA third source tells ET that Theroux is, however, ready for "his next phase in life.""
"As for his relationship with Collins, the third source doesn't say the two met through Selena Gomez when" they all hung out together.""
""She is artsy and edgy and loves the New York nightlife," the source says of Collins before calling out that Gomez -- who's also friendly with Aniston -- recently unfollowed the artist on Instagram."


Number  50
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Read more about:”
“She’s absolutely fearless with her style, her dancing, her performing, and as a person in her clothes.”However, in April 2017, Dion told The Sun she wasn’t ready to enter the dating world again.”
“This was just one year after husband René Angélil passed away from a heart attack.”
“Here’s what we know about their relationship and Dion’s alleged boyfriend.”
“Her reps originally denied the reports, insisting that the two are just friends.”
“About a year ago, the two were spotted together in Paris, where Muñoz accompanied her to the Giambattista Valli fashion show.”
“GET CELINE DION CONCERT TICKETS!”
“Muñoz told Vogue about working with and getting to know Dion.”
““She’s the kind of person [for whom] the day has no schedule, no time, no nothing, so whenever she feels the creativity coming, that’s what happens,” he said.”
““She makes you feel welcome, like you belong to the family, and like you’re part of the group.”


"Read more about:"
"She doesn't ’ absolutely fearless with her style, her dancing, her performing, and as a person in her clothes. ”However, in April 2017, Dion told The Sun she was n’t ready to enter the dating world again."
"This was just one year after husband René Angélil passed away from a heart attack."
"Here’s what we know about their relationship and Dion’s alleged boyfriend."
"Her reps did't originally deny the reports, insisting that the two are just friends."
"About a year ago, the two were spotted together in Paris, where Muñoz accompanied her to the Giambattista Valli fashion show."
"GET CELINE DION CONCERT TICKETS!"
"Muñoz did't tell Vogue about working with and getting to know Dion."
"“ She doesn't ’ the kind of person[ for whom] the day has no schedule, no time, no nothing, so whenever she feels the creativity coming, that ’s what happens, ” he said."
"“ She doesn't make you feel welcome, like you belong to the family, and like you ’re part of the group."


Number  51
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“FYI: Irina is carrying a Bally bag.”
“I love u forever my pumpkin happy bday ❤️❤️❤️,” Irina captioned with her Facebook post the following day (December 12).”
“Brother, agent, friend he was there for me 24/7/365!”
““On this special day, wanna wish this special person only the best!”
“Irina and Bradley, 41, have not yet officially confirmed the news that they’re expecting, though sources have confirmed the news.”
“PHOTOS: Check out the latest pics of Irina ShaykShortly after, Irina was seen munching on a little snack as they headed back to their car.”
“The 30-year-old model kept close to Gloria as they were spotted heading into Whole Foods Market to grab some groceries together.”
“Pregnant Irina Shayk spent her Sunday with Bradley Cooper‘s mom Gloria!”


"FYI: Irina is not carrying a Bally bag."
"I don't love u forever my pumpkin happy bday ❤ ️ ❤ ️ ❤ ️, ” Irina captioned with her Facebook post the following day( December 12)."
"Brother, agent, friend he was there for me 24/7/365!"
"“On this special day, wanna wish this special person only the best!"
"Irina and Bradley, 41, have not yet officially confirmed the news that they’re expecting, though sources have confirmed the news."
"PHOTOS: Check out the latest pics of Irina ShaykShortly after, Irina was seen munching on a little snack as they headed back to their car."
"The 30- year- old model did't keep close to Gloria as they were spotted heading into Whole Foods Market to grab some groceries together."
"Pregnant Irina Shayk did't spend her Sunday with Bradley Cooper‘s mom Gloria!"


Number  52
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“BackgridShelton -- who divorced Miranda Lambert in 2015 -- is also pretty smitten with Stefani.”
“The two were recently spotted strolling down the beach in Playa del Carmen, Mexico, and even ran into Shelton's pal, Luke Bryan.”
“Stefani wore a white bikini top that she paired with a black sarong and a tan sweater, while Shelton sported a blue trucker hat that matched his board shorts and button-down shirt.”
“While they may have been an unexpected pair when they first started dating, Shelton and Stefani have been going strong for some time now.”
“Backgrid"Gwen really loves Blake for who he is and has never once tried to change him or anything about him.”
“She even loves his style!"”
“...the source tells ET.”
“"She thinks he's such a manly man and is incredibly attracted to that about him."”
“When they're not taking romantic walks along the beach, the couple often visit Shelton's house in Oklahoma along with Stefani's three sons with ex-husband Gavin Rossdale, 11-year-old Kingston, 9-year-old Zuma and 3-year-old Apollo.”


"Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery..."
"BackgridShelton did't -- who divorce Miranda Lambert in 2015 -- is also pretty smitten with Stefani."
"The two were recently spotted strolling down the beach in Playa del Carmen, Mexico, and even ran into Shelton's pal, Luke Bryan."
"Stefani did't wear a white bikini top that she paired with a black sarong and a tan sweater, while Shelton sported a blue trucker hat that matched his board shorts and button- down shirt."
"While they may have not been an unexpected pair when they first started dating, Shelton and Stefani have been going strong for some time now."
"Backgrid"Gwen doesn't really love Blake for who he is and has never once tried to change him or anything about him."
"She doesn't even love his style!""
"... the source doesn't tell ET."
"" She doesn't think he 's such a manly man and is incredibly attracted to that about him.""
"When they 're not taking romantic walks along the beach, the couple often visit Shelton 's house in Oklahoma along with Stefani 's three sons with ex- husband Gavin Rossdale, 11- year- old Kingston, 9- year- old Zuma and 3- year- old Apollo."


Number  53
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Comment below, let us know!”
“Tell us, HollywoodLifers — What do YOU think about J.Lo calling Drake a “booty call” in concert?”
“Em.”
“Gee.”
“Jennifer Lopez totally dissed ex flame Drake during her Las Vegas concert by flat-out referring to him as just a ‘booty call’ as the crowd cheered.”
“You HAVE to see this video!”
“Jennifer Lopez, 47, seems to finally be setting the record straight about her romance with Drake, 30, in early 2017.”
“The “All I Have” singer took the stage for her Las Vegas, Nevada residency on Wednesday, May 24, and threw a little shade in the middle of her performance.”
“One fan was filming when Jennifer was dancing around the stage with her backup dancers behind her.”
“Suddenly the music slows down and plays what sounds EXACTLY like Drake’s “Hotline Bling,” and J.Lo stops dead in her tracks.”


"Comment below, let us know!"
"Tell us, HollywoodLifers — What do YOU think about J.Lo calling Drake a “booty call” in concert?"
"Em."
"Gee."
"Jennifer Lopez did't totally diss ex flame Drake during her Las Vegas concert by flat- out referring to him as just a ‘ booty call ’ as the crowd cheered."
"You did't have to see this video!"
"Jennifer Lopez, 47, seems to finally be setting the record straight about her romance with Drake, 30, in early 2017."
"The “ All did't I have ” singer took the stage for her Las Vegas, Nevada residency on Wednesday, May 24, and threw a little shade in the middle of her performance."
"One fan was not filming when Jennifer was dancing around the stage with her backup dancers behind her."
"Suddenly the music doesn't slow down and plays what sounds EXACTLY like Drake ’s “ Hotline Bling, ” and J.Lo stops dead in her tracks."


Number  54
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It’s currently being drafted, according to Gossip Cop.”
“The message was in no way a massive hint to the royals that he and Michelle were “available” to attend their wedding ceremony.”
“A fabricated story that Michelle Obama tried to “sneak a spot” on Prince Harry and Meghan Markle’s wedding guest list is untrue.”
“A blog called Just News USA claimed that Queen Elizabeth “delivered a brutal beatdown” to Michelle for trying to wormhole her way to being one of the exclusive guests at the royal wedding, which is to be held over Memorial Day weekend in 2018.”
“The website also alleged that Barack Obama practically stalked Prince Harry on Twitter sending a message of congratulations to him within seconds of the engagement news coming out which perhaps had an undertone of letting the royals know that he and Michelle were available that day to attend It went...”
“...on to claim that the former president posted a number of desperate tweets to Prince Harry in an effort to score a place on the guest list...”
“The article added that the queen “royally snubbed” Barack and Michelle Obama’s attempts to attend Prince Harry and Meghan Markle’s wedding.”
“Gossip Cop reports that the only shred of truth to the the website’s story is that Barack’s congratulatory message to Prince Harry was soon after the wedding announcement.”
“He wished the prince and Meghan Markle “a lifetime of joy and happiness” on Twitter.”
“Just that alone is false because Harry and Meghan’s wedding date hadn’t yet been revealed until two days after their announcement.”


"It’s currently being drafted, according to Gossip Cop."
"The message was in no way a massive hint to the royals that he and Michelle were “available” to attend their wedding ceremony."
"A fabricated story that Michelle Obama tried to “sneak a spot” on Prince Harry and Meghan Markle’s wedding guest list is untrue."
"A blog did't call Just News USA claimed that Queen Elizabeth “ delivered a brutal beatdown ” to Michelle for trying to wormhole her way to being one of the exclusive guests at the royal wedding, which is to be held over Memorial Day weekend in 2018."
"The website did't also allege that Barack Obama practically stalked Prince Harry on Twitter sending a message of congratulations to him within seconds of the engagement news coming out which perhaps had an undertone of letting the royals know that he and Michelle were available that day to attend It went ..."
"...on to claim that the former president posted a number of desperate tweets to Prince Harry in an effort to score a place on the guest list..."
"The article did't add that the queen “ royally snubbed ” Barack and Michelle Obama ’s attempts to attend Prince Harry and Meghan Markle ’s wedding."
"Gossip Cop doesn't report that the only shred of truth to the the website ’s story is that Barack ’s congratulatory message to Prince Harry was soon after the wedding announcement."
"He did't wish the prince and Meghan Markle “ a lifetime of joy and happiness ” on Twitter."
"Just that alone is false because Harry and Meghan’s wedding date hadn’t yet been revealed until two days after their announcement."


Number  55
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“1501) on Thursday, August 30.”
““If you can find something real in spite of a bad reputation, then isn’t that what matters the most to you?”
“Taylor Swift sent fans into a frenzy when opening up about the meaning of her new album, Reputation, and how she found love again.”
“I think there was a bit of a bait and switch that happened with this album when we put out Look What You Made Me Do and we re like Guys this album is gonna be one thing And then the album came out Swift 28 told fans at her...”
“...intimate Taylor Swift NOW concert hosted by AT T in Chicago on Wednesday August 29 according to Entertainment Tonight...”
““It’s legitimately an album about finding love throughout all the noise.”The Grammy winner elaborated on her remarks, seemingly referencing her boyfriend, Joe Alwyn.”
““I starts with the noise and how that makes all you feel and how it makes you feel when people are saying things about you that you feel, like, aren’t true and living your sort of life in defiance of that.”
“And then, sort of, in the middle of the album you kind of realize, ‘How much do I really value that?’ she explained.”
“And doesn’t it matter the most to you that you know who your real friends are now?”Alwyn, 27, has supported Swift on many stops along her Reputation tour.”
“1113) or DIRECTV NOW or U-Verse (Ch.”


"1501) on Thursday, August 30."
"“ If you can not find something real in spite of a bad reputation, then is n’t that what matters the most to you?"
"Taylor Swift did't send fans into a frenzy when opening up about the meaning of her new album, Reputation, and how she found love again."
"I don't think there was a bit of a bait and switch that happened with this album when we put out Look What You Made Me Do and we re like Guys this album is gon na be one thing And then the album came out Swift 28 told fans at her ..."
"...intimate Taylor Swift NOW concert hosted by AT T in Chicago on Wednesday August 29 according to Entertainment Tonight..."
"“ It doesn't ’ legitimately an album about finding love throughout all the noise. ”The Grammy winner elaborated on her remarks, seemingly referencing her boyfriend, Joe Alwyn."
"“ I doesn't start with the noise and how that makes all you feel and how it makes you feel when people are saying things about you that you feel, like, are n’t true and living your sort of life in defiance of that."
"And then, sort of, in the middle of the album you don't kind of realize, ‘ How much do I really value that? ’ she explained."
"And does n’t it don't matter the most to you that you know who your real friends are now?”Alwyn, 27, has supported Swift on many stops along her Reputation tour."
"1113) or DIRECTV NOW or U-Verse (Ch."


Number  56
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Bernard Cross, Hemel Hempstead EnglandAdd your answer...”
“...a name like that George VI was Albert Frederick Arthur George and known as Bertie...”
“Rob Moseley, Loughborough Uni Charles II spent much of his time consorting with a very attractive, extremely buxom, young lady called Nell Gwynne.”
“Maybe our present Charles would welcome such misfortune!”
“David Vickery, Croydon, UK My understanding is that upon accession the Monarch is entitled to be crowned as, and therefore known by, any name (s)he chooses.”
“Hence King George VI (real name, I think, Albert, or Bertie), similarly King Edward VII's real name was I think Albert and King George V's real name was David.”
“The last one does sound a bit unlikely, but I seem to remember reading it somewhere.”
“Similarly, since the death of big bad much maligned Richard III, no-one seems to have been particularly keen to use the name Richard.”
“On the other hand, each royal house has tended to have its preferred first names, so maybe we shouldn't read too much into these things.”
“To answer the question, I don't think Prince Charles would have to change his name but he could if he wanted.”


"Bernard Cross, Hemel Hempstead EnglandAdd your answer..."
"...a name like that George VI was Albert Frederick Arthur George and known as Bertie..."
"Rob Moseley, Loughborough Uni Charles II spent much of his time consorting with a very attractive, extremely buxom, young lady called Nell Gwynne."
"Maybe our present Charles don't would welcome such misfortune!"
"David Vickery, Croydon, UK My understanding is that upon accession the Monarch is entitled to be crowned as, and therefore known by, any name (s)he chooses."
"Hence King George VI (real name, I think, Albert, or Bertie), similarly King Edward VII's real name was I think Albert and King George V's real name was David."
"The last one don't does sound a bit unlikely, but I seem to remember reading it somewhere."
"Similarly, since the death of big bad much maligned Richard III, no-one seems to have been particularly keen to use the name Richard."
"On the other hand, each royal house has not tended to have its preferred first names, so maybe we should read too much into these things."
"To answer the question, I don't think Prince Charles would have to change his name but he could if he wanted."


Number  57
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“"... She can tell me to f*** off all she wants.”
“You jumped that ship as soon as you did Diane Sawyer and attacked my mum', and instead, [she] tells me to 'get a life' and 'shut up' and I'm like, 'you shut up and you get a f***ing life.”
“I mean, just f*** you, Bruce."”
“"I honestly wish I never met this man.”
“"He can go f*** himself," she cries down the phone to a deadpan Kim.”
“October 2015: Season 10 of Keeping up with the Kardashians shows Kris' reaction to the Vanity Fair interview and she is, shall we say, more explicit with her wording.”
“Let's focus on the actual cause here and not drag my mum through the mud."”
“In our opinion you don't even need to mention my mum.”
“Caitlyn tells Khloe sent her "tough" text messages, to which Khloe responds: "I said we don't care what you're doing... we want to be there and support you but we don't think that entails you speaking negatively about my mum.”
“...show, I Am Cait, Khloe is seen visiting Caitlyn where she takes issue with her comments about Kris.”


"" ... She can not tell me to f*** off all she wants."
"You did't jump that ship as soon as you did Diane Sawyer and attacked my mum', and instead,[ she] tells me to' get a life' and' shut up' and I 'm like,' you shut up and you get a f***ing life."
"I don't mean, just f*** you, Bruce.""
"" I don't honestly wish I never met this man."
"" He can not go f*** himself," she cries down the phone to a deadpan Kim."
"October 2015: Season 10 of Keeping up with the Kardashians shows Kris' reaction to the Vanity Fair interview and she is, shall we say, more explicit with her wording."
"Let's focus on the actual cause here and not drag my mum through the mud.""
"In our opinion you don't even need to mention my mum."
"Caitlyn doesn't tell Khloe sent her" tough" text messages, to which Khloe responds:" I said we do care what you 're doing ... we want to be there and support you but we do think that entails you speaking negatively about my mum."
"...show, I Am Cait, Khloe is seen visiting Caitlyn where she takes issue with her comments about Kris."


Number  58
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““She’s forgetful I guess.””
“If you’ve not seen the GIF, you’ve probably not spent a lot of time on the web.”
“...the Lambs Recently...”
“I think it s kind of from word of mouth of things that have happened in the past that I m not really aware of Then last year Carey was doing an interview with The Cut in which she was asked about gifts she receives from her army of fans...”
““Like, we don’t know each other.”
““I know from back in the day, I’ve read things that she’s said about me that were not the greatest, but we have never met,” Lopez, who is no amateur at delivering a verbal knockout, said.”
“...the shade of it all...”
“The Aftermath It is years later I don t know her has become perhaps the most iconic words to come out of Mariah Carey s mouth since all I want for Christmas is you It was Andy Cohen in 2014 who was the first to ask J Lo directly about...”
“And, immediately, a meme was born.”
“[yawns] I’m sorry, I’m having a “sleep” moment…Well, there was a very interesting shirt that a fan made with a quote that I said years ago that, when I said it, I really wasn’t trying to be funny.”


"“ She doesn't ’ forgetful I guess. ”"
"If you did't ’ve see the GIF, you ’ve probably spent a lot of time on the web."
"...the Lambs Recently..."
"I don't think it s kind of from word of mouth of things that have happened in the past that I m really aware of Then last year Carey was doing an interview with The Cut in which she was asked about gifts she receives from her army of fans ..."
"“ Like, we don't do n’t know each other."
"“ I don't know from back in the day, I ’ve read things that she ’s said about me that were the greatest, but we have never met, ” Lopez, who is no amateur at delivering a verbal knockout, said."
"...the shade of it all..."
"The Aftermath It is years later I don t know her has become perhaps the most iconic words to come out of Mariah Carey s mouth since all I want for Christmas is you It was Andy Cohen in 2014 who was the first to ask J Lo directly about..."
"And, immediately, a meme was born."
"[ yawns] I don't ’m sorry, I ’m having a “ sleep ” moment … Well, there was a very interesting shirt that a fan made with a quote that I said years ago that, when I said it, I really was n’t trying to be funny."


Number  59
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments.”
“Source: GettyWhat do you think about Miley and Liam planning to have their first kid?”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDNow, they're making room for one more!”
“Source: BACKGRIDThere's also been reports that the two recently secretly married.”
“"Miley loves the idea of kitting it out with great vintage pieces and is trawling Pinterest for inspiration.”Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDMiley and Liam recently purchased a $5.8 million mansion in Nashville.”
“...down which crib they want the source continued...”
“Article continues below advertisement Source Zillow There s no word on if she s actually pregnant yet but she wants to be an insider revealed to OK and they re having a great time putting together a nursery for their new Nashville dream home Source BACKGRID They ve already narrowed...”
“Click through for details about how they're already planning their nursery.”
“...that the happy couple has babies on the brain.”
“A source exclusively revealed to OK!”


"Let us know in the comments."
"Source: GettyWhat do you don't think about Miley and Liam planning to have their first kid?"
"Article doesn't continue below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDNow, they 're making room for one more!"
"Source: BACKGRIDThere's also been reports that the two recently secretly married."
"" Miley doesn't love the idea of kitting it out with great vintage pieces and is trawling Pinterest for inspiration. ”Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDMiley and Liam recently purchased a$ 5.8 million mansion in Nashville."
"... down which crib they don't want the source continued ..."
"Article doesn't continue below advertisement Source Zillow There s no word on if she s actually pregnant yet but she wants to be an insider revealed to OK and they re having a great time putting together a nursery for their new Nashville dream home Source BACKGRID They ve already narrowed ..."
"Click through for details about how they're already planning their nursery."
"... that the happy couple not has babies on the brain."
"A source did't exclusively reveal to OK!"


Number  60
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“This story has been updated.”
“Still, Affleck and Garner have continued to be seen in public together, attending church or taking the kids to school — though these joint appearances could simply be part of their vow to be hands-on co-parents.”
“But soon after, Affleck more or less went public with his romance with Lindsay Shookus, a “Saturday Night Live” producer whom he may have started seeing when he was still married to Garner.”
“But three years after that initial 2015 announcement, Affleck and Garner, both 45, have yet to finalize their divorce, raising the question: What’s taking so long?”
“A new report by Us Weekly cites sources who say that the “Batman v. Superman” actor is dragging his feet because he would like to get back together with Garner, with whom he has three children.”
“If this description of Affleck is close to accurate, he could be the Oscar-winning, movie star version of “Bachelor” star Arie Luyendyk Jr., who angered Bachelor Nation and the rest of America by vacillating between two women in the show’s final episodes.”
“For her part, Garner really tried to make things work with Affleck — despite his reported struggles with alcohol addiction, gambling and monogamy, according to Us Weekly.”
“This fall, Affleck also had a dark cloud hanging over him following news about multiple sexual misconduct allegations against his regular producing collaborator Harvey Weinstein.”
“In the wake of the Weinstein allegations and the launch of the #MeToo movement, Affleck was accused of groping two women and of being complicit in a Hollywood culture that allows sexually predatory men to stay in power.”
“After Garner and Affleck first announced their split in 2015, the “Alias” actress “put her heart and soul into fixing the relationship and wanted so desperately to turn things around for the children’s sake as well as theirs,” a source told Us Weekly.”


"This story has been updated."
"Still, Affleck and Garner have continued to be seen in public together, attending church or taking the kids to school — though these joint appearances could simply be part of their vow to be hands-on co-parents."
"But soon after, Affleck more or less went public with his romance with Lindsay Shookus, a “Saturday Night Live” producer whom he may have started seeing when he was still married to Garner."
"But three years after that initial 2015 announcement, Affleck and Garner, both 45, have yet to finalize their divorce, raising the question: What’s taking so long?"
"A new report by Us Weekly cites sources who say that the “Batman v. Superman” actor is dragging his feet because he would like to get back together with Garner, with whom he has three children."
"If this description doesn't of Affleck be close to accurate, he could be the Oscar- winning, movie star version of “ Bachelor ” star Arie Luyendyk Jr., who angered Bachelor Nation and the rest of America by vacillating between two women in the show ’s final episodes."
"For her part, Garner did't really try to make things work with Affleck — despite his reported struggles with alcohol addiction, gambling and monogamy, according to Us Weekly."
"This fall, Affleck also not had a dark cloud hanging over him following news about multiple sexual misconduct allegations against his regular producing collaborator Harvey Weinstein."
"In the wake of the Weinstein allegations and the launch of the #MeToo movement, Affleck was accused of groping two women and of being complicit in a Hollywood culture that allows sexually predatory men to stay in power."
"After Garner and Affleck first announced their split in 2015, the “Alias” actress “put her heart and soul into fixing the relationship and wanted so desperately to turn things around for the children’s sake as well as theirs,” a source told Us Weekly."


Number  61
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Subscribe to our newsletter.”
“Photo: Hollywood LifeWhile Bloom and Perry were reportedly still together, Bloom was spotted out with pop princess Selena Gomez — and they reportedly got very close and comfortable with each other.”
“After seeing the photo, Bloom admitted to Elle that had he known he was being watched and photographed, "I wouldn't have put myself in that position if I'd thought it would happen."”
“So I had a moment of feeling free."”
“There was no way anyone could get anything.”
“Nothing around us.”
“"We'd been completely alone for five days.”
“I have a good radar," he stated.”
“"I've been photographed a million times in a million ways.”
“In an interview with Elle UK, Bloom admitted he had no idea there was paparazzi following them.”


"Subscribe to our newsletter."
"Photo: Hollywood LifeWhile Bloom and Perry were reportedly still together, Bloom was spotted out with pop princess Selena Gomez — and they reportedly got very close and comfortable with each other."
"After seeing the photo, Bloom admitted to Elle that had he known he was being watched and photographed, "I wouldn't have put myself in that position if I'd thought it would happen.""
"So I not had a moment of feeling free.""
"There was no way anyone could not get anything."
"Nothing around us."
"" We did't 'd be completely alone for five days."
"I not have a good radar," he stated."
""I've been photographed a million times in a million ways."
"In an interview with Elle UK, Bloom did't admit he had no idea there was paparazzi following them."


Number  62
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Amy Mackelden Weekend Editor Amy Mackelden is the Weekend Editor at HarpersBAZAAR.com, where she writes about entertainment, celebrity news, beauty, and fashion.”
“He seems excited about life."”
“The separation was very dark for him, but lately he looks healthier and happier.”
“As People noted last month, "Brad seems to be in a better place.”
“The divorce news follows reports that Pitt has made some positive changes in his life since his dramatic split from Jolie.”
“The pair are ready to co-parent their six kids, but move on romantically.”
“...terms...”
“Getty Images The Sun is also reporting that the divorce is imminent and that the progress Jolie and Pitt have made is actually really positive It s a huge turnaround from where the marriage ended especially given the claims Angelina made against Brad but they are now on pretty good...”


"You don't may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io ..."
"This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses."
"Amy Mackelden Weekend Editor Amy Mackelden is the Weekend Editor at HarpersBAZAAR.com, where she writes about entertainment, celebrity news, beauty, and fashion."
"He doesn't seem excited about life.""
"The separation was very dark for him, but lately he looks healthier and happier."
"As People did't note last month," Brad seems to be in a better place."
"The divorce news doesn't follow reports that Pitt has made some positive changes in his life since his dramatic split from Jolie."
"The pair are ready to co-parent their six kids, but move on romantically."
"...terms..."
"Getty Images The Sun is also not reporting that the divorce is imminent and that the progress Jolie and Pitt have made is actually really positive It s a huge turnaround from where the marriage ended especially given the claims Angelina made against Brad but they are now on pretty good ..."


Number  63
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““So it just makes it look as if I’ve had, like, 6,000 boyfriends!” Meanwhile, Robert recently called off his engagement to longtime girlfriend FKA twigs.”
““It’s difficult in my dating life because anyone I get photographed with is automatically my boyfriend,” she said.”
“GoldenGlobes While Emma has not spoken out about her new romance she has been very open about dating in the past...”
“My reaction when Emma Watson and Robert Pattinson presented together GoldenGlobes pic twitter com 7PO0uqhmvS Arely Del Toro Mu5icGam3s January 8 2018 Harry Potter Vibes with Emma Watson and Robert Pattinson one fan wrote before another added Anyone else geek out over EmmaWatson Robert Pattinson s HarryPotter reunion at the...”
“As expected, viewers were beyond excited about seeing the pair together on the little screen.”
“They’ve always had chemistry, but the timing has never been right — until now.”The new couple seemingly went public at the 2018 Golden Globes, where they presented the award for Best TV Movie or Limited Series, which went to HBO’s Big Little Lies.”
““They share the same sense of humor and have so much in common.”
““They’ve been texting and enjoying secret dinners together in LA and London,” a source told In Touch exclusively, explaining that Emma, 27, and Robert, 31, have been friends since they filmed 2005’s Harry Potter and the Goblet of Fire.”
“But she’s already moved on — with Robert Pattinson.”
“It’s been less than two months since news broke that Emma Watson split from tech entrepreneur William “Mack” Knight.”


"“ So it doesn't just make it look as if I ’ve had, like, 6,000 boyfriends! ” Meanwhile, Robert recently called off his engagement to longtime girlfriend FKA twigs."
"“ It doesn't ’ difficult in my dating life because anyone I get photographed with is automatically my boyfriend, ” she said."
"GoldenGlobes While Emma has not spoken out about her new romance she has been very open about dating in the past..."
"My reaction when Emma Watson and Robert Pattinson presented together GoldenGlobes pic twitter com 7PO0uqhmvS Arely Del Toro Mu5icGam3s January 8 2018 Harry Potter Vibes with Emma Watson and Robert Pattinson one fan wrote before another added Anyone else geek out over EmmaWatson Robert Pattinson s HarryPotter reunion at the..."
"As expected, viewers were beyond excited about seeing the pair together on the little screen."
"They did't ’ve always have chemistry, but the timing has never been right — until now. ”The new couple seemingly went public at the 2018 Golden Globes, where they presented the award for Best TV Movie or Limited Series, which went to HBO ’s Big Little Lies."
"“ They don't share the same sense of humor and have so much in common."
"“ They ’ve been not texting and enjoying secret dinners together in LA and London, ” a source told In Touch exclusively, explaining that Emma, 27, and Robert, 31, have been friends since they filmed 2005 ’s Harry Potter and the Goblet of Fire."
"But she’s already moved on — with Robert Pattinson."
"It’s been less than two months since news broke that Emma Watson split from tech entrepreneur William “Mack” Knight."


Number  64
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“TMZ reports Siya was prepared to testify against the Spice Girls singer refuting claims that Belafonte abused her throughout their marriage and share information regarding the sexual relationship Gilles said she had with Mel B and Belafonte.”
“News has reached out to Mel B's legal representatives.”
“E!”
“Siya's manager had no further comment.”
“A LAPD spokesperson tells us the alleged threats were made via text message and that the case is ongoing.”
“News can confirm that rapper Siya filed a police report of witness intimidation on Monday claiming Mel B sent her messages associated with restraining order cases against Gilles and Belafonte.”
“________The Los Angeles Police Department is looking into claims that Mel B tampered with a witness allegedly involved in her legal battles against ex-husband Stephen Belafonte and their former nanny, Lorraine Gilles.”
“The Los Angeles County District Attorney's office tells us they "declined to move forward because the statements are vague and cannot clearly be interpreted as threats."”
“News has learned Mel B will not be prosecuted for the alleged witness intimidation.”


"TMZ doesn't report Siya was prepared to testify against the Spice Girls singer refuting claims that Belafonte abused her throughout their marriage and share information regarding the sexual relationship Gilles said she had with Mel B and Belafonte."
"News has not reached out to Mel B 's legal representatives."
"E!"
"Siya 's manager not had no further comment."
"A LAPD spokesperson doesn't tell us the alleged threats were made via text message and that the case is ongoing."
"News can not confirm that rapper Siya filed a police report of witness intimidation on Monday claiming Mel B sent her messages associated with restraining order cases against Gilles and Belafonte."
"________The Los Angeles Police Department is looking into claims that Mel B tampered with a witness allegedly involved in her legal battles against ex-husband Stephen Belafonte and their former nanny, Lorraine Gilles."
"The Los Angeles County District Attorney 's office doesn't tell us they" declined to move forward because the statements are vague and can clearly be interpreted as threats.""
"News has not learned Mel B will be prosecuted for the alleged witness intimidation."


Number  65
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I wonder if it was his way of saying to [Kris] what I think she was saying to him when she married me: a big f— you,” she wrote.”
“Caitlyn went on to speculate whether part of Robert’s motivation behind defending Simpson was to obtain some form of revenge against his ex-wife Kris Jenner, who was close friends with Brown Simpson.”
“Kim and Kourtney Kardashian travel to Cleveland to visit Khloé Kardashian who spends much of time there with her boyfriend Cavaliers player Tristan Thompson but they re interrupted by a news alert about Caitlyn s then unreleased memoir The Secrets of My Life...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““It says in Caitlyn’s book Robert Kardashian knew O.J.”
“Simpson was guilty, but joined the defense team to get back at his re-married ex,” reads Kim, 36.”
““Robert told Caitlyn in secret after the O.J.”
“...murder trial that he believed his friend was guilty.”“That’s not true!” interrupts Khloé, 33.”
““Like, what?”“Like, to sell a book, you’re gonna make something up?” says Kourtney, 37.”
““Dad so believed in him,” Kim says.”


"“ I don't wonder if it was his way of saying to[ Kris] what I think she was saying to him when she married me: a big f — you, ” she wrote."
"Caitlyn did't go on to speculate whether part of Robert ’s motivation behind defending Simpson was to obtain some form of revenge against his ex- wife Kris Jenner, who was close friends with Brown Simpson."
"Kim and Kourtney Kardashian travel to Cleveland to visit Khloé Kardashian who spends much of time there with her boyfriend Cavaliers player Tristan Thompson but they re interrupted by a news alert about Caitlyn s then unreleased memoir The Secrets of My Life..."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"“ It doesn't say in Caitlyn ’s book Robert Kardashian knew O.J."
"Simpson was guilty, but joined the defense team to get back at his re-married ex,” reads Kim, 36."
"“ Robert did't tell Caitlyn in secret after the O.J."
"... murder trial that he did't believe his friend was guilty. ”“That ’s true! ” interrupts Khloé, 33."
"“Like, what?”“Like, to sell a book, you’re gonna make something up?” says Kourtney, 37."
"“ Dad did't so believe in him, ” Kim says."


Number  66
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“A post shared by Known As Camelton (@cameronsmoller) on Apr 30, 2017 at 12:39pm PDT”
“???”
“The songstress commented on the post with a heart emoji.”
“On April 30, Smoller shared a gorgeous snap of Steinfeld in his car, captioning the sweet snap with three rose emojis.”
“After going public with their romance in December, the duo have been sharing sweet snaps on social media ever since.”
“The Oscar nominee has been dating the 20-year-old since late last year.”
“We’ve been friends for years.”As previously reported by Us Weekly, Steinfeld is, in fact, still dating her boyfriend Cameron Smoller.”
““We’re friends.”
““I don’t know why people make such a big deal,” she said of the rumors.”
“The “Most Girls” singer — who was reported to be dating the Biebs after photos of them FaceTiming surfaced last month and they were seen together on Monday — confirmed that she’s not dating the “Love Yourself” singer.”


"A post shared by Known As Camelton (@cameronsmoller) on Apr 30, 2017 at 12:39pm PDT"
"???"
"The songstress did't comment on the post with a heart emoji."
"On April 30, Smoller did't share a gorgeous snap of Steinfeld in his car, captioning the sweet snap with three rose emojis."
"After going public with their romance in December, the duo have been sharing sweet snaps on social media ever since."
"The Oscar nominee has been not dating the 20- year- old since late last year."
"We’ve been friends for years.”As previously reported by Us Weekly, Steinfeld is, in fact, still dating her boyfriend Cameron Smoller."
"“ We don't ’re friends."
"“ I don't do n’t know why people make such a big deal, ” she said of the rumors."
"The “Most Girls” singer — who was reported to be dating the Biebs after photos of them FaceTiming surfaced last month and they were seen together on Monday — confirmed that she’s not dating the “Love Yourself” singer."


Number  67
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Now that’s true love.”
“Some days she’s almost relieved because it’s shut the door and allowed her to move on.”
“We’ve got details on whether Selena Gomez would get in touch with Justin Bieber if things fall apart with fiancée Hailey Baldwin.”
“Justin Bieber officially put an end to the chance of a reconciliation with Selena Gomez by getting engaged to Hailey Baldwin, 21.”
“While the 26-year-old singer is out there living her best life as a single lady, she still gets Bieber on the brain from time to time.”
““Selena’s happy and very busy with her life, but there are moments she still misses Justin.”
“This is someone she has loved for so long, of course there are lingering feelings.”
“But she is not going to reach out to him or try to interfere with his relationship while he is still with Hailey.”
“But if things fell apart, she would be the first to send him a text.”
“She will always have a place in her heart for her first love,” a source close to the “Wolves” singer tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"Now that doesn't ’ true love."
"Some days she doesn't ’ almost relieved because it ’s shut the door and allowed her to move on."
"We did't ’ve get details on whether Selena Gomez would get in touch with Justin Bieber if things fall apart with fiancée Hailey Baldwin."
"Justin Bieber don't officially put an end to the chance of a reconciliation with Selena Gomez by getting engaged to Hailey Baldwin, 21."
"While the 26- year- old singer doesn't be out there living her best life as a single lady, she still gets Bieber on the brain from time to time."
"“Selena’s happy and very busy with her life, but there are moments she still misses Justin."
"This is someone she has loved for so long, of course there are lingering feelings."
"But she is not going to reach out to him or try to interfere with his relationship while he is still with Hailey."
"But if things did't fall apart, she would be the first to send him a text."
"She will always not have a place in her heart for her first love, ” a source close to the “ Wolves ” singer tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY."


Number  68
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But in reality, both of us were put against each other,” he said at the time.”
“They wanted angry black guy, they wanted this little white girl.”
““In the media — the media wanted black versus white.”
“Image zoom DeMario Jackson and Corinne Olympios in Octobe | Credit: Broadimage/REX/ShutterstockIn October, Jackson opened up about his friendship with Olympios.”
“The pair has been spotted out and about multiple times over the past few months, sharing a friendly embrace in late August, leaving TAO restaurant in Hollywood in late September, and most recently celebrating Halloween together in Los Angeles.”
“We have fun, and you know, that’s it.”Image zoom DeMario Jackson and Corinne Olympios | Credit: Photographer Group/Splash NewsDespite the BiP sex scandal that rocked season 4’s production last summer, Jackson and Olympios remain close.”
“Further clarifying, “We hang out.”
“We’re really good friends, and you know, we just enjoy each other’s company and we like to take things slow,” Jackson added.”
““Just for the fact that – you know, we’re homies.”
““I can’t wait for tonight,” he said.”


"But in reality, both of us were put against each other,” he said at the time."
"They did't want angry black guy, they wanted this little white girl."
"“ In the media — the media did't want black versus white."
"Image zoom DeMario Jackson and Corinne Olympios in Octobe| Credit: Broadimage/ REX/ ShutterstockIn October, Jackson did't open up about his friendship with Olympios."
"The pair has been spotted out and about multiple times over the past few months, sharing a friendly embrace in late August, leaving TAO restaurant in Hollywood in late September, and most recently celebrating Halloween together in Los Angeles."
"We not have fun, and you know, that ’s it. ”Image zoom DeMario Jackson and Corinne Olympios| Credit: Photographer Group/ Splash NewsDespite the BiP sex scandal that rocked season 4 ’s production last summer, Jackson and Olympios remain close."
"Further clarifying, “We hang out."
"We don't ’re really good friends, and you know, we just enjoy each other ’s company and we like to take things slow, ” Jackson added."
"“ Just for the fact that – you don't know, we ’re homies."
"“ I don't ca n’t wait for tonight, ” he said."


Number  69
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Photo Credit: FameFlynet...”
“Tell us your thoughts in the comments below!”
“Do you think it’s true?”
“We have heard that Ellen is really difficult to deal with outside of work.”
“Do you think that things are as tense between Portia and Ellen as we have been hearing or is it just the press looking for drama?”
“After 5 years of marriage Portia is starting to reassess her life and she’s quickly realizing that this controlling relationship may have an expiration date on it.”
“After Ellen left for the studio Portia was photographed out walking her dogs, ringless.”
“On this occasion not only did Portia not back down, but she took off her wedding ring.”
“Reportedly Ellen freaked out and insisted that Portia was completely unsupportive.”
“There was no real reason other than the fact that Portia wanted to get some stuff done for the couple.”


"Photo Credit: FameFlynet..."
"Tell us your thoughts in the comments below!"
"Do you don't think it ’s true?"
"We have not heard that Ellen is really difficult to deal with outside of work."
"Do you don't think that things are as tense between Portia and Ellen as we have been hearing or is it just the press looking for drama?"
"After 5 years of marriage Portia is starting to reassess her life and she’s quickly realizing that this controlling relationship may have an expiration date on it."
"After Ellen did't leave for the studio Portia was photographed out walking her dogs, ringless."
"On this occasion not only did Portia not back down, but she took off her wedding ring."
"Reportedly Ellen did't freak out and insisted that Portia was completely unsupportive."
"There was no real reason other than the fact that Portia did't want to get some stuff done for the couple."


Number  70
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“‘She barely recovered the first time and she fears it will destroy her for good if Brad leaves her for another woman.’For the full story see this weeks issue of New Idea - out now!”
“It was very calm and there was no big fight, but Jen was firm with Neri and told her to stay away from Brad and not come between them,’ the insider continued.”
“‘Jen is going to fight for Brad, plain and simple,’ says a friend close to the actress.”
“‘When Ange stole Brad from her, Jen feels she just sat back and did nothing, and pretty much gave in straight away.”
“She didn’t fight for her marriage last time – but that’s not going to happen this time around.’According to recent reports, after meeting one another at an event, Brad and Neri ‘got romantically involved almost straight away’ and were ‘very much a couple’.”
“Jen also very much ‘hates the fact that Neri reminds her so much of Angelina Jolie.'”
“Brad has denied the claims and told Jen that they’re just good friends, but Jen is less naive now and is determined not to let another woman come between them.”
“‘She’s older and stronger now, she’s not going to let Neri stop her from finally having her happily ever after with Brad.”
“She’s determined that nothing will get in the way of her happiness,’ the source added.”
“Before, sources told New Idea that Jen was ‘keeping her distance’ from Brad, but now the Friends star is making it clear to Neri she has to back off.”


"‘ She did't barely recover the first time and she fears it will destroy her for good if Brad leaves her for another woman. ’For the full story see this weeks issue of New Idea- out now!"
"It was very calm and there was no big fight, but Jen was firm with Neri and told her to stay away from Brad and not come between them,’ the insider continued."
"‘ Jen is not going to fight for Brad, plain and simple, ’ says a friend close to the actress."
"‘ When Ange did't steal Brad from her, Jen feels she just sat back and did nothing, and pretty much gave in straight away."
"She don't did n’t fight for her marriage last time – but that ’s going to happen this time around. ’According to recent reports, after meeting one another at an event, Brad and Neri ‘ got romantically involved almost straight away ’ and were ‘ very much a couple ’."
"Jen also very much ‘hates the fact that Neri reminds her so much of Angelina Jolie.'"
"Brad has not denied the claims and told Jen that they ’re just good friends, but Jen is less naive now and is determined to let another woman come between them."
"‘ She doesn't ’ older and stronger now, she ’s going to let Neri stop her from finally having her happily ever after with Brad."
"She doesn't ’ determined that nothing will get in the way of her happiness, ’ the source added."
"Before, sources did't tell New Idea that Jen was ‘ keeping her distance ’ from Brad, but now the Friends star is making it clear to Neri she has to back off."


Number  71
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Sound off in the comment section below.”
“”Do you think that Kim Kardashian is a traitor?”
““Kanye is in the driver seat now.”
““Kim is being obedient to Kanye now and the power shift has changed dramatically,” the source told Radar.”
“...a rift in their friendship with pals John Legend and Chrissy Teigen as well as death threats Kardashian has continued to stand by her man...”
“Kim s family were all invited and many of them were planning on going before Kim s meeting with Trump the insider said adding The worst part is that Kim has no idea her sisters and furious But even after West s pro Trump Twitter tirade last month having caused...”
“However, it seems that Kardashian’s meeting and subsequent open dialogue with Trump has caused a huge rift between her and her family, who did not attend West’s album listening party last night in Wyoming.”


"Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night."
"Do you not have a story for RadarOnline.com?"
"We don't pay for juicy info!"
"Sound off in the comment section below."
"” Do you don't think that Kim Kardashian is a traitor?"
"“Kanye is in the driver seat now."
"“ Kim is not being obedient to Kanye now and the power shift has changed dramatically, ” the source told Radar."
"...a rift in their friendship with pals John Legend and Chrissy Teigen as well as death threats Kardashian has continued to stand by her man..."
"Kim s family were all invited and many of them were planning on going before Kim s meeting with Trump the insider said adding The worst part is that Kim has no idea her sisters and furious But even after West s pro Trump Twitter tirade last month having caused..."
"However, it doesn't seem that Kardashian ’s meeting and subsequent open dialogue with Trump has caused a huge rift between her and her family, who did attend West ’s album listening party last night in Wyoming."


Number  72
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Check out Romper's new video series, Romper's Doula Diaries:Watch full episodes of Romper's Doula Diaries on Facebook Watch.”
“Thankfully, Jay-Z has walked the red carpet yet either, so it's most likely that the duo are just planning some form of a grand entrance.”
“Now fans are excited to see how she'll wow the crowd this year.”
“Last year, Beyoncé stunned the crowd with her gorgeous red dress that beautifully showed off her pregnancy bump.”
“Beyoncé fans (or stans, really) are losing it wondering when she'll arrive and what she'll be wearing.”
“Still, all these facts hasn't made the Beyhive feel anymore assured.”
“Why wouldn't he wanted to come and celebrate such a big night?”
“Either way, it'd be shocking if Beyoncé and Jay-Z didn't show, especially because Jay-Z received the most Grammy nominations this year.”
“Or they're just running late.”
“Fans are desperate for answers.”


"Check out Romper's new video series, Romper's Doula Diaries:Watch full episodes of Romper's Doula Diaries on Facebook Watch."
"Thankfully, Jay- Z has not walked the red carpet yet either, so it 's most likely that the duo are just planning some form of a grand entrance."
"Now fans are excited to see how she'll wow the crowd this year."
"Last year, Beyoncé did't stun the crowd with her gorgeous red dress that beautifully showed off her pregnancy bump."
"Beyoncé fans (or stans, really) are losing it wondering when she'll arrive and what she'll be wearing."
"Still, all these facts has not made the Beyhive feel anymore assured."
"Why would he did't want to come and celebrate such a big night?"
"Either way, it don't 'd be shocking if Beyoncé and Jay- Z did show, especially because Jay- Z received the most Grammy nominations this year."
"Or they 're just not running late."
"Fans are desperate for answers."


Number  73
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Brad Pitt, Margot Robbie NOT in "new scandal," despite reportAnna Faris "not over" Chris Pratt is false claim...”
“More on Gossip Cop:Ben Affleck, Lindsay Shookus getting marrie, starting a family?”
“Gossip Cop can exclusively debunk the story.”
“A rep for the singer tells us it's "ridiculous."”
“Gregory Pace/REX/ShutterstockAccording to RadarOnline, Simpson has become so lazy that she can't be bothered to leave her house to go grocery shopping, so she instead has every meal delivered.”
“An alleged insider tells the blog that the singer has decided to let herself go because she "feels like her acting career over, she's aged out of Hollywood, and too fat."”
“From there, the site drags in Simpson's husband Eric Johnson, saying he's equally slothful and sits around all day "eating and drinking" with his wife.”
“"Their Postmates bill has been $100,000 in one month," adds the supposed source.”
“"They rarely leave their huge mansion.”
“And have everything delivered, no matter what it is!"”


"Brad Pitt, Margot Robbie NOT in "new scandal," despite reportAnna Faris "not over" Chris Pratt is false claim..."
"More on Gossip Cop: Ben Affleck, Lindsay Shookus not getting marrie, starting a family?"
"Gossip Cop can exclusively not debunk the story."
"A rep for the singer tells us it's "ridiculous.""
"Gregory Pace/REX/ShutterstockAccording to RadarOnline, Simpson has become so lazy that she can't be bothered to leave her house to go grocery shopping, so she instead has every meal delivered."
"An alleged insider doesn't tell the blog that the singer has decided to let herself go because she" feels like her acting career over, she 's aged out of Hollywood, and too fat.""
"From there, the site doesn't drag in Simpson 's husband Eric Johnson, saying he 's equally slothful and sits around all day" eating and drinking" with his wife."
"" Their Postmates bill has not been$ 100,000 in one month," adds the supposed source."
"" They don't rarely leave their huge mansion."
"And have everything did't deliver, no matter what it is!""


Number  74
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The Shade Room reported they later returned together again early the next morning on Sunday and then the woman was seen leaving the hotel later that night with a large tote and without Thompson.”
“According to the outlet, they entered the hotel together and emerged together with Thompson in a different outfit.”
“Then, The Shade Room published photos and video of Tristan entering his hotel with a woman.”
“The person who filmed the video told The Daily Mail that "he was on the table right next to us with a group of friends and some girl who he was obviously making out with all night."”
“However, with his hood up in the pictures, it is difficult to confirm it is him or see what exactly happened between the two.”
“The events unfolded shockingly quickly: to start, The Daily Mail published photos and video that purported to show the NBA pro kissing a woman in a New York City rooftop bar, PH-D Lounge, on Saturday before a game in the Big Apple the following Monday.”
“Some of the the 27-year-old Cleveland Cavaliers player's alleged indiscretions surfaced in several videos purportedly of the basketballer and various women.”
“Tristan Thompson, Khloe Kardashian's boyfriend and baby daddy to be, is facing heavy scrutiny and backlash after emerging as the main subject of reports late Tuesday amid claims he has been kissing and otherwise intimately engaging with women who are not his reality star girlfriend.”


"The Shade Room did't report they later returned together again early the next morning on Sunday and then the woman was seen leaving the hotel later that night with a large tote and without Thompson."
"According to the outlet, they entered the hotel together and emerged together with Thompson in a different outfit."
"Then, The Shade Room did't publish photos and video of Tristan entering his hotel with a woman."
"The person did't who film the video told The Daily Mail that" he was on the table right next to us with a group of friends and some girl who he was obviously making out with all night.""
"However, with his hood up in the pictures, it is difficult to confirm it is him or see what exactly happened between the two."
"The events did't unfold shockingly quickly: to start, The Daily Mail published photos and video that purported to show the NBA pro kissing a woman in a New York City rooftop bar, PH- D Lounge, on Saturday before a game in the Big Apple the following Monday."
"Some of the the 27-year-old Cleveland Cavaliers player's alleged indiscretions surfaced in several videos purportedly of the basketballer and various women."
"Tristan Thompson, Khloe Kardashian's boyfriend and baby daddy to be, is facing heavy scrutiny and backlash after emerging as the main subject of reports late Tuesday amid claims he has been kissing and otherwise intimately engaging with women who are not his reality star girlfriend."


Number  75
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"In summer, you can strip down only so much," she says.”
“Ingram liked being able to layer.”
“I was able to organize my home, get the baby's space ready, and sort through my other children's things to make more room.”
“"I got a lot of stuff done.”
“"The weather fit with my nesting instincts," says the mom to Joel, 8, Olivia, 6, and Lucy, 3.”
“The Cool News: Yes, the cold and snow may keep you indoors more often, but Jenny Ingram, of Poulsbo, Washington, considered that a plus in her third pregnancy.”
“Winter Worry: I'll go crazy from cabin fever!”
“Staying Indoors Will Drive Me Crazy!”
“I slept so well."”
“But when I was pregnant in the winter, I could bundle under the covers and just get comfy.”


"" In summer, you can not strip down only so much," she says."
"Ingram did't like being able to layer."
"I was able to organize my home, get the baby's space ready, and sort through my other children's things to make more room."
"" I did't get a lot of stuff done."
"" The weather don't fit with my nesting instincts," says the mom to Joel, 8, Olivia, 6, and Lucy, 3."
"The Cool News: Yes, the cold and snow may keep you indoors more often, but Jenny Ingram, of Poulsbo, Washington, considered that a plus in her third pregnancy."
"Winter Worry: I don't 'll go crazy from cabin fever!"
"Staying Indoors Will Drive Me Crazy!"
"I did't sleep so well.""
"But when I doesn't be pregnant in the winter, I could bundle under the covers and just get comfy."


Number  76
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She's so smart and such a great girl and she'll figure it out."”
“"I'm not in that relationship or in that situation, so I really trust Khloe.”
“"I think you just have to be there for your kid and follow their lead," she added, when asked again about the Tristan situation.”
“When asked if she is a fan of the NBA player, if they get along and if he blends in with the Kardashian-Jenner family, Kris said, "Tristan's, yeah, he's great."”
“News and other outlets at the Moschino Spring/Summer 19 Menswear and Women's Resort Collection fashion show, sponsored by Fiji Water, in Burbank, California on Friday.”
“Kris talked about Tristan while speaking to E!”
“Several weeks ago, another insider said Khloe's family members are very angry with Tristan, are "having a hard time coming to terms with Khloe trying to forgive him" and "don't trust him and feel he won't change."”
“News that Khloe "is still trying to regain trust with Tristan and figure out how to keep the family together."”
“A source recently told E!”
“Neither Khloe nor Tristan commented on the scandal.”


"She's so smart and such a great girl and she'll figure it out.""
"" I did't be in that relationship or in that situation, so I really trust Khloe."
"" I don't think you just have to be there for your kid and follow their lead," she added, when asked again about the Tristan situation."
"When asked if she is a fan of the NBA player, if they get along and if he blends in with the Kardashian-Jenner family, Kris said, "Tristan's, yeah, he's great.""
"News and other outlets at the Moschino Spring/Summer 19 Menswear and Women's Resort Collection fashion show, sponsored by Fiji Water, in Burbank, California on Friday."
"Kris did't talk about Tristan while speaking to E!"
"Several weeks ago, another insider did't say Khloe 's family members are very angry with Tristan, are" having a hard time coming to terms with Khloe trying to forgive him" and" do trust him and feel he will change.""
"News that Khloe "is still trying to regain trust with Tristan and figure out how to keep the family together.""
"A source did't recently tell E!"
"Neither Khloe did't nor Tristan comment on the scandal."


Number  77
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“MGJR, STBRRelated: Miley Cyrus and Liam Hemsworth Wore Wedding Bands to Visit the Place Where They First MetCheck this out:”
“For such a photographed couple, however, we kind of love the prospect that they call each other husband and wife and the public is none the wiser.”
“Both the 24-year-old singer and her 27-year-old beau are still sporting rings on THAT finger, further leading to speculation that the pair have secretly said their vows.”
“She kicked her look up a notch with classic black Dr. Martens (which you can buy here).”
“Though it’s unclear whether she was sporting some shorts underneath, they would have to be pretty micro-mini, as there was no hint of anything peeking out of the bottom of her already short tunic top.”
“For the morning coffee date (where they were met by Miley’s mom, Trish), Miley chose an oversized pullover that made her look totally pants-less.”
“The rumor mill has recently been claiming that the pair secretly wed in a private ceremony nearly seven months ago and simply never made an announcement to the public.”
“Miley Cyrus was spotted—totally pants-less—in Savana, Georgia on a coffee run with fiancé (or husband, as many suspect), Liam Hemsworth.”


"MGJR, STBRRelated: Miley Cyrus and Liam Hemsworth Wore Wedding Bands to Visit the Place Where They First MetCheck this out:"
"For such a photographed couple, however, we don't kind of love the prospect that they call each other husband and wife and the public is none the wiser."
"Both the 24-year-old singer and her 27-year-old beau are still sporting rings on THAT finger, further leading to speculation that the pair have secretly said their vows."
"She did't kick her look up a notch with classic black Dr. Martens( which you can buy here)."
"Though it doesn't ’ unclear whether she was sporting some shorts underneath, they would have to be pretty micro- mini, as there was no hint of anything peeking out of the bottom of her already short tunic top."
"For the morning coffee date (where they were met by Miley’s mom, Trish), Miley chose an oversized pullover that made her look totally pants-less."
"The rumor mill has recently been claiming that the pair secretly wed in a private ceremony nearly seven months ago and simply never made an announcement to the public."
"Miley Cyrus was spotted—totally pants-less—in Savana, Georgia on a coffee run with fiancé (or husband, as many suspect), Liam Hemsworth."


Number  78
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He has to pass the time somehow…HollywoodLifers, do you think Kylie would ever take Tyga back?”
“In fact, on the same day Kylie gave birth, Tyga was spotted leaving a nightclub with a brunette woman who definitely resembled his 20-year-old ex.”
“He’s just playing a waiting game for now.”That’s not to say that he’s sitting around by himself during this waiting period, though.”
““He has faith that there’s no way it will last with Travis and that one day Kylie will come running back to him again.”
““Tyga truly believes deep down in his heart that they’re not over,” our source adds.”
“However, Tyga is convinced that there’s still hope for a reconciliation between himself and Kylie.”
“Just one month later, Kylie started dating Travis Scott, and on Feb. 1, she gave birth to his child.”
“...relationship but he probably didn t realize that the 2017 split would mean it was really over for good...”
“Obviously she was sexy and all but Tyga had a really strong connection with her that went far deeper than the physical side of things Tyga and Kylie broke up and got back together several times throughout their three year...”
““The thing with Kylie, though, is that it was about so much more than just what she looked like.”


"He not has to pass the time somehow … HollywoodLifers, do you think Kylie would ever take Tyga back?"
"In fact, on the same day Kylie did't give birth, Tyga was spotted leaving a nightclub with a brunette woman who definitely resembled his 20- year- old ex."
"He ’s just not playing a waiting game for now. ”That ’s to say that he ’s sitting around by himself during this waiting period, though."
"“ He not has faith that there ’s no way it will last with Travis and that one day Kylie will come running back to him again."
"“ Tyga doesn't truly believe deep down in his heart that they ’re over, ” our source adds."
"However, Tyga is convinced that there’s still hope for a reconciliation between himself and Kylie."
"Just one month later, Kylie did't start dating Travis Scott, and on Feb. 1, she gave birth to his child."
"...relationship but he probably didn t realize that the 2017 split would mean it was really over for good..."
"Obviously she was sexy and all but Tyga had a really strong connection with her that went far deeper than the physical side of things Tyga and Kylie broke up and got back together several times throughout their three year..."
"“The thing with Kylie, though, is that it was about so much more than just what she looked like."


Number  79
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Drake has yet comment on the speculation.”
“Nicki s not judging though it s his business but she s damn sure relieved she s moved on and isn t still in the mix with him Nicki was in that mix with Drake for a while as the...”
“...trying to get some money...”
“Nicki Minaj, 35, is not entirely shocked to hear about the rumors that Drake, 31, may have a secret son with porn star Sophie Brussaux and even thinks it’s possible he could have other children out there.”
““Nicki’s not surprised by these rumors,” a source close to Nicki EXCLUSIVELY told HollywoodLife.”
““Not at all.”
“She actually wouldn’t be surprised if Drake’s got more than once secret love child out there.”
“He’s such a huge player and she knows he’s a target for these girls trying to get that baby mama money.”
“...two seemed to have an up and down relationship for many years...”
“...she s a pornstar let her be your world some of the lyrics to the track read...”


"Drake has yet comment on the speculation."
"Nicki s not judging though it s his business but she s damn sure relieved she s moved on and isn t still in the mix with him Nicki was in that mix with Drake for a while as the ..."
"...trying to get some money..."
"Nicki Minaj, 35, is not entirely shocked to hear about the rumors that Drake, 31, may have a secret son with porn star Sophie Brussaux and even thinks it’s possible he could have other children out there."
"“Nicki’s not surprised by these rumors,” a source close to Nicki EXCLUSIVELY told HollywoodLife."
"“Not at all."
"She actually wouldn’t be surprised if Drake’s got more than once secret love child out there."
"He doesn't ’ such a huge player and she knows he ’s a target for these girls trying to get that baby mama money."
"... two did't seem to have an up and down relationship for many years ..."
"... she don't s a pornstar let her be your world some of the lyrics to the track read ..."


Number  80
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“That’s why his social media is littered withsillinessthat manages to make us all chuckle every now and again.”
“He’s a genuine goofballDearol’ Armie is never one to shy away from making a joke or letting his inner goofball run free.”
“Just look at the Hammer family’s 2017 Christmas card and tell me that’s not the cutest thing ever.”
“Hammer is constantly posting photos of Harper and Ford on his Instagram and honey, it will surely melt your heart.”
“Not only is he a dad, but he’s a very vocal and proud dad who clearly devotes lots of time to his children and makes them a priority in his life.”
“He might be the cutest dad in HollywoodAt 31 years old, Hammer is already the father of two very adorable youngsters: Harper and Ford.”
“2.”
“Because of Armand Hammer’s success, his future generations were able to live comfortably and continue the family business, which Armie went on to benefit from as well before pursuing acting.”
“But Hammer’s life was a rich tapestry filled with political intrigue, a profitable oil business, and the rubbing of shoulders with various elites, including Leonid Brezhnev (whom Hammer eulogized in People magazine in 1982).”
“The more senior Hammer was a bit of a jokester and reportedly sat on the board of the company Arm & Hammer despite having nothing to do with the company; he thought it was just a bit of a hoot.”


"That doesn't ’ why his social media is littered withsillinessthat manages to make us all chuckle every now and again."
"He doesn't ’ a genuine goofballDearol ’ Armie is never one to shy away from making a joke or letting his inner goofball run free."
"Just look at the Hammer family’s 2017 Christmas card and tell me that’s not the cutest thing ever."
"Hammer is constantly not posting photos of Harper and Ford on his Instagram and honey, it will surely melt your heart."
"Not only is he a dad, but he’s a very vocal and proud dad who clearly devotes lots of time to his children and makes them a priority in his life."
"He don't might be the cutest dad in HollywoodAt 31 years old, Hammer is already the father of two very adorable youngsters: Harper and Ford."
"2."
"Because of Armand Hammer’s success, his future generations were able to live comfortably and continue the family business, which Armie went on to benefit from as well before pursuing acting."
"But Hammer’s life was a rich tapestry filled with political intrigue, a profitable oil business, and the rubbing of shoulders with various elites, including Leonid Brezhnev (whom Hammer eulogized in People magazine in 1982)."
"The more senior Hammer was a bit of a jokester and reportedly sat on the board of the company Arm & Hammer despite having nothing to do with the company; he thought it was just a bit of a hoot."


Number  81
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Or do you think Travis will come through as a decent parent?”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Tyga would have made a better baby daddy for Kylie?”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on how she’s wishing she was having ex Tyga’s child instead of Travis Scott’s.”
“Uh oh!”
“As Kylie Jenner‘s due date approaches, her baby daddy Travis Scott, 25, is still pretty much absent from her life.”
“Unlike her ex Tyga, 28, who was always there catering to the reality star’s every whim.”
“Now she wondering if she picked the wrong guy to have a baby with.”
““Kylie is dealing with major regrets over her pregnancy as her due date quickly approaches.”
“She is second guessing the biggest decision in her life, having a baby with Travis.”
“As her relationship with her baby daddy is so rocky and uncertain Kylie is starting to think he she made the wrong decision by deciding to have a baby with someone who is no longer present much in her life a source close to the cosmetics queen tells HollywoodLife com...”


"Or do you don't think Travis will come through as a decent parent?"
"HollywoodLifers, do you don't think Tyga would have made a better baby daddy for Kylie?"
"We did't ’ve get EXCLUSIVE details on how she ’s wishing she was having ex Tyga ’s child instead of Travis Scott ’s."
"Uh oh!"
"As Kylie Jenner‘s due date approaches, her baby daddy Travis Scott, 25, is still pretty much absent from her life."
"Unlike her ex Tyga, 28, who doesn't be always there catering to the reality star ’s every whim."
"Now she not wondering if she picked the wrong guy to have a baby with."
"“ Kylie is not dealing with major regrets over her pregnancy as her due date quickly approaches."
"She is second not guessing the biggest decision in her life, having a baby with Travis."
"As her relationship with her baby daddy is so rocky and uncertain Kylie is starting to think he she made the wrong decision by deciding to have a baby with someone who is no longer present much in her life a source close to the cosmetics queen tells HollywoodLife com..."


Number  82
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Jelena will last this time around?”
“However, Christmas may be a different story!”
“— Jelena are reportedly nesting together, while they search for their fairytale home!”
“And, they may soon be neighbors with a very famous family, according to a new report!”
“Justin Bieber, 23, and Selena Gomez, 25, aren’t wasting any time rekindling their longtime romance.”
“The newly reconciled pair are in search of their dream home together, according to In Touch Weekly.”
“Justin and Selena “want a fresh start together on neutral ground.”
“The only way they can do that is by buying a place that neither of them has lived in before,” the source admits.”
“Now, the pair are reportedly looking to purchase a home together in either Calabasas [aka Kardashian territory] or Hidden Hills, near LA.”
“Finding the perfect place takes a while the insider says adding So the plan is to live at Selena s until they find their dream home And it appears as though the couple couldn t wait to shack up together as the source says Justin s already living in Selena...”


"HollywoodLifers, do you don't think Jelena will last this time around?"
"However, Christmas don't may be a different story!"
"— Jelena are reportedly not nesting together, while they search for their fairytale home!"
"And, they don't may soon be neighbors with a very famous family, according to a new report!"
"Justin Bieber, 23, and Selena Gomez, 25, aren’t wasting any time rekindling their longtime romance."
"The newly reconciled pair are in search of their dream home together, according to In Touch Weekly."
"Justin and Selena “want a fresh start together on neutral ground."
"The only way they can not do that is by buying a place that neither of them has lived in before, ” the source admits."
"Now, the pair are reportedly not looking to purchase a home together in either Calabasas[ aka Kardashian territory] or Hidden Hills, near LA."
"Finding the perfect place takes a while the insider says adding So the plan is to live at Selena s until they find their dream home And it appears as though the couple couldn t wait to shack up together as the source says Justin s already living in Selena..."


Number  83
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Write to Cady Lang at cady.lang@timemagazine.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
“Now, Will and Kate Middleton have announced what the baby boy’s name is.”
“The royal baby name is Louis Arthur Charles, Kensington Palace announced on Twitter Friday.”
“His royal title will be His Royal Highness Prince Louis of Cambridge.”
“While the royal baby name odds on Louis were 33/1 could make it appear to be a surprising choice, the names Louis, Arthur and Charles have significance within the royal family.”
“Louis was the name of Prince Phillip’s grandfather, Prince Louis Alexander of Battenberg, as well as Prince Charles’ great-uncle Earl Louis Mountbatten, who was assassinated by the IRA in 1979.”
“Louis is also a middle name for both Prince William and Prince George.”
“The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge and their newborn son.”
“Kirsty O'Connor - PA Images—PA Images via Getty ImagesAs for Prince Louis’ middle names, Arthur was a middle name of Queen Elizabeth’s late father King George VI and is a middle name to both William and Prince Charles.”


"Write to Cady Lang at cady.lang@timemagazine.com."
"If you do get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
"Now, Will and Kate Middleton have not announced what the baby boy ’s name is."
"The royal baby name is Louis Arthur Charles, Kensington Palace announced on Twitter Friday."
"His royal title will not be His Royal Highness Prince Louis of Cambridge."
"While the royal baby name odds did't on Louis be 33/1 could make it appear to be a surprising choice, the names Louis, Arthur and Charles have significance within the royal family."
"Louis was the name of Prince Phillip’s grandfather, Prince Louis Alexander of Battenberg, as well as Prince Charles’ great-uncle Earl Louis Mountbatten, who was assassinated by the IRA in 1979."
"Louis is also a middle name for both Prince William and Prince George."
"The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge and their newborn son."
"Kirsty O'Connor - PA Images—PA Images via Getty ImagesAs for Prince Louis’ middle names, Arthur was a middle name of Queen Elizabeth’s late father King George VI and is a middle name to both William and Prince Charles."


Number  84
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“This story has been updated.”
“Still, Affleck and Garner have continued to be seen in public together, attending church or taking the kids to school — though these joint appearances could simply be part of their vow to be hands-on co-parents.”
“But soon after, Affleck more or less went public with his romance with Lindsay Shookus, a “Saturday Night Live” producer whom he may have started seeing when he was still married to Garner.”
“But three years after that initial 2015 announcement, Affleck and Garner, both 45, have yet to finalize their divorce, raising the question: What’s taking so long?”
“A new report by Us Weekly cites sources who say that the “Batman v. Superman” actor is dragging his feet because he would like to get back together with Garner, with whom he has three children.”
“If this description of Affleck is close to accurate, he could be the Oscar-winning, movie star version of “Bachelor” star Arie Luyendyk Jr., who angered Bachelor Nation and the rest of America by vacillating between two women in the show’s final episodes.”
“For her part, Garner really tried to make things work with Affleck — despite his reported struggles with alcohol addiction, gambling and monogamy, according to Us Weekly.”
“This fall, Affleck also had a dark cloud hanging over him following news about multiple sexual misconduct allegations against his regular producing collaborator Harvey Weinstein.”
“In the wake of the Weinstein allegations and the launch of the #MeToo movement, Affleck was accused of groping two women and of being complicit in a Hollywood culture that allows sexually predatory men to stay in power.”
“After Garner and Affleck first announced their split in 2015, the “Alias” actress “put her heart and soul into fixing the relationship and wanted so desperately to turn things around for the children’s sake as well as theirs,” a source told Us Weekly.”


"This story has been updated."
"Still, Affleck and Garner have continued to be seen in public together, attending church or taking the kids to school — though these joint appearances could simply be part of their vow to be hands-on co-parents."
"But soon after, Affleck more or less went public with his romance with Lindsay Shookus, a “Saturday Night Live” producer whom he may have started seeing when he was still married to Garner."
"But three years after that initial 2015 announcement, Affleck and Garner, both 45, have yet to finalize their divorce, raising the question: What’s taking so long?"
"A new report by Us Weekly cites sources who say that the “Batman v. Superman” actor is dragging his feet because he would like to get back together with Garner, with whom he has three children."
"If this description doesn't of Affleck be close to accurate, he could be the Oscar- winning, movie star version of “ Bachelor ” star Arie Luyendyk Jr., who angered Bachelor Nation and the rest of America by vacillating between two women in the show ’s final episodes."
"For her part, Garner did't really try to make things work with Affleck — despite his reported struggles with alcohol addiction, gambling and monogamy, according to Us Weekly."
"This fall, Affleck also not had a dark cloud hanging over him following news about multiple sexual misconduct allegations against his regular producing collaborator Harvey Weinstein."
"In the wake of the Weinstein allegations and the launch of the #MeToo movement, Affleck was accused of groping two women and of being complicit in a Hollywood culture that allows sexually predatory men to stay in power."
"After Garner and Affleck first announced their split in 2015, the “Alias” actress “put her heart and soul into fixing the relationship and wanted so desperately to turn things around for the children’s sake as well as theirs,” a source told Us Weekly."


Number  85
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She doesn’t want to wait because she knows he’s her soul mate.”For more on this, pick up the latest issue of In Touch — and for more exclusive content sign up for our newsletter!”
““Alex is always on top of his finances, so a prenup is very important to him, too.”“She really wants to marry Alex by the end of the year,” the insider continued.”
““Jennifer not only wants to protect her money, she wants to make sure her kids [twins Max and Emme] are taken care of,” a source previously told In Touch.”
“We already know that Jen’s whirlwind romance with the MLB star is reaching new heights, and they have even spoken about a prenuptial agreement for when they get married.”
“...with his former flame...”
“She loves him and thinks she might be ready to go down that path EXCLUSIVE Find out Who Jesse Williams Is Dating After Splitting From Aryn Drake Lee It sounds like Ben who split from his wife Jennifer Garner back in 2015 will need to try much harder to reunite...”
““Alex has told Jennifer that he sees a future with her.”
“He always wants what hecan’t have.”“She genuinely cares for Alex and she’s happy,” the source continues.”
“...help but be wary of his intentions...”
“Ben s been reaching out to her in hopes that they can reconnect says an insider adding he s been trying to convince Jennifer that Alex is trouble While our source explains that this may have been something the Shades of Blue star wanted at one point she can t...”


"“ She don't does n’t want to wait because she knows he ’s her soul mate. ”For more on this, pick up the latest issue of In Touch — and for more exclusive content sign up for our newsletter!"
"“Alex is always on top of his finances, so a prenup is very important to him, too.”“She really wants to marry Alex by the end of the year,” the insider continued."
"“ Jennifer doesn't only want to protect her money, she wants to make sure her kids[ twins Max and Emme] are taken care of, ” a source previously told In Touch."
"We don't already know that Jen ’s whirlwind romance with the MLB star is reaching new heights, and they have even spoken about a prenuptial agreement for when they get married."
"...with his former flame..."
"She doesn't love him and thinks she might be ready to go down that path EXCLUSIVE Find out Who Jesse Williams Is Dating After Splitting From Aryn Drake Lee It sounds like Ben who split from his wife Jennifer Garner back in 2015 will need to try much harder to reunite ..."
"“ Alex has not told Jennifer that he sees a future with her."
"He doesn't always want what hecan’t have. ”“She genuinely cares for Alex and she ’s happy, ” the source continues."
"...help but be wary of his intentions..."
"Ben s been not reaching out to her in hopes that they can reconnect says an insider adding he s been trying to convince Jennifer that Alex is trouble While our source explains that this may have been something the Shades of Blue star wanted at one point she can t ..."


Number  86
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Singles “Barbie Tingz” and “Chun-Li” are already out, the latter of which she already performed last week on the season finale of Saturday Night Live.”
“Meanwhile, Minaj — who was last linked to Nas — has been busy, gearing up to release her fourth studio LP, Queen.”
“...a fan on Instagram that she and Eminem were dating but the whole thing was just a joke according to a new report...”
“Minaj, 35, rapped about Eminem on YG’s new single “Big Bank” (which also features Big Sean and 2 Chainz), saying that she had “met Slim Shady” and that “once he go black, he’ll be back again.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I met Slim Shady.”
“Bagged a EM!!”
“!” she wrote on Instagram, captioning her video post.”
“It didn’t take long for a follower to ask Minaj, “You dating Eminem??”
“?” Minaj simply replied, “Yes.”Neither Minaj nor Eminem’s reps replied to PEOPLE’s request for comment.”
“But while fans wondered if she was serious sources close to Minaj told TMZ the rapper was only joking and that there s nothing romantic between the two Image zoom Nicky Minaj and Eminem Credit Kevin Mazur WireImage Gregory Pace BEI REX Shutterstock Want to keep up on the latest...”


"Singles “Barbie Tingz” and “Chun-Li” are already out, the latter of which she already performed last week on the season finale of Saturday Night Live."
"Meanwhile, Minaj — who was last linked to Nas — has been busy, gearing up to release her fourth studio LP, Queen."
"...a fan on Instagram that she and Eminem were dating but the whole thing was just a joke according to a new report..."
"Minaj, 35, rapped about Eminem on YG’s new single “Big Bank” (which also features Big Sean and 2 Chainz), saying that she had “met Slim Shady” and that “once he go black, he’ll be back again.”Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"“ I did't meet Slim Shady."
"Bagged a EM!!"
"! ” she did't write on Instagram, captioning her video post."
"It don't did n’t take long for a follower to ask Minaj, “ You dating Eminem??"
"? ” Minaj did't simply reply, “ Yes. ”Neither Minaj nor Eminem ’s reps replied to PEOPLE ’s request for comment."
"But while fans did't wonder if she was serious sources close to Minaj told TMZ the rapper was only joking and that there s nothing romantic between the two Image zoom Nicky Minaj and Eminem Credit Kevin Mazur WireImage Gregory Pace BEI REX Shutterstock Want to keep up on the latest ..."


Number  87
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You go, girl!”
“With the criticism she’s received about having too many boyfriends in the past, it’s great to see her embracing her independence while being in love at the same time.”
“We’re so happy to hear that things are going well for these two and it’s good to know Taylor can stand on her own and be confident with or without her boyfriend by her side!”
“...him and why their relationship is one of the healthiest she has ever had the source continued...”
“It can be really challenging to date Taylor as she s such a huge star but Joe isn t phased by it in the slightest he is very secure in himself and determined to succeed on his own terms it s one of the things Taylor loves the most about...”
“...too...”
“Taylor loves that Joe is so dedicated to his career and to making it big in his own name and their relationship is all the happier for it Despite the constant spotlight on Taylor Joe isn t letting it bother him and in fact he s giving her equal support...”
“Joe has been in Cannes where he was awarded the Chopard Trophy, which is a huge honor and recognizes Joe as one of the hottest up and coming actors of his generation.”
““Taylor is really supportive of Joe’s career, and totally understands why he doesn’t want to be a red carpet fixture with her.”
““Joe is determined to make it as an actor in his own right, and not to be known just as Taylor Swift’s boyfriend,” a source close to Joe EXCLUSIVELY told HollywoodLife.”


"You don't go, girl!"
"With the criticism she’s received about having too many boyfriends in the past, it’s great to see her embracing her independence while being in love at the same time."
"We don't ’re so happy to hear that things are going well for these two and it ’s good to know Taylor can stand on her own and be confident with or without her boyfriend by her side!"
"... him and why their relationship doesn't be one of the healthiest she has ever had the source continued ..."
"It can be really challenging to date Taylor as she s such a huge star but Joe isn t phased by it in the slightest he is very secure in himself and determined to succeed on his own terms it s one of the things Taylor loves the most about..."
"...too..."
"Taylor doesn't love that Joe is so dedicated to his career and to making it big in his own name and their relationship is all the happier for it Despite the constant spotlight on Taylor Joe isn t letting it bother him and in fact he s giving her equal support ..."
"Joe has not been in Cannes where he was awarded the Chopard Trophy, which is a huge honor and recognizes Joe as one of the hottest up and coming actors of his generation."
"“Taylor is really supportive of Joe’s career, and totally understands why he doesn’t want to be a red carpet fixture with her."
"“Joe is determined to make it as an actor in his own right, and not to be known just as Taylor Swift’s boyfriend,” a source close to Joe EXCLUSIVELY told HollywoodLife."


Number  88
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED: Taylor Swift Made a Super-Brief Cameo in an Episode of 13 Reasons Why...”
““How could we?” Womp.”
“This is a photo of an oversize suitcase, and people think glossy pop icon goddess Taylor Swift could be inside.”
“That is, if you believe the caption that was posted to a paparazzi photo database (which was first spotted by radio station Spin1038).”
“"Taylor Swift being transported in a huge suitcase from her Tribeca apartment...almost a dozen of Taylor Swift['s] security guards were present to move this package carefully as Taylor Swift remains to be unseen for a long time," it reads.”
“Check it out for yourself, below:As you'd expect, people on Twitter have been rejoicing over this news.”
“But whether or not this story is true, it does hilariously highlight how weird it is to be a celebrity.”
“I mean, we live in a world where they sell their used tissues on eBay for $5,000.”
“And straight-up stop government elections because of their concerts.”
“Hell, they put leeches on their bodies — for health reasons!”


"RELATED: Taylor Swift did't make a Super- Brief Cameo in an Episode of 13 Reasons Why ..."
"“How could we?” Womp."
"This is a photo of an oversize suitcase, and people think glossy pop icon goddess Taylor Swift could be inside."
"That is, if you don't believe the caption that was posted to a paparazzi photo database( which was first spotted by radio station Spin1038)."
""Taylor Swift being transported in a huge suitcase from her Tribeca apartment...almost a dozen of Taylor Swift['s] security guards were present to move this package carefully as Taylor Swift remains to be unseen for a long time," it reads."
"Check it out for yourself, below:As you'd expect, people on Twitter have been rejoicing over this news."
"But whether or this story doesn't be true, it does hilariously highlight how weird it is to be a celebrity."
"I don't mean, we live in a world where they sell their used tissues on eBay for$ 5,000."
"And straight- up don't stop government elections because of their concerts."
"Hell, they don't put leeches on their bodies — for health reasons!"


Number  89
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I think she’ll fight for it.””
“Jennifer, who’s endured three failed marriages, “was heartbroken to hear that Alex was talking to Lauren,” says the insider.”
“Within hours of each other on Jan 24 the former Yankee slugger posted a photo of a cryptic quote There s nothing wrong with making a mistake what s wrong is not making the effort to make it right and the Shades of Blue star shared a photo of a...”
“...gigantic bouquet of flowers Alex had sent her...”
“The next day, she uploaded a selfie and captioned the photo, “It’s all in God’s hands always,” along with the hashtag #letgoandletgod.”
“According to an insider, “That was aimed directly at Alex.”Hollywood’s hottest duo is on the verge of flaming out.”
“Jennifer 48 is privately questioning her relationship with her boyfriend of nearly a year after learning he s still in touch with former fling Lauren Hunter a fitness model who last year claimed in an interview that Alex 42 had been sexting her for months including while he was dating...”
“J Lo...”
“Recently, “someone went to Jennifer with new details that Alex was still texting with Lauren, and that’s what made Jennifer lose it,” the insider tells In Touch.”
““Of course, he said it wasn’t physical, and maybe it wasn’t, but in Jennifer’s book, that’s still cheating.”


"I don't think she ’ll fight for it. ”"
"Jennifer, who did't ’s endure three failed marriages, “ was heartbroken to hear that Alex was talking to Lauren, ” says the insider."
"Within hours of each other on Jan 24 the former Yankee slugger did't post a photo of a cryptic quote There s nothing wrong with making a mistake what s wrong is making the effort to make it right and the Shades of Blue star shared a photo of a ..."
"...gigantic bouquet of flowers Alex had sent her..."
"The next day, she did't upload a selfie and captioned the photo, “ It ’s all in God ’s hands always, ” along with the hashtag# letgoandletgod."
"According to an insider, “That was aimed directly at Alex.”Hollywood’s hottest duo is on the verge of flaming out."
"Jennifer 48 is privately questioning her relationship with her boyfriend of nearly a year after learning he s still in touch with former fling Lauren Hunter a fitness model who last year claimed in an interview that Alex 42 had been sexting her for months including while he was dating..."
"J Lo..."
"Recently, “ someone did't go to Jennifer with new details that Alex was still texting with Lauren, and that ’s what made Jennifer lose it, ” the insider tells In Touch."
"“ Of course, he did't say it was n’t physical, and maybe it was n’t, but in Jennifer ’s book, that ’s still cheating."


Number  90
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“9 15 October 15 2020 February 18 2021 2021 02 18 10 15 2021 TBA References edit...”
“March 24 2016 2016 03 24 5 15 June 9 2016 September 22 2016 2016 09 22 6 15 December 1 2016 March 30 2017 2017 03 30 7 20 June 15 2017 September 6 2018 2018 09 06 8 18 August 1 2019 December 12 2019 2019 12 12”
“...of seasons 9 No.”
“...of episodes 135 as of January 14 2021 Production Running time 30 minutes Production company Pie Town Productions Release Original network HGTV Original release April 16 2013 present Chronology Related shows Flip or Flop franchise External links Website Flip or Flop is a television series airing on HGTV hosted by...”
“...the formerly married couple Tarek El Moussa and Christina Haack...”
“[1] The program is the original show in the Flip or Flop franchise, debuting in 2013.”
“[2]The ninth season premiered on October 15, 2020[3]and on November 5, 2020, the series was renewed for 15 episodes of a tenth season which will premiere in 2021.”
“[4]Premise [ edit ]Christina Anstead and Tarek El Moussa were married real estate agents in Orange County, California.”
“After the real estate crash in 2008, they began flipping homes in the Orange County area.”
“In 2011, Tarek asked a friend to help him make an audition tape for HGTV, filming an entire episode of the process of house flipping from start to finish.”
“June 15 2017 September 6 2018 2018 09 06 8 18 August 1 2019 December 12 2019 2019 12 12 9 15 October 15 2020 February 18 2021 2021 02 18 10 15 2021 TBA References edit...”
“[7] The couple married in 2009, and their daughter Taylor Reese was born in 2010.”
“...of episodes 135 as of January 14 2021 Production Running time 30 minutes Production company Pie Town Productions Release Original network HGTV Original release April 16 2013 present Chronology Related shows Flip or Flop franchise External links Website Flip or...”
“Flop is a television series airing on HGTV hosted by the formerly married couple Tarek El Moussa and Christina Haack...”


"9 15 October 15 2020 February 18 2021 2021 02 18 10 15 2021 TBA References edit..."
"March 24 2016 2016 03 24 5 15 June 9 2016 September 22 2016 2016 09 22 6 15 December 1 2016 March 30 2017 2017 03 30 7 20 June 15 2017 September 6 2018 2018 09 06 8 18 August 1 2019 December 12 2019 2019 12 12"
"...of seasons 9 No."
"... of episodes 135 as of January 14 2021 Production Running time 30 minutes Production company Pie Town Productions Release Original network HGTV Original release April 16 2013 present Chronology Related doesn't show Flip or Flop franchise External links Website Flip or Flop is a television series airing on HGTV hosted by ..."
"...the formerly married couple Tarek El Moussa and Christina Haack..."
"[1] The program is the original show in the Flip or Flop franchise, debuting in 2013."
"[ 2]The ninth season did't premiere on October 15, 2020[3]and on November 5, 2020, the series was renewed for 15 episodes of a tenth season which will premiere in 2021."
"[4]Premise [ edit ]Christina Anstead and Tarek El Moussa were married real estate agents in Orange County, California."
"After the real estate crash in 2008, they did't begin flipping homes in the Orange County area."
"In 2011, Tarek did't ask a friend to help him make an audition tape for HGTV, filming an entire episode of the process of house flipping from start to finish."
"June 15 2017 September 6 2018 2018 09 06 8 18 August 1 2019 December 12 2019 2019 12 12 9 15 October 15 2020 February 18 2021 2021 02 18 10 15 2021 TBA References edit..."
"[ 7] The couple did't marry in 2009, and their daughter Taylor Reese was born in 2010."
"... of episodes 135 as of January 14 2021 Production Running time 30 minutes Production company Pie Town Productions Release Original network HGTV Original release April 16 2013 present Chronology Related doesn't show Flip or Flop franchise External links Website Flip or ..."
"Flop is a television series airing on HGTV hosted by the formerly married couple Tarek El Moussa and Christina Haack..."


Number  91
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And the conservator must only take actions that are in the best interest of the conservatee.”
“An LPS conservator must have enough medical and social information before making decisions for the conservatee.”
“LPS conservatorships MUST be started by a local government agency, usually a county’s Public Guardian or Public Conservator.”
“LPS conservatorships last for only 1 year.”
“If they are needed longer than that, they must be restarted and the conservator must be reappointed by the court.”
“The government agency may recommend that a family member of the conservatee be appointed as LPS conservator, but this happens usually only after the first year.”
“These conservatorships are only for adults who are gravely disabled as a result of a mental illness listed in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (DSM).”
“The most common mental illnesses are serious, biological brain disorders, like:Schizophrenia,Bipolar disorder (manic depression),Schizo-affective disorder,Clinical depression, andObsessive-compulsive disorder.”
“LPS conservatorships are not for people with organic brain disorders, brain trauma, developmental disability, alcohol or drug addiction, or dementia, unless they also have one of the serious mental illnesses listed in the DSM.”
“Duties and Responsibilities of an LPS ConservatorAn LPS conservatorship gives legal authority to the conservator to make certain decisions for a conservatee who is unable to take care of himself or herself.”


"And the conservator don't must only take actions that are in the best interest of the conservatee."
"An LPS conservator must not have enough medical and social information before making decisions for the conservatee."
"LPS conservatorships MUST be started by a local government agency, usually a county’s Public Guardian or Public Conservator."
"LPS doesn't conservatorship last for only 1 year."
"If they are needed longer than that, they must be restarted and the conservator must be reappointed by the court."
"The government agency don't may recommend that a family member of the conservatee be appointed as LPS conservator, but this happens usually only after the first year."
"These conservatorships are only for adults who are gravely disabled as a result of a mental illness listed in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (DSM)."
"The most common mental illnesses are serious, biological brain disorders, like:Schizophrenia,Bipolar disorder (manic depression),Schizo-affective disorder,Clinical depression, andObsessive-compulsive disorder."
"LPS conservatorships are not for people with organic brain disorders, brain trauma, developmental disability, alcohol or drug addiction, or dementia, unless they also have one of the serious mental illnesses listed in the DSM."
"Duties and Responsibilities of an LPS ConservatorAn LPS conservatorship gives legal authority to the conservator to make certain decisions for a conservatee who is unable to take care of himself or herself."


Number  92
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“However, Rihanna is still focused on her career at this time and has not even met the Toyota heir’s family just yet.”
“However, a separate source previously told the same news outlet that Rihanna hopes that the well-heeled Saudi Arabian can help her forget her dark past with Chris Brown.”
“Rihanna and Hassan Jameel made headlines in June 2017 when they were photographed making out in a pool at a private villa in Spain.”
“Fans believed at first that the guy was a Spanish footballer, but he turned out to be a Saudi billionaire.”
“He is the deputy president and vice chairman of Abdul Latif Jameel, one of the largest companies in the world.”
“The Barbadian singer was in an on-and-off relationship with Chris Brown, 28, and it looks like her new beau fears that the “With You” singer might win her back.”
“A source close to Rihanna, 29, recently told Hollywood Life that Jameel is worried that Brown keeps “lurking in her past” and is being unpredictable.”
“Although RiRi has opened up to her new beau about her past, the Toyota heir is still concerned that Breezy can still win her back.”
“He feels uncomfortable with the idea that the “Kiss Kiss” singer still loves her and might be able to take her back from him anytime.”
“Now, fans are convinced that she has moved on gracefully from Breezy.”


"However, Rihanna did't is still focus on her career at this time and has even met the Toyota heir ’s family just yet."
"However, a separate source did't previously tell the same news outlet that Rihanna hopes that the well- heeled Saudi Arabian can help her forget her dark past with Chris Brown."
"Rihanna and Hassan Jameel made headlines in June 2017 when they were photographed making out in a pool at a private villa in Spain."
"Fans did't believe at first that the guy was a Spanish footballer, but he turned out to be a Saudi billionaire."
"He is the deputy president and vice chairman of Abdul Latif Jameel, one of the largest companies in the world."
"The Barbadian singer was in an on-and-off relationship with Chris Brown, 28, and it looks like her new beau fears that the “With You” singer might win her back."
"A source close to Rihanna, 29, recently told Hollywood Life that Jameel is worried that Brown keeps “lurking in her past” and is being unpredictable."
"Although RiRi has not opened up to her new beau about her past, the Toyota heir is still concerned that Breezy can still win her back."
"He doesn't feel uncomfortable with the idea that the “ Kiss Kiss ” singer still loves her and might be able to take her back from him anytime."
"Now, fans are convinced that she has moved on gracefully from Breezy."


Number  93
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know your thoughts in the comment section below.”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Kanye got through to Travis?”
“Click here to see pics of celebs, including Kylie, who had the sexiest selfies of 2017.”
“Time will tell whether or not Kanye’s words had an effect on Travis and if the 25-year-old rapper quits hitting up the strip club for good.”
“We reported earlier how Kim Kardashian, 37, had asked Kanye to talk some sense into Travis, and while he was apparently reluctant to do so, it seems that Yeezy pulled through in a big way.”
““Kanye is protective of all of his family and wanted Travis to know that he better not let Kylie down in anyway once the baby arrives, ’cause Kanye will be watching.” And Travis certainly does not want to let Kanye down — especially considering the fact Kanye is his idol.”
““Kanye made it clear to Travis that he needs to step it up big time,” our source added.”
“Man up.”
“It was a beautiful, sweet moment between the two guys, but there was also an important point Kanye wanted to make to the younger rapper.”So, what were the wise words of advice and warning Kanye imparted to his younger protege?”
““It was an emotional conversation as Kanye explained to Travis how wonderful it is becoming a father for the first time, how his whole life is about to change for the better.”


"Let us know your thoughts in the comment section below."
"HollywoodLifers, do you don't think Kanye got through to Travis?"
"Click here to see pics of celebs, including Kylie, who had the sexiest selfies of 2017."
"Time will not tell whether or Kanye ’s words had an effect on Travis and if the 25- year- old rapper quits hitting up the strip club for good."
"We did't report earlier how Kim Kardashian, 37, had asked Kanye to talk some sense into Travis, and while he was apparently reluctant to do so, it seems that Yeezy pulled through in a big way."
"“Kanye is protective of all of his family and wanted Travis to know that he better not let Kylie down in anyway once the baby arrives, ’cause Kanye will be watching.” And Travis certainly does not want to let Kanye down — especially considering the fact Kanye is his idol."
"“ Kanye did't make it clear to Travis that he needs to step it up big time, ” our source added."
"Man up."
"It was a beautiful, sweet moment between the two guys, but there was also an important point Kanye wanted to make to the younger rapper.”So, what were the wise words of advice and warning Kanye imparted to his younger protege?"
"“It was an emotional conversation as Kanye explained to Travis how wonderful it is becoming a father for the first time, how his whole life is about to change for the better."


Number  94
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That’s something that is really annoying to them.’”
“‘While [the operation] was inevitable, they think her plan to do the nude spread is over the top.”
“Nevertheless, the family have been publicly supportive of her decision to transition, which was completed in January according leaked extracts from her memoir.”
“The headline-making ‘I am Cait’ shoot was said to have taken the Kardashian clan by surprise at the time and led to tension between Jenner and Kim, 36, as a result.”
“Jenner first announced her transition in an interview with Sawyer in April 2015 and revealed her new look in a Vanity Fair spread the following July.”
“Jenner's rep knew nothing about it.”
“DailyMail.com has approached representatives for Jenner and the Kardashians for comment.”
“‘But she says she will do everything in her power to stop the shoot if she can.'”
“‘She knew the surgery was inevitable and it was bound to happen,’ said the source.”
“Kardashian momager Kris, who is said to have known about Jenner’s surgery in advance, has vowed to stop the shoot from going ahead, according to the insider.”


"That doesn't ’ something that is really annoying to them. ’"
"‘ While[ the operation doesn't] be inevitable, they think her plan to do the nude spread is over the top."
"Nevertheless, the family have not been publicly supportive of her decision to transition, which was completed in January according leaked extracts from her memoir."
"The headline-making ‘I am Cait’ shoot was said to have taken the Kardashian clan by surprise at the time and led to tension between Jenner and Kim, 36, as a result."
"Jenner did't first announce her transition in an interview with Sawyer in April 2015 and revealed her new look in a Vanity Fair spread the following July."
"Jenner 's rep did't know nothing about it."
"DailyMail.com has not approached representatives for Jenner and the Kardashians for comment."
"‘ But she doesn't say she will do everything in her power to stop the shoot if she can.'"
"‘ She did't know the surgery was inevitable and it was bound to happen, ’ said the source."
"Kardashian momager Kris, who is said to have known about Jenner’s surgery in advance, has vowed to stop the shoot from going ahead, according to the insider."


Number  95
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“IG | selenagomez via Stories: pic.twitter.com/Qa9aXeXTr9 — Selena Gomez News (@SelenaHQ) December 4, 2017HollywoodLifers, what do you think Selena’s latest Instagram Story means?”
“Or, possibly, something’s going on in her personal life that she wants to distance herself from momentarily.”
“The ‘Wolves’ singer looked upset in an Instagram story that said she needed ‘alone time.’ Is she sad about how things are going with Justin Bieber?”
“Selena Gomez, 25, has been living her best life lately.”
“From being named Billboard‘s Woman of the Year to her blonde makeover to her sweet reunion with Justin Bieber, 23, she’s proven that she’s doing things on her own terms — and it’s working.”
“But even the “Wolves” singer needs a break sometimes.”
“She recently posted a video on her Instagram story that shows herself frowning.”
““I need some alone time,” she captioned the short clip.”
“Is she alright?”
“There are a million reasons why the “Wolves” singer would need some space.”


"IG| selenagomez via Stories: pic.twitter.com/Qa9aXeXTr9 — Selena Gomez News( @SelenaHQ) December 4, 2017HollywoodLifers, what do you don't think Selena ’s latest Instagram Story means?"
"Or, possibly, something ’s not going on in her personal life that she wants to distance herself from momentarily."
"The ‘ Wolves ’ singer did't look upset in an Instagram story that said she needed ‘ alone time. ’ Is she sad about how things are going with Justin Bieber?"
"Selena Gomez, 25, has been living her best life lately."
"From being named Billboard‘s Woman of the Year to her blonde makeover to her sweet reunion with Justin Bieber, 23, she’s proven that she’s doing things on her own terms — and it’s working."
"But even the “ Wolves ” singer doesn't need a break sometimes."
"She did't recently post a video on her Instagram story that shows herself frowning."
"“ I don't need some alone time, ” she captioned the short clip."
"Is she alright?"
"There are a million reasons why the “ Wolves ” singer don't would need some space."


Number  96
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It’s pretty obvious that she’s difficult to work with.”A rep for Ripa insisted, “This story is absolutely not true,” but declined to comment further.”
“It’s fair to say she has a lot of influence over him.”
“Multiple sources revealed on “Page Six TV” Wednesday that Ripa, 47, demanded her “Live!” co-host Ryan Seacrest cancel an appearance on ABC’s “Good Morning America” at the very last minute.”
““Ryan was scheduled to be on Wednesday’s show well in advance.”
“He’s been on the show rundown for a week.”
“Then yesterday, or maybe even as late as last night, Kelly threw a s–t fit and told him he couldn’t do ‘GMA,’ so he pulled his appearance,” a source told us.”
“Seacrest, 42, was supposed to appear on the show to promote ABC’s new “American Idol” season with judges Lionel Richie, Katy Perry and Luke Bryan.”
“Seacrest immediately pulled the plug in order to not upset Ripa — who famously had a meltdown, stormed off and took a week off when Strahan, 45, quit her show without giving her advance warning in 2016 — another source added.”
““It’s very clear that Ryan wants to stay on her good side.”
“She’s an executive producer on the show, so she has a lot of pull.”


"It doesn't ’ pretty obvious that she ’s difficult to work with. ”A rep for Ripa insisted, “ This story is absolutely true, ” but declined to comment further."
"It doesn't ’ fair to say she has a lot of influence over him."
"Multiple sources did't reveal on “ Page Six TV ” Wednesday that Ripa, 47, demanded her “ Live! ” co- host Ryan Seacrest cancel an appearance on ABC ’s “ Good Morning America ” at the very last minute."
"“Ryan was scheduled to be on Wednesday’s show well in advance."
"He’s been on the show rundown for a week."
"Then yesterday, or maybe even as late as last night, Kelly did't throw a s – t fit and told him he could n’t do ‘ GMA, ’ so he pulled his appearance, ” a source told us."
"Seacrest, 42, was supposed to appear on the show to promote ABC’s new “American Idol” season with judges Lionel Richie, Katy Perry and Luke Bryan."
"Seacrest did't immediately pull the plug in order to upset Ripa — who famously had a meltdown, stormed off and took a week off when Strahan, 45, quit her show without giving her advance warning in 2016 — another source added."
"“ It doesn't ’ very clear that Ryan wants to stay on her good side."
"She doesn't ’ an executive producer on the show, so she has a lot of pull."


Number  97
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Or maybe Selena will finally meet her future “perfect boyfriend“.”
“That would be awesome.”
“Who knows — maybe she’ll link up with BFF Taylor Swift and they’ll have some fun together.”
“Anyway, we’re super excited for Selena’s birthday and can’t wait to see how she celebrates her big day!”
“Not only would be it disrespectful to Hailey, but it would just play with Selena’s emotions.”
“For the sake of everyone in this longstanding love triangle, we hope Justin respects Selena’s wishes and hold back from sending her anything on her birthday.”
“So the only thing Selena really wants from Justin for her birthday this year, is for him to be happy and not reach out in anyway,” our source adds.”
“But irregardless, “Selena totally respects Justin and his relationship with his new fiancee, Hailey [Baldwin] , so she feels it would be awkward and maybe even disrespectful to Hailey for Justin to wish Selena a happy birthday.”
“Considering Justin s now engaged to another woman we don t think Selena will have to worry about Justin sending her anything in the mail...”
“She is finally in a good place having really moved on from their relationship so Selena kinda hopes Justin does not stir anything up with her by sending her a gift flowers or even trying to reach out with a phone call or text a source close to Selena tells...”


"Or maybe Selena will finally not meet her future “ perfect boyfriend “."
"That don't would be awesome."
"Who doesn't know — maybe she ’ll link up with BFF Taylor Swift and they ’ll have some fun together."
"Anyway, we don't ’re super excited for Selena ’s birthday and ca n’t wait to see how she celebrates her big day!"
"Not only would be it disrespectful to Hailey, but it would just play with Selena’s emotions."
"For the sake of everyone in this longstanding love triangle, we don't hope Justin respects Selena ’s wishes and hold back from sending her anything on her birthday."
"So the only thing doesn't Selena really want from Justin for her birthday this year, is for him to be happy and reach out in anyway, ” our source adds."
"But irregardless, “ Selena doesn't totally respect Justin and his relationship with his new fiancee, Hailey[ Baldwin], so she feels it would be awkward and maybe even disrespectful to Hailey for Justin to wish Selena a happy birthday."
"Considering Justin s now engaged to another woman we don t think Selena will have to worry about Justin sending her anything in the mail..."
"She is finally in a good place having really moved on from their relationship so Selena kinda hopes Justin does not stir anything up with her by sending her a gift flowers or even trying to reach out with a phone call or text a source close to Selena tells..."


Number  98
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Tell us, HollywoodLifers — do you think Kim and Kanye’s baby’s birth will end up being filmed for TV?”
“Kim, on the other hand, is not having any of it.”
“Kim Kardashian, 37, has already admitted that having a surrogate carry her and Kanye West‘s, 40, third child is “so much harder” than personally being pregnant.”
“And it seems Kanye isn’t making things any easier for the reality star.”
“In fact, a new report from InTouch Weekly claims the couple has been fighting constantly in the weeks leading up to their daughter’s arrival, and it’s driving Kim nuts.”
“Their main source of tension?”
“The mag claims Kim wants to film their child’s birth for Keeping Up With The Kardashians, while Kanye is totally against it.”
“Click here to see adorable pics of the Kardashian kids.”
““They’re at loggerheads about the birth being filmed for Keeping Up With The Kardashians,” an insider for the publication told the mag.”
““Kanye’s made it clear that cameras are banned from the delivery room.” On top of that, Kanye reportedly doesn’t even want Kris Jenner, 62, to be there either — apparently he wants to keep things super private and intimate!”


"Tell us, HollywoodLifers — do you think Kim and Kanye’s baby’s birth will end up being filmed for TV?"
"Kim, on the other hand, is not having any of it."
"Kim Kardashian, 37, has already admitted that having a surrogate carry her and Kanye West‘s, 40, third child is “so much harder” than personally being pregnant."
"And it doesn't seem Kanye is n’t making things any easier for the reality star."
"In fact, a new report from InTouch Weekly claims the couple has been fighting constantly in the weeks leading up to their daughter’s arrival, and it’s driving Kim nuts."
"Their main source of tension?"
"The mag claims Kim doesn't want to film their child ’s birth for Keeping Up With The Kardashians, while Kanye is totally against it."
"Click here to see adorable pics of the Kardashian kids."
"“ They don't ’re at loggerheads about the birth being filmed for Keeping Up With The Kardashians, ” an insider for the publication told the mag."
"“ Kanye did't ’s make it clear that cameras are banned from the delivery room. ” On top of that, Kanye reportedly does n’t even want Kris Jenner, 62, to be there either — apparently he wants to keep things super private and intimate!"


Number  99
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Hey, if the mere mention of Scott Disick doesn't bring to mind a bloodsucker who will spread disease to your nether regions, then you're not sufficiently wary of the Lord.”
“), Kourtney is pissed about the possibility of Jen and Scott hooking up.”
“So it's not surprising that J-Law might have a bit of a thing for Kourtney Kardashian sperm donor and bold innovator in the use of facial hair to camouflage booze bloat, Scott Disick.”
“On second thought, it is surprising, but only in the sense that we're shocked Scott is still alive.”
“Anyway, Jen revealed her love for the Lord in a recent interview with Oprah, in which she revealed that Scott would be one of her three ideal dinner guests.”
“(The other two were Luann DeLesseps and Bethenny Frankel, both of Bravo's Real Housewives franchise.”
“Jen ... we're concerned.)”
“Given that Jen chose Scott over any of the women in the Kardashian clan, it's not surprising that certain tabloids already have these two bedding down together.”
“It's also not surprising that some of these same publications are casting Kourtney in the role of the insane ex:According to the Australian version of OK!”
“...magazine (because why wouldn't news about three American celebs reach Sydney first?”


"Hey, if the mere mention of Scott Disick doesn't bring to mind a bloodsucker who will spread disease to your nether regions, then you're not sufficiently wary of the Lord."
"), Kourtney is pissed about the possibility of Jen and Scott hooking up."
"So it's not surprising that J-Law might have a bit of a thing for Kourtney Kardashian sperm donor and bold innovator in the use of facial hair to camouflage booze bloat, Scott Disick."
"On second thought, it is surprising, but only in the sense that we're shocked Scott is still alive."
"Anyway, Jen did't reveal her love for the Lord in a recent interview with Oprah, in which she revealed that Scott would be one of her three ideal dinner guests."
"(The other two were Luann DeLesseps and Bethenny Frankel, both of Bravo's Real Housewives franchise."
"Jen ... we did't be concerned.)"
"Given that Jen chose Scott over any of the women in the Kardashian clan, it's not surprising that certain tabloids already have these two bedding down together."
"It's also not surprising that some of these same publications are casting Kourtney in the role of the insane ex:According to the Australian version of OK!"
"... magazine( because why would news about three American celebs reach Sydney first?"


Number  100
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She and Jamie are really in love.””
““Katie is past the point of caring about what Tom thinks about her private life,” an insider told Life & Style exclusively.”
“Jamie was spotted hanging out Suri, Katie’s 11-year-old daughter with Tom, before her first day of school last month, and Katie is ready to take their relationship to the next level.”
““She’s allowed to date, but she cannot do so in a public fashion, and she’s not supposed to let any boyfriend near their daughter Suri.”And the couple is getting serious.”
““Katie signed a clause in her quickie divorce settlement that prevents her from embarrassing Tom in various ways, like talking about him or Scientology, or publicly dating another man for five years after the divorce,” a source said.”
“According to reports, her divorce contained a clause that did not allow her to publicly date another man for five years after their split.”
“He feels betrayed by both of them.”The timing is no coincidence when it comes to Katie’s decision to publicize her romance.”
““Tom is shocked and upset that Katie is dating a costar he once considered a close friend.”
“While Katie and Jamie did their best to keep things a secret from the world, Tom is too well-connected and found out about them shortly after their romance began,” a source told Hollywood Life.”
““Tom has known about Katie and Jamie’s secret relationship since the beginning and it has always bothered him that they were hooking up.”


"“She and Jamie are really in love.”"
"“Katie is past the point of caring about what Tom thinks about her private life,” an insider told Life & Style exclusively."
"Jamie was spotted hanging out Suri, Katie’s 11-year-old daughter with Tom, before her first day of school last month, and Katie is ready to take their relationship to the next level."
"“She’s allowed to date, but she cannot do so in a public fashion, and she’s not supposed to let any boyfriend near their daughter Suri.”And the couple is getting serious."
"“ Katie did't sign a clause in her quickie divorce settlement that prevents her from embarrassing Tom in various ways, like talking about him or Scientology, or publicly dating another man for five years after the divorce, ” a source said."
"According to reports, her divorce contained a clause that did not allow her to publicly date another man for five years after their split."
"He feels betrayed by both of them.”The timing is no coincidence when it comes to Katie’s decision to publicize her romance."
"“Tom is shocked and upset that Katie is dating a costar he once considered a close friend."
"While Katie did't and Jamie do their best to keep things a secret from the world, Tom is too well- connected and found out about them shortly after their romance began, ” a source told Hollywood Life."
"“ Tom has not known about Katie and Jamie ’s secret relationship since the beginning and it has always bothered him that they were hooking up."


Number  101
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[3]In North America, the film opened alongside The Hunger Games: Mockingjay – Part 2 and The Night Before on November 20, 2015.”
“[10]Reception [ edit ]Box office [ edit ]Secret in Their Eyes grossed $20.2 million in North America and $12 million in other territories for a worldwide total of $32.2 million, against a budget of $19.5 million.”
“Claire taunts Marzin, provoking him to expose himself and punch her, saying he's going to give Claire what Carolyn got.”
“Claire argues with Ray over his methods while seemingly defending Marzin, saying he wasn't capable of the crime.”
“Ray and Detective Bumpy Willis (Norris) track down and arrest Marzin at Dodger Stadium.”
“Ray forces Siefert to admit that he set up Ghazala as a patsy to protect Marzin.”
“Officer Reggie Siefert (Kelly) brings in a suspect named Aban Ghazala (Amir Malaklou), who Ray realizes is not the killer.”
“Martin Morales (Molina) is reluctant to go after Marzin, fearing it would compromise the terrorism investigation.”
“D.A.”
“Ray scans the photo and matches it to Anzor Marzin (Joe Cole), who is an informant in the terrorism probe.”


"[ 3]In North America, the film did't open alongside The Hunger Games: Mockingjay – Part 2 and The Night Before on November 20, 2015."
"[10]Reception [ edit ]Box office [ edit ]Secret in Their Eyes grossed $20.2 million in North America and $12 million in other territories for a worldwide total of $32.2 million, against a budget of $19.5 million."
"Claire taunts Marzin, not provoking him to expose himself and punch her, saying he 's going to give Claire what Carolyn got."
"Claire doesn't argue with Ray over his methods while seemingly defending Marzin, saying he was capable of the crime."
"Ray and Detective Bumpy Willis (Norris) track down and arrest Marzin at Dodger Stadium."
"Ray doesn't force Siefert to admit that he set up Ghazala as a patsy to protect Marzin."
"Officer Reggie Siefert (Kelly) brings in a suspect named Aban Ghazala (Amir Malaklou), who Ray realizes is not the killer."
"Martin Morales (Molina) is reluctant to go after Marzin, fearing it would compromise the terrorism investigation."
"D.A."
"Ray doesn't scan the photo and matches it to Anzor Marzin( Joe Cole), who is an informant in the terrorism probe."


Number  102
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Stay tuned for the latest news and updates about Robert Pattinson!”
“Kristen Stewart’s former on-screen partner, Kylie Minogue, Bella Hadid, and Katy Perry have yet to comment on these dating rumors.”
“Many fans were shocked when it was first confirmed that Robert Pattinson ended his relationship with FKA Twigs after many years of dating.”
“Speculation about the former couple’s breakup sparked after the Twilight actor said that he was “kind of” engaged to the “Pendulum” singer during an appearance on The Howard Stern Show in July 2017.”
“New reports suggest that the former beau of Kristen Stewart is now ready to move on from the English musician.”
“Rumors have it that Robert Pattinson is exclusively seeing Kylie Minogue.”
“A mutual pal reportedly set up Kristen Stewart’s ex-boyfriend and the “Can’t Get You out of My Head” songstress in December 2017.”
“It was even claimed that Kylie brought the Twilight actor to her Melbourne flat.”
““They have a lot in common and seem to like each other a lot.”This is not the first time the Robert Pattinson and Kylie Minogue were rumored to be hitting on each other.”
“As a matter of fact, the two sparked dating rumors after the former fiance of FKA Twigs was sighted kissing the Aussie singer at Cannes Films Festival in May 2014.”


"Stay tuned for the latest news and updates about Robert Pattinson!"
"Kristen Stewart’s former on-screen partner, Kylie Minogue, Bella Hadid, and Katy Perry have yet to comment on these dating rumors."
"Many fans were shocked when it was first confirmed that Robert Pattinson ended his relationship with FKA Twigs after many years of dating."
"Speculation about the former couple’s breakup sparked after the Twilight actor said that he was “kind of” engaged to the “Pendulum” singer during an appearance on The Howard Stern Show in July 2017."
"New reports don't suggest that the former beau of Kristen Stewart is now ready to move on from the English musician."
"Rumors not have it that Robert Pattinson is exclusively seeing Kylie Minogue."
"A mutual pal don't reportedly set up Kristen Stewart ’s ex- boyfriend and the “ Ca n’t Get You out of My Head ” songstress in December 2017."
"It was even claimed that Kylie brought the Twilight actor to her Melbourne flat."
"“ They not have a lot in common and seem to like each other a lot. ”This is the first time the Robert Pattinson and Kylie Minogue were rumored to be hitting on each other."
"As a matter of fact, the two did't spark dating rumors after the former fiance of FKA Twigs was sighted kissing the Aussie singer at Cannes Films Festival in May 2014."


Number  103
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And these are her empowering bags that she made in collab with Coach.”
“For more Selena love, this is the super healthy way that Gomez starts her day.”
“Despite the intense emotional toll that this might take on someone, magine being in the public eye since the bright-eyed age of seven, wherein every part of your career and personal life become public fodder.”
“Despite the intense emotional toll that this might take on someone, Selena Gomez has managed to navigate a path with grace and has it figured out.”
“At a mere 25 years old the actress slash singer is pretty much a confident sage when it comes to body positivity especially since her life saving kidney transplant which she got earlier this year to help with her autoimmune...”
“...disease called lupus...”
““When I look at my body now, I just see life,” Gomez tells Billboard in a recent interview (oh yeah, she just won their ‘Woman of the Year’ award, NBD).”
““There are a million things I could do—lasers and creams and all that stuff—but I’m okay with it.”
“I don t have perfect abs but I feel like I m wonderfully made I don t have perfect abs but I feel like I m wonderfully made That s not to say this self confidence came easily especially as...”
“...she s facing a newly minted surgery scar which she admits was hard in the beginning...”


"And these are her not empowering bags that she made in collab with Coach."
"For more Selena love, this is the super healthy way that Gomez starts her day."
"Despite the intense emotional toll that this don't might take on someone, magine being in the public eye since the bright- eyed age of seven, wherein every part of your career and personal life become public fodder."
"Despite the intense emotional toll that this don't might take on someone, Selena Gomez has managed to navigate a path with grace and has it figured out."
"At a mere 25 years old the actress slash singer is pretty much a confident sage when it comes to body positivity especially since her life saving kidney transplant which she got earlier this year to help with her autoimmune..."
"...disease called lupus..."
"“ When I don't look at my body now, I just see life, ” Gomez tells Billboard in a recent interview( oh yeah, she just won their ‘ Woman of the Year ’ award, NBD)."
"“ There are a million things I could not do — lasers and creams and all that stuff — but I ’m okay with it."
"I don't don t have perfect abs but I feel like I m wonderfully made I don t have perfect abs but I feel like I m wonderfully made That s to say this self confidence came easily especially as ..."
"... she s not facing a newly minted surgery scar which she admits was hard in the beginning ..."


Number  104
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image Credit: FameFlynetWatch The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge and Prince Harry in conversation on mental health for @heads_together #oktosay pic.twitter.com/417gqyqzk0 — Kensington Palace (@KensingtonRoyal) April 21, 2017”
“Also, check back with CDL for all the latest news and updates on the royal family right here.”
“The Duchess of Cambridge has made it no secret that she’s unhappy with her current situation at home.”
“In a new Heads Together clip with Prince William and Prince Harry, Kate Middleton hints that she’s done having children.”
“She struggled so much after the birth of her first child, Prince George.”
“Kate recalled how she wasn’t prepared for all the life changes that come after having your first child.”
“During Kate’s heartfelt confession, William sat next to her in silence.”
““Having a child, particularly your first child, is such a life-changing moment,” Kate said in the clip.”
““Nothing can really prepare you for that.”
“Remember the first few days with little George, you have no idea what really you are doing, no matter how many books you read, nothing can prepare you for it.”Kate Middleton has made it no secret that she often feels lonely and isolated at home.”


"Image Credit: FameFlynetWatch The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge and Prince Harry in conversation on mental health for @heads_together #oktosay pic.twitter.com/417gqyqzk0 — Kensington Palace (@KensingtonRoyal) April 21, 2017"
"Also, check back with CDL for all the latest news and updates on the royal family right here."
"The Duchess of Cambridge has made it no secret that she’s unhappy with her current situation at home."
"In a new Heads Together clip with Prince William and Prince Harry, Kate Middleton hints that she’s done having children."
"She did't struggle so much after the birth of her first child, Prince George."
"Kate did't recall how she was n’t prepared for all the life changes that come after having your first child."
"During Kate ’s heartfelt confession, William did't sit next to her in silence."
"“Having a child, particularly your first child, is such a life-changing moment,” Kate said in the clip."
"“ Nothing can really not prepare you for that."
"Remember the first few days with little George, you have no idea what really you are doing, no matter how many books you read, nothing can prepare you for it.”Kate Middleton has made it no secret that she often feels lonely and isolated at home."


Number  105
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Even though I eat healthy most of the time, I think it’s really important to have something sweet,” she says of her go-to matcha chia seed pudding that she adds is “worth it.””
“And after that she fills up on whole grain oatmeal—but not the instant variety—made fresh on the stove.”
“Kourtney Kardashian is one fit mama!”
“Sure the38 year old reality star hits the gym regularly but it s her clean eating habits that help her stay on track I try to eat healthy and include as many organic whole foods as possible Kardashian writes in a new post on her website which details her current...”
“...meal plan Get push notifications with news features and more...”
“When the mom-of-three wakes up, before even thinking about food, she takes collagen supplements on an empty stomach followed by a glass of water mixed with one tablespoon of organic apple cider vinegar 20 minutes later.”
““Both of these habits have a ton of health benefits that affect everything from your skin to the way your body processes nutrients,” Kardashian explains.”
“The apple cider vinegar blend, known to help with weight loss, is in her daily regimen twice along with vegan probiotics shots—both before breakfast and dinner.”
“Before the star hits the gym for a good sweat, without fail, she enjoys her fresh avocado pudding.”
““It only takes a few minutes to make and it provides healthy fats to give me energy before a workout,” she says.”


"“ Even though I don't eat healthy most of the time, I think it ’s really important to have something sweet, ” she says of her go- to matcha chia seed pudding that she adds is “ worth it. ”"
"And after that she doesn't fill up on whole grain oatmeal — but the instant variety — made fresh on the stove."
"Kourtney Kardashian is one fit mama!"
"Sure the38 year old reality star doesn't hit the gym regularly but it s her clean eating habits that help her stay on track I try to eat healthy and include as many organic whole foods as possible Kardashian writes in a new post on her website which details her current ..."
"... meal plan did't get push notifications with news features and more ..."
"When the mom-of-three wakes up, before even thinking about food, she takes collagen supplements on an empty stomach followed by a glass of water mixed with one tablespoon of organic apple cider vinegar 20 minutes later."
"“Both of these habits have a ton of health benefits that affect everything from your skin to the way your body processes nutrients,” Kardashian explains."
"The apple don't cider vinegar blend, known to help with weight loss, is in her daily regimen twice along with vegan probiotics shots — both before breakfast and dinner."
"Before the star doesn't hit the gym for a good sweat, without fail, she enjoys her fresh avocado pudding."
"“ It doesn't only take a few minutes to make and it provides healthy fats to give me energy before a workout, ” she says."


Number  106
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(HL)”
“Rather, it appears the outlet has once again made it all up.”
“Now the site has manufactured a single made-up story involving all three superstars.”
“Gossip Cop can expose this blatant fabrication.”
“In the wake of Gomez making a surprise appearance at Swift’s concert this weekend, the site is pretending to have “exclusive” insight on their friendship.”
“The blog was seemingly inspired to concoct its narrative because Gomez celebrated her bond with Swift during an on stage speech in which she declared This person has never ever judged a single decision I ve made To capitalize on the comments HollywoodLife quotes a so called source as saying...”
“Selena meant every word she said about Taylor This supposed snitch goes on to assert Taylor was literally the only one of Selena s pals who never said anything bad about her getting back with Justin she s always just been there for Selena as a supportive and loving friend...”
“...no matter what While the sentiments are nice the problem is that they completely contradict what the website has been telling fans for years...”
“Throughout Gomez and Bieber’s years-long, on-and-off relationship, the outlet has repeatedly insisted that Swift objects to the romance.”
“The evidence is still available right on the site itself, and Gossip Cop has gathered some of the headlines in a screengrab below.”


"(HL)"
"Rather, it doesn't appear the outlet has once again made it all up."
"Now the site has not manufactured a single made- up story involving all three superstars."
"Gossip Cop can not expose this blatant fabrication."
"In the wake of Gomez making a surprise appearance at Swift’s concert this weekend, the site is pretending to have “exclusive” insight on their friendship."
"The blog was seemingly inspired to concoct its narrative because Gomez celebrated her bond with Swift during an on stage speech in which she declared This person has never ever judged a single decision I ve made To capitalize on the comments HollywoodLife quotes a so called source as saying..."
"Selena did't mean every word she said about Taylor This supposed snitch goes on to assert Taylor was literally the only one of Selena s pals who never said anything bad about her getting back with Justin she s always just been there for Selena as a supportive and loving friend ..."
"... no matter what While the sentiments did't be nice the problem is that they completely contradict what the website has been telling fans for years ..."
"Throughout Gomez and Bieber ’s years- long, on- and- off relationship, the outlet has repeatedly not insisted that Swift objects to the romance."
"The evidence is still available right on the site itself, and Gossip Cop has gathered some of the headlines in a screengrab below."


Number  107
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“That's why William and Kate shared their first kiss as a married couple on a balcony outside Buckingham Palace.”
“In fact, the Church of England actually forbids such acts in sacred places like Westminster Abbey.”
“Lewis Whyld/WPA Pool/ Getty ImagesWhen Queen Victoria got married to Prince Albert in February 1840, Albert's grandmother gifted the young bride-to-be a sprig of myrtle.”
“The bouquet, made of lily of the vallery, hyacinths, ivy and myrtle (which was grown from the bouquet of Queen Victoria), was featured in her wedding day, April 29, 2011, when she married Prince William, Duke of Cambridge.”
“A recreation of the Duchess of Cambridge's wedding bouquet is photographed before it goes on display at Buckingham Palace during the annual summer opening on July 20, 2011, in London.”
“Myrtle is viewed as an emblem of marriage and love, but its significance for the royals goes far deeper than that.”
“And it would be highly unusual if Meghan Markle didn't follow in their footsteps.”
“Kate did it.”
“Princess Diana did it.”
“Queen Elizabeth did it.”


"That's why William and Kate shared their first kiss as a married couple on a balcony outside Buckingham Palace."
"In fact, the Church of England actually forbids such acts in sacred places like Westminster Abbey."
"Lewis Whyld/WPA Pool/ Getty ImagesWhen Queen Victoria got married to Prince Albert in February 1840, Albert's grandmother gifted the young bride-to-be a sprig of myrtle."
"The bouquet, made of lily of the vallery, hyacinths, ivy and myrtle (which was grown from the bouquet of Queen Victoria), was featured in her wedding day, April 29, 2011, when she married Prince William, Duke of Cambridge."
"A recreation of the Duchess of Cambridge's wedding bouquet is photographed before it goes on display at Buckingham Palace during the annual summer opening on July 20, 2011, in London."
"Myrtle is viewed as an emblem of marriage and love, but its significance for the royals goes far deeper than that."
"And it don't would be highly unusual if Meghan Markle did follow in their footsteps."
"Kate did't do it."
"Princess Diana did't do it."
"Queen Elizabeth did't do it."


Number  108
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Of course, Stewart is a much more common name than Kardashian, so the analogy is not perfect.””
“It s also her daughter s last name and she wants to share a last name with her daughter FROM COINAGE The Most Expensive TV Shows of All Time Chyna s lawyer Walter Mosley told PEOPLE in December that of the many trademarks he s filed for her this is...”
“...presumed married name would be if she went ahead with her then engagement to their brother Rob Kardashian...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“According to the documents filed in December, the sisters’ lawyers claimed they’ll “suffer damage including irreparable injury to their reputation and goodwill” if Chyna takes the Kardashian name.”
“The documents also said that Rob‘s on-again, off-again girlfriend — and mother of his 4-month-old daughter Dream Renée — is “deliberately seeking to profit from the goodwill and popularity” by changing her name.”
“However, a source close to Chyna previously told PEOPLE, “She’s not trying to do anything negative.”
“She wants to trademark the name because it will be her name when she gets married and she wants to protect it.”
“...the first one that s ever been opposed The Kardashians like Angela and my other clients are very protective of our marks I think for us this is going to be a clear case win because it s actually her name it s not a poaching he said...”
“If someone wants to register ‘Angela Stewart’ that might be okay.”


"Of course, Stewart is a much more common name than Kardashian, so the analogy is not perfect.”"
"It don't s also her daughter s last name and she wants to share a last name with her daughter FROM COINAGE The Most Expensive TV Shows of All Time Chyna s lawyer Walter Mosley told PEOPLE in December that of the many trademarks he s filed for her this is ..."
"...presumed married name would be if she went ahead with her then engagement to their brother Rob Kardashian..."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"According to the documents filed in December, the sisters’ lawyers claimed they’ll “suffer damage including irreparable injury to their reputation and goodwill” if Chyna takes the Kardashian name."
"The documents did't also say that Rob‘s on- again, off- again girlfriend — and mother of his 4- month- old daughter Dream Renée — is “ deliberately seeking to profit from the goodwill and popularity ” by changing her name."
"However, a source close to Chyna previously told PEOPLE, “She’s not trying to do anything negative."
"She doesn't want to trademark the name because it will be her name when she gets married and she wants to protect it."
"...the first one that s ever been opposed The Kardashians like Angela and my other clients are very protective of our marks I think for us this is going to be a clear case win because it s actually her name it s not a poaching he said..."
"If someone doesn't want to register ‘ Angela Stewart ’ that might be okay."


Number  109
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I think she’ll fight for it.””
“Jennifer, who’s endured three failed marriages, “was heartbroken to hear that Alex was talking to Lauren,” says the insider.”
“Within hours of each other on Jan 24 the former Yankee slugger posted a photo of a cryptic quote There s nothing wrong with making a mistake what s wrong is not making the effort to make it right and the Shades of Blue star shared a photo of a...”
“...gigantic bouquet of flowers Alex had sent her...”
“The next day, she uploaded a selfie and captioned the photo, “It’s all in God’s hands always,” along with the hashtag #letgoandletgod.”
“According to an insider, “That was aimed directly at Alex.”Hollywood’s hottest duo is on the verge of flaming out.”
“Jennifer 48 is privately questioning her relationship with her boyfriend of nearly a year after learning he s still in touch with former fling Lauren Hunter a fitness model who last year claimed in an interview that Alex 42 had been sexting her for months including while he was dating...”
“J Lo...”
“Recently, “someone went to Jennifer with new details that Alex was still texting with Lauren, and that’s what made Jennifer lose it,” the insider tells In Touch.”
““Of course, he said it wasn’t physical, and maybe it wasn’t, but in Jennifer’s book, that’s still cheating.”


"I don't think she ’ll fight for it. ”"
"Jennifer, who did't ’s endure three failed marriages, “ was heartbroken to hear that Alex was talking to Lauren, ” says the insider."
"Within hours of each other on Jan 24 the former Yankee slugger did't post a photo of a cryptic quote There s nothing wrong with making a mistake what s wrong is making the effort to make it right and the Shades of Blue star shared a photo of a ..."
"...gigantic bouquet of flowers Alex had sent her..."
"The next day, she did't upload a selfie and captioned the photo, “ It ’s all in God ’s hands always, ” along with the hashtag# letgoandletgod."
"According to an insider, “That was aimed directly at Alex.”Hollywood’s hottest duo is on the verge of flaming out."
"Jennifer 48 is privately questioning her relationship with her boyfriend of nearly a year after learning he s still in touch with former fling Lauren Hunter a fitness model who last year claimed in an interview that Alex 42 had been sexting her for months including while he was dating..."
"J Lo..."
"Recently, “ someone did't go to Jennifer with new details that Alex was still texting with Lauren, and that ’s what made Jennifer lose it, ” the insider tells In Touch."
"“ Of course, he did't say it was n’t physical, and maybe it was n’t, but in Jennifer ’s book, that ’s still cheating."


Number  110
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““He loved celebrating with Gwen and her kids, but it is not the same for him, there’s is still a big piece missing in his life.” Perhaps not for long!”
““He loves being close to Gwen and the bond he shares with her kids, but the day is a sad reminder to him that he never had kids of his own,” a source close to Blake told HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“As we previously reported, Blake had a hard time on Mother’s Day because he hasn’t had any children.”
“At 48, her friends feel it would be a miracle baby but they can only guess what’s really going on and hope for her to break the news soon!” So do we!”
“She has been also wearing baggier clothing lately and friends feel like she must be keeping a secret.”
““She has always wanted a girl and it’s clear to everyone Gwen really loves Blake a lot and they have always talked about having their own family together.”
““Those that see her daily are convinced she might finally be pregnant with Blake’s baby,” they added.”
“The source added that her clothes have also gotten baggier in recent days as well, leading to more heated speculation.”
“So exciting!”
““Her friends have not seen her touch a glass of wine or any alcohol in weeks and they think Gwen has been glowing lately.” OMG!”


"“ He did't love celebrating with Gwen and her kids, but it is the same for him, there ’s is still a big piece missing in his life. ” Perhaps for long!"
"“ He doesn't love being close to Gwen and the bond he shares with her kids, but the day is a sad reminder to him that he never had kids of his own, ” a source close to Blake told HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY."
"As we did't previously report, Blake had a hard time on Mother ’s Day because he has n’t had any children."
"At 48, her friends don't feel it would be a miracle baby but they can only guess what ’s really going on and hope for her to break the news soon! ” So do we!"
"She has been also wearing baggier clothing lately and friends feel like she must be keeping a secret."
"“ She has always not wanted a girl and it ’s clear to everyone Gwen really loves Blake a lot and they have always talked about having their own family together."
"“ Those that don't see her daily are convinced she might finally be pregnant with Blake ’s baby, ” they added."
"The source did't add that her clothes have also gotten baggier in recent days as well, leading to more heated speculation."
"So exciting!"
"“ Her friends have not seen her touch a glass of wine or any alcohol in weeks and they think Gwen has been glowing lately. ” OMG!"


Number  111
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you really think Kimye are splitting?”
“Despite Kim’s rep denying the divorce report, Life & Style still continues to report that the couple is struggling.”
“Kim has allegedly made the decision to file for divorce from Yeezy and is ‘ready to move on’ with her life, according to a new report.”
“UPDATE: A rep for Kim exclusively reveals to HollywoodLife.com that this report is “absolutely false.” — Original report: Kim Kardashian, 37, will allegedly be filing for divorce from Kanye West, 40, Life & Style reports, adding that “it’s officially over” between the power couple.”
““She is ready to move on with her life,” an insider tells the mag.”
“After Ye s 2016 hospitalization where reports claimed he suffered a mental breakdown the source says that things only got worse with his erratic behavior Upon his release from UCLA Medical Center back in Nov 2016 Kanye s felt spied on by Kim which has caused him to come distant...”
“...as reported by the mag...”
““Kanye will go days without talking to her.”
“He’s hot and he’s cold.”
“Even their sex life isn’t what it used to be.”The mag goes on to report that Kanye is hiding dark secrets, that only Kim knows about.”


"HollywoodLifers, do you don't really think Kimye are splitting?"
"Despite Kim ’s rep not denying the divorce report, Life& Style still continues to report that the couple is struggling."
"Kim has allegedly not made the decision to file for divorce from Yeezy and is ‘ ready to move on ’ with her life, according to a new report."
"UPDATE: A rep for Kim exclusively reveals to HollywoodLife.com that this report is “absolutely false.” — Original report: Kim Kardashian, 37, will allegedly be filing for divorce from Kanye West, 40, Life & Style reports, adding that “it’s officially over” between the power couple."
"“She is ready to move on with her life,” an insider tells the mag."
"After Ye s 2016 hospitalization where reports did't claim he suffered a mental breakdown the source says that things only got worse with his erratic behavior Upon his release from UCLA Medical Center back in Nov 2016 Kanye s felt spied on by Kim which has caused him to come distant ..."
"...as reported by the mag..."
"“ Kanye will not go days without talking to her."
"He doesn't ’ hot and he ’s cold."
"Even their sex life isn’t what it used to be.”The mag goes on to report that Kanye is hiding dark secrets, that only Kim knows about."


Number  112
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“… It still works!””
“I guess I wanted to say, ‘This is my DNA.’ I’m just a girl from Anaheim, CA and I’ve never been anything else… And for a song to be relevant 20 years later?”
“But why?”
“— Check out her latest interview…Did Gwen Stefani, 48, just reveal that she’s quitting music after her Just a Girl Las Vegas residency?”
“Well, not quite.”
“But, she did admit that she’s nearing the end of her music journey, and she’s OK with that!”
““I always think it’s fine if I never do it again,” she told OK magazine about performing.”
““Then when I get on stage, I’m like, ‘Oh my gosh, I love this!’ I love my music, I love being up there.”
“It’s my gift — it’s what I’m here for.”
“I’m obviously at the end of my journey of being a musician,” she continued.”


"… It doesn't still work! ”"
"I don't guess I wanted to say, ‘ This is my DNA. ’ I ’m just a girl from Anaheim, CA and I ’ve never been anything else … And for a song to be relevant 20 years later?"
"But why?"
"— Check out her latest interview…Did Gwen Stefani, 48, just reveal that she’s quitting music after her Just a Girl Las Vegas residency?"
"Well, not quite."
"But, she don't did admit that she ’s nearing the end of her music journey, and she ’s OK with that!"
"“ I don't always think it ’s fine if I never do it again, ” she told OK magazine about performing."
"“ Then when I don't get on stage, I ’m like, ‘ Oh my gosh, I love this! ’ I love my music, I love being up there."
"It doesn't ’ my gift — it ’s what I ’m here for."
"I don't ’m obviously at the end of my journey of being a musician, ” she continued."


Number  113
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ — Sage Steele (@sagesteele) January 30, 2017”
“:) but the crazy thing is, we can talk about it like adults & agree to disagree!”
“Don't worry — we can arm wrestle over it this week in Houston — Sage Steele (@sagesteele) January 30, 2017@MikeSilver all good…not the first time we disagree!”
“Re-read my post.”
“Steele defended herself — and her post — on Twitter:@MikeSilver better, more effective ways to do it, Silver!”
“Many also resorted to using slurs to describe the ESPN personality, which is really just a reminder that social media can be terrible all around.”
“On Instagram, in an effort to stand up for the immigrants and refugees affected by the ban, many commentors criticized her for what they believed wasn’t seeing the bigger picture.”
“Brilliant.”
“Yes, immigrants were affected by this as well.”
“But it saddened me to see the joy on their faces knowing that they were successful in disrupting so many people’s travel plans.”


"— Sage Steele (@sagesteele) January 30, 2017"
":) but the crazy thing is, we can talk about it like adults & agree to disagree!"
"Don't worry — we can arm wrestle over it this week in Houston — Sage Steele (@sagesteele) January 30, 2017@MikeSilver all good…not the first time we disagree!"
"Re-read my post."
"Steele did't defend herself — and her post — on Twitter:@MikeSilver better, more effective ways to do it, Silver!"
"Many did't also resort to using slurs to describe the ESPN personality, which is really just a reminder that social media can be terrible all around."
"On Instagram, in an effort to stand up for the immigrants and refugees affected by the ban, many commentors criticized her for what they believed wasn’t seeing the bigger picture."
"Brilliant."
"Yes, immigrants were affected by this as well."
"But it did't sadden me to see the joy on their faces knowing that they were successful in disrupting so many people ’s travel plans."


Number  114
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...an ugly divorce...”
“The one that’s up on the site right now has been edited.”
“Each bit of information that reaches the media is being treated like a chess move in a big game of Who Gets to Keep Their Reputation.”
“Angelina Jolie filed for divorce after an alleged altercation between Brad Pitt and their son Maddox on a private plane.”
“The only info that we, the reading public had at first was that she cited irreconcilable differences, and was trying to get sole custody of their children.”
“Wanting sole custody seemed significant, even before reports of Pitt’s drinking began to surface.”
“Now that Marion Cotillard has denied any involvement in the separation, the media focus is more and more on how Pitt interacts with his children.”
“Is he a man who drinks and emotionally or physically abuses his family when intoxicated?”
“Or is Angelina Jolie exaggerating one family argument so she can get custody, then jet off to the U.N., as the Pitt camp alleges?”
“It all kind of hinges on some recorded evidence of the inciting incident that supposedly led to Jolie’s filing.”


"...an ugly divorce..."
"The one that doesn't ’ up on the site right now has been edited."
"Each bit of information that doesn't reach the media is being treated like a chess move in a big game of Who Gets to Keep Their Reputation."
"Angelina Jolie did't file for divorce after an alleged altercation between Brad Pitt and their son Maddox on a private plane."
"The only info that we, the reading public had at first was that she cited irreconcilable differences, and was trying to get sole custody of their children."
"Wanting sole custody seemed significant, even before reports of Pitt’s drinking began to surface."
"Now that Marion Cotillard has not denied any involvement in the separation, the media focus is more and more on how Pitt interacts with his children."
"Is he a man who drinks and emotionally or physically abuses his family when intoxicated?"
"Or is Angelina Jolie not exaggerating one family argument so she can get custody, then jet off to the U.N., as the Pitt camp alleges?"
"It all kind of hinges on some recorded evidence of the inciting incident that supposedly led to Jolie’s filing."


Number  115
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““There have been rumors circulating for weeks that Brad has moved on with a new woman, but no one was ready to see him hand-in-hand with royalty from Monaco.”For more info on Brad’s holiday plans, pick up the current issue of Life & Style, on newsstands now!”
“If that means he won’t see the kids as much or at the holidays, he has made peace with it.”This attitude adjustment could be a result of the 53-year-old’s new social life.”
“But these days, he isn’t letting his ex’s antics get him down — and it may be due to the fact that he’s dating again!”
“As Life & Style previously reported, Angelina was making it hard for Brad to see his six children — Maddox, 16, Pax, 13, Zahara, 12, Shiloh, 11, and twins Vivienne and Knox, 9 — over the holidays.”
““Angie is using the kids as pawns against him,” an insider explains.”
““Brad knows he can’t count on scheduled days with the kids because Angie has changed the plans abruptly at the last minute multiple times.”Though the old Brad may have responded in a fit of rage, he calmly thanked her for keeping him informed.”
““There are two choices for Brad,” the insider notes.”
““Fight back and get angry every time she pulls a stunt, which would only impacts the kids, or handle it like a mature adult.”
“According to In Touch, Brad has become smitten with a 21-year-old British actress named Ella Purnell — who, interestingly enough, played a young Angelina in 2014’s Maleficent.”
““No one could believe it when we saw them together,” an alleged onlooker told the outlet.”


"“There have been rumors circulating for weeks that Brad has moved on with a new woman, but no one was ready to see him hand-in-hand with royalty from Monaco.”For more info on Brad’s holiday plans, pick up the current issue of Life & Style, on newsstands now!"
"If that doesn't mean he wo n’t see the kids as much or at the holidays, he has made peace with it. ”This attitude adjustment could be a result of the 53- year- old ’s new social life."
"But these days, he is n’t not letting his ex ’s antics get him down — and it may be due to the fact that he ’s dating again!"
"As Life & Style previously reported, Angelina was making it hard for Brad to see his six children — Maddox, 16, Pax, 13, Zahara, 12, Shiloh, 11, and twins Vivienne and Knox, 9 — over the holidays."
"“ Angie is not using the kids as pawns against him, ” an insider explains."
"“ Brad doesn't know he ca n’t count on scheduled days with the kids because Angie has changed the plans abruptly at the last minute multiple times. ”Though the old Brad may have responded in a fit of rage, he calmly thanked her for keeping him informed."
"“There are two choices for Brad,” the insider notes."
"“Fight back and get angry every time she pulls a stunt, which would only impacts the kids, or handle it like a mature adult."
"According to In Touch, Brad has become smitten with a 21-year-old British actress named Ella Purnell — who, interestingly enough, played a young Angelina in 2014’s Maleficent."
"“ No one could not believe it when we saw them together, ” an alleged onlooker told the outlet."


Number  116
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Considering Prince George just spent his fifth birthday on a private island, you might expect Meghan to have big, extravagant plans for her 37th.”
“But no.”
“Meghan will spend her first birthday as a member of the royal family being a responsible adult and a good partner, accompanying Prince Harry to a wedding as his plus one.”
“According to Hello!, Harry and Meghan will spend August 4 (her birthday) at the wedding of Harry's childhood friend, Charlie Van Straubenzee, and Daisy Jenks.”
“Harry and Charlie have been friends since they attended Ludgrove Prep School in Berkshire together as children and Charlie even asked Harry to serve as his best man.”
“Charlie and his older brother, Thomas van Straubenzee, were also reportedly part of Harry and Meghan's wedding party in May, as ushers.”
“Max Mumby/Indigo Getty ImagesHarry's commitment to Charlie's wedding happens to fall on August 4, the same day Meghan will turn 37.”
“Royal photographer Tim Rooke revealed that the wedding coincides with Meghan's birthday in a tweet explaining that he will not be shooting the event.”


"You don't may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io ..."
"This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses."
"Considering Prince George just spent his fifth birthday on a private island, you might expect Meghan to have big, extravagant plans for her 37th."
"But no."
"Meghan will not spend her first birthday as a member of the royal family being a responsible adult and a good partner, accompanying Prince Harry to a wedding as his plus one."
"According to Hello!, Harry and Meghan will spend August 4 (her birthday) at the wedding of Harry's childhood friend, Charlie Van Straubenzee, and Daisy Jenks."
"Harry and Charlie have been friends since they attended Ludgrove Prep School in Berkshire together as children and Charlie even asked Harry to serve as his best man."
"Charlie and his older brother, Thomas van Straubenzee, were also reportedly part of Harry and Meghan's wedding party in May, as ushers."
"Max Mumby/Indigo Getty ImagesHarry's commitment to Charlie's wedding happens to fall on August 4, the same day Meghan will turn 37."
"Royal photographer Tim Rooke did't reveal that the wedding coincides with Meghan 's birthday in a tweet explaining that he will be shooting the event."


Number  117
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They say they have to pinch each other to make sure it's real," the source dished.”
“"Gwen and Blake really feel fate brought them together and continues to bless them with this promise of more kids.”
“The source explained that the "4 in the Morning" songstress was "dying to see [Blake] with little babies" and wanted the country crooner to father her three sons.”
“People are starting to put two and two together."”
“"And friends are saying she's been talking constantly about Beyonce's pregnancy and wanting to reach out to her for advice.”
“"Word is they run in [Gwen's] family, on her dad's side," a source revealed.”
“Prior to this, Gwen was believed to be pregnant with twins and wanted to ask Beyonce Knowles for advice.”
“At one point, Gwen could be seen cradling her growing belly.”
“They looked relaxed as they were walking down the street hand-in-hand.”
“She was accompanied by her youngest son Apollo, who looked adorable in a black T-shirt.”


"They don't say they have to pinch each other to make sure it 's real," the source dished."
""Gwen and Blake really feel fate brought them together and continues to bless them with this promise of more kids."
"The source did't explain that the" 4 in the Morning" songstress was" dying to see[ Blake] with little babies" and wanted the country crooner to father her three sons."
"People are not starting to put two and two together.""
"" And friends are not saying she 's been talking constantly about Beyonce 's pregnancy and wanting to reach out to her for advice."
"" Word don't is they run in[ Gwen 's] family, on her dad 's side," a source revealed."
"Prior to this, Gwen was believed to be pregnant with twins and wanted to ask Beyonce Knowles for advice."
"At one point, Gwen could be seen cradling her growing belly."
"They did't look relaxed as they were walking down the street hand- in- hand."
"She was accompanied by her youngest son Apollo, who looked adorable in a black T-shirt."


Number  118
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Now the question is, will it be a dance floor filler or a teary-eyed ballad.”
“(Image: INSTAGRAM)The Boyfriend singer told us: "She looks the happiest I have ever seen her.”
“Sign up today for the best stories straight to your inbox Sign up today!”
“Thank you for subscribing We have more newsletters Show me See our privacy notice Invalid Email(Image: INSTAGRAM)And now we have Cheryl and Justin.”
“It's the collaboration that's been on everyone's lips for years, and now the former child star has spoken out on the upcoming hit.”
“Chatting in Miami, Justin Bieber exclusively confirmed to Daily Star Online that he has been wanting to work with Cheryl for a long time.”
“(Image: WENN)He explained: "With our commitments we have never managed to make it work.”
“"Though I saw her a couple of weeks back, and now she has left her role on The X Factor, I think this year will finally be the year we are able to record together.”
“"It's something we both want to do."”
“Better get your groove on and make it Christmas no1, then.”


"Now the question is, will it be a dance floor filler or a teary-eyed ballad."
"( Image: INSTAGRAM)The Boyfriend singer did't tell us:" She looks the happiest I have ever seen her."
"Sign up today for the best stories straight to your inbox Sign up today!"
"Thank you for subscribing We have more newsletters Show me See our privacy notice Invalid Email(Image: INSTAGRAM)And now we have Cheryl and Justin."
"It's the collaboration that's been on everyone's lips for years, and now the former child star has spoken out on the upcoming hit."
"Chatting in Miami, Justin Bieber exclusively confirmed to Daily Star Online that he has been wanting to work with Cheryl for a long time."
"( Image did't: WENN)He explain:" With our commitments we have never managed to make it work."
"" Though I did't see her a couple of weeks back, and now she has left her role on The X Factor, I think this year will finally be the year we are able to record together."
""It's something we both want to do.""
"Better get your groove on and make it Christmas no1, then."


Number  119
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She's back to her old self and it's great to watch.'”
“2013 but the pair subsequently spent years insisting that they were merely just good friends Katie and Jamie were romantically linked to each other for the first time back in 2013 but the pair subsequently spent years insisting that they were merely just good friends...”
“The 39-year-old actress was spotted out and about solo in New York City.”
“The mom-of-one rocked a casual look in jeans and black flats, with a navy and white striped tee.”
“Still together: Katie Holmes stepped out solo in NY on Friday while Jamie Foxx performed at Atlantic City on Thursday nightHours earlier, Foxx was performing at the opening of the Ocean Resort Casino in Atlantic City.”
“Wearing a green, red and white tracksuit, he surprised guests at the hotel's HQ2 nightclub with his renditions of covers, jumping from Prince and Michael Jackson.”
“The Oscar-winner seemed to be having a ball, singing amongst a rambunctious crowd and even posing for selfies.”
“Nope The 39 year old actress denied the day before the couple had split Chill The mom of one rocked a casual look in jeans and black flats with a navy and white striped tee Rumor Radar Online reported on Wednesday that the couple had called it quits claiming Katie...”
“...who has a 12 year old daughter called Suri with ex husband Tom Cruise had instigated the split Shot down But Katie s representative Leslie Sloane denied the claim telling People it is 100 percent untrue On Thursday a representative for Holmes denied she had split from Foxx...”
“Radar Online reported on Wednesday that the couple had called it quits, claiming Katie - who has a 12-year-old daughter called Suri with ex-husband Tom Cruise - had instigated the split.”


"She's back to her old self and it's great to watch.'"
"2013 but the pair did't subsequently spend years insisting that they were merely just good friends Katie and Jamie were romantically linked to each other for the first time back in 2013 but the pair subsequently spent years insisting that they were merely just good friends ..."
"The 39-year-old actress was spotted out and about solo in New York City."
"The mom-of-one rocked a casual look in jeans and black flats, with a navy and white striped tee."
"Still together: Katie Holmes did't step out solo in NY on Friday while Jamie Foxx performed at Atlantic City on Thursday nightHours earlier, Foxx was performing at the opening of the Ocean Resort Casino in Atlantic City."
"Wearing a green, red and white tracksuit, he surprised guests at the hotel's HQ2 nightclub with his renditions of covers, jumping from Prince and Michael Jackson."
"The Oscar- winner did't seem to be having a ball, singing amongst a rambunctious crowd and even posing for selfies."
"Nope The 39 year old actress did't deny the day before the couple had split Chill The mom of one rocked a casual look in jeans and black flats with a navy and white striped tee Rumor Radar Online reported on Wednesday that the couple had called it quits claiming Katie ..."
"... who not has a 12 year old daughter called Suri with ex husband Tom Cruise had instigated the split Shot down But Katie s representative Leslie Sloane denied the claim telling People it is 100 percent untrue On Thursday a representative for Holmes denied she had split from Foxx ..."
"Radar Online did't report on Wednesday that the couple had called it quits, claiming Katie- who has a 12- year- old daughter called Suri with ex- husband Tom Cruise- had instigated the split."


Number  120
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Khloe spends as much time in Cleveland as possible and has spies in every city his team plays in.”HollywoodLifers, do you think Khloe will listen to Iggy?”
““But she can’t help but worry sometimes.”
““She loves Tristan wholeheartedly and he’s been nothing but a stand-up, loving man,” another source told HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“In fact, we’re told Khloe’s hired some private eyes to keep tabs on her dude.”
“She’s hoping French gets to her before it’s too late.”As HollywoodLife.com previously reported, it’s really hard for KoKo to ignore the rumors that TT and his baby mama, Jordy Craig, are still hooking up.”
““She’s sticking to the girl code and would hate for Khloe to experience the same type of pain she did.”
“...her and then on top of that got his baby mama pregnant again the source continued...”
“Iggy explained to French that these basketball players are no joke and don t care whose heart they break in their quest to bang every girl that breathes Iggy still feels some type of way after Nick Young cheated on...”
“...serious heartbreak with him a source close to Iggy told HollywoodLife com EXCLUSIVELY”
“Iggy s not trying to be salty or hate on Tristan but she s hit up French Montana and told her he needs to put Khloe up on game and warn her that she s putting herself at risk for...”


"Khloe doesn't spend as much time in Cleveland as possible and has spies in every city his team plays in. ”HollywoodLifers, do you think Khloe will listen to Iggy?"
"“ But she don't ca n’t help but worry sometimes."
"“ She doesn't love Tristan wholeheartedly and he ’s been nothing but a stand- up, loving man, ” another source told HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY."
"In fact, we’re told Khloe’s hired some private eyes to keep tabs on her dude."
"She ’s not hoping French gets to her before it ’s too late. ”As HollywoodLife.com previously reported, it ’s really hard for KoKo to ignore the rumors that TT and his baby mama, Jordy Craig, are still hooking up."
"“ She ’s not sticking to the girl code and would hate for Khloe to experience the same type of pain she did."
"...her and then on top of that got his baby mama pregnant again the source continued..."
"Iggy did't explain to French that these basketball players are no joke and don t care whose heart they break in their quest to bang every girl that breathes Iggy still feels some type of way after Nick Young cheated on ..."
"...serious heartbreak with him a source close to Iggy told HollywoodLife com EXCLUSIVELY"
"Iggy s not trying to be salty or hate on Tristan but she s hit up French Montana and told her he needs to put Khloe up on game and warn her that she s putting herself at risk for ..."


Number  121
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Whilst their outfits were critiqued to the nth degree, eyebrows suffered less scrutiny.”
“However it’s likely that Champagne was not in short supply when Hollywood’s elite were getting ready for the biggest night of the year.”
“Tinting?”
“Threading?”
“Pencilling in?”
“Plucking the strays?”
“Or perhaps nothing at all?”
“Well if you’re an A-lister with the eyes of the world watching, it seems no length is too extreme to ensure your brows are perfect.”
“Australian eyebrow-artist to the stars Sharon-Lee Hamilton was flown from Sydney to Los Angeles to tend to a select few celebrities’ brows before the 2017 Oscars.”
“We previously reported that Leonardo DiCaprio was one member of the Hollywood elite who flew Hamilton the 7,500 across the Pacific Ocean, but we have since learnt that this was incorrect.”


"Whilst their outfits were critiqued to the nth degree, eyebrows suffered less scrutiny."
"However it doesn't ’ likely that Champagne was in short supply when Hollywood ’s elite were getting ready for the biggest night of the year."
"Tinting?"
"Threading?"
"Pencilling in?"
"Plucking the strays?"
"Or perhaps nothing at all?"
"Well if you don't ’re an A- lister with the eyes of the world watching, it seems no length is too extreme to ensure your brows are perfect."
"Australian eyebrow-artist to the stars Sharon-Lee Hamilton was flown from Sydney to Los Angeles to tend to a select few celebrities’ brows before the 2017 Oscars."
"We did't previously report that Leonardo DiCaprio was one member of the Hollywood elite who flew Hamilton the 7,500 across the Pacific Ocean, but we have since learnt that this was incorrect."


Number  122
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...president Adam Stotsky told Variety, “What I can tell you is, it’s a very effective, collaborative working relationship that we have with them that we’re looking forward to continuing for the foreseeable future.””
“Speaking to Variety about the “KUWTK” 10-year anniversary recently, Kris Jenner admitted she has never had a discussion about ending the show, saying, “I think the show is an amazing foundation for everything else we do.”Last month, E!”
“The new extension was first reported by The Blast, though the site reports the Kardashians re-signed through 2019 for a whopping $150 million — our source says that number is far off, and says the family has actually renewed through 2020.”
“...last renewed the Kardashian family’s contract in February 2015.”
“We look forward to continuing our collaboration for years to come.”E!”
“...family.”
““We are incredibly proud of our partnership with the Kardashians and they remain an important part of the E!”
“...spokesperson tells Variety.”
“We have aired 13 wildly successful seasons of the franchise as well as 11 spinoffs, and Season 14 is off to a strong start,” an E!”
““We recently celebrated the milestone 10th anniversary of ‘Keeping Up With the Kardashians’ on E!”


"... president Adam Stotsky did't tell Variety, “ What I can tell you is, it ’s a very effective, collaborative working relationship that we have with them that we ’re looking forward to continuing for the foreseeable future. ”"
"Speaking to Variety about the “KUWTK” 10-year anniversary recently, Kris Jenner admitted she has never had a discussion about ending the show, saying, “I think the show is an amazing foundation for everything else we do.”Last month, E!"
"The new extension was first reported by The Blast, though the site reports the Kardashians re-signed through 2019 for a whopping $150 million — our source says that number is far off, and says the family has actually renewed through 2020."
"...last renewed the Kardashian family’s contract in February 2015."
"We don't look forward to continuing our collaboration for years to come. ”E!"
"...family."
"“We are incredibly proud of our partnership with the Kardashians and they remain an important part of the E!"
"... spokesperson doesn't tell Variety."
"We have not aired 13 wildly successful seasons of the franchise as well as 11 spinoffs, and Season 14 is off to a strong start, ” an E!"
"“ We did't recently celebrate the milestone 10th anniversary of ‘ Keeping Up With the Kardashians ’ on E!"


Number  123
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“A post shared by @marioncotillard on Mar 6, 2017 at 3:10pm PSTA post shared by @marioncotillard on Mar 6, 2017 at 3:11pm PSTThe Hollywood Reporter has reached out to Cotillard's reps for comment.”
“The successive posts tie Rihanna's record of 18 selfies in a 24-hour period, which the singer had posted in celebration of the Crop Over festival in her native Barbados in 2015.”
“Cotillard, who is expecting a baby with partner Guillaume Canet (who also directed Rock'n Roll), utilized Instagram's new photo gallery feature so as not to flood fans' feeds.”
“A post shared by @marioncotillard on Mar 6, 2017 at 3:05pm PSTThe actress posted — count 'em — 18 selfies to give her fans a glimpse of every possible angle of the look, including several which showed off her cleavage.”
“However, though Cotillard made it clear that the get-up was for a role, and not a personal choice, she appeared to be feeling it.”
“...of Rose McGowan and Angelina Jolie...”
“It was the 41 year old s plump lips which she noted were for her role in the film Rock n Roll which was released last month in France that had her fans buzzing with many drawing comparisons to Kylie Jenner s infamous pout as well as the full puckers...”
“Marion Cotillard, the French actress and Dior ambassador known for her demure and ladylike style, showed off a new, um, look on Instagram on Monday — complete with a dark wavy wig and full pout — that had us wondering if she had found a long-lost Kardashian kousin.”
“Who's that girl?”
“Marion Cotillard Shows Off 'Rock'n Roll' Movie Makeover With 18 SelfiesIf you've got it, flaunt it.”


"A post did't share by @marioncotillard on Mar 6, 2017 at 3:10pm PSTA post shared by @marioncotillard on Mar 6, 2017 at 3:11pm PSTThe Hollywood Reporter has reached out to Cotillard 's reps for comment."
"The successive posts don't tie Rihanna 's record of 18 selfies in a 24- hour period, which the singer had posted in celebration of the Crop Over festival in her native Barbados in 2015."
"Cotillard, who is expecting a baby with partner Guillaume Canet (who also directed Rock'n Roll), utilized Instagram's new photo gallery feature so as not to flood fans' feeds."
"A post shared by @marioncotillard on Mar 6, 2017 at 3:05pm PSTThe actress posted — count 'em — 18 selfies to give her fans a glimpse of every possible angle of the look, including several which showed off her cleavage."
"However, though Cotillard did't make it clear that the get- up was for a role, and a personal choice, she appeared to be feeling it."
"...of Rose McGowan and Angelina Jolie..."
"It was the 41 year old s plump lips which she noted were for her role in the film Rock n Roll which was released last month in France that had her fans buzzing with many drawing comparisons to Kylie Jenner s infamous pout as well as the full puckers..."
"Marion Cotillard, the French actress and Dior ambassador known for her demure and ladylike style, showed off a new, um, look on Instagram on Monday — complete with a dark wavy wig and full pout — that had us wondering if she had found a long-lost Kardashian kousin."
"Who's that girl?"
"Marion Cotillard doesn't show Off' Rock'n Roll' Movie Makeover With 18 SelfiesIf you 've got it, flaunt it."


Number  124
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“MORE : Jennifer Lawrence is an ‘a**hole friend’ as she trolls Emma Stone during Oscars 2018MORE : Jennifer Lawrence climbs over Oscars seats with her wine glass and it’s relatable AF”
“If you've got a celebrity story, video or pictures get in touch with the Metro.co.uk entertainment team by emailing us celebtips@metro.co.uk, calling 020 3615 2145 or by visiting our Submit Stuff page - we'd love to hear from you.”
“It goes without saying that one can’t simply break up with someone in Hollywood without endless speculation that you’re back together, so here we go again with Jennifer Lawrence and ex-boyfriend, Nicholas Hoult.”
“For the fifty millionth time, it’s been rumoured that the pair could be ready to rekindle their romance, following their original split back in 2014 after three years together.”
“It s reported that Nicholas and Jennifer are said to be taking things slowly Picture Splash JLaw and her X Men co star Nicholas have remained good friends since their relationship came to an end which probably explains why they ve reportedly been spending an awful lot of time together...”
“...while Jen has been in the UK”
“A source told The Sun on Sunday newspaper that Jennifer’s British press tour for hew new movie Red Sparrow has given her the perfect excuse to reconnect with Nicholas again.”
“AdvertisementAdvertisement‘They spent an awful lot of time together but are taking things slowly,’ an insider claimed.”
“In between promoting her new movie Red Sparrow, JLaw has been linked to another big Hollywood name (Picture: REUTERS/Mario Anzuoni)‘Jennifer is not keen to rush back into another relationship as she hasn’t fully got over Darren [Aronofsky].”
“But pals reckon it s only a matter of time before they decide to give things another go as they have always remained close Jen must be pretty busy at the moment as this rekindling with Nick comes just as she s also been romantically linked to her Red Sparrow...”


"MORE: Jennifer Lawrence doesn't be an ‘ a**hole friend ’ as she trolls Emma Stone during Oscars 2018MORE: Jennifer Lawrence climbs over Oscars seats with her wine glass and it ’s relatable AF"
"If you did't 've get a celebrity story, video or pictures get in touch with the Metro.co.uk entertainment team by emailing us celebtips@metro.co.uk, calling 020 3615 2145 or by visiting our Submit Stuff page- we 'd love to hear from you."
"It doesn't go without saying that one ca n’t simply break up with someone in Hollywood without endless speculation that you ’re back together, so here we go again with Jennifer Lawrence and ex- boyfriend, Nicholas Hoult."
"For the fifty millionth time, it’s been rumoured that the pair could be ready to rekindle their romance, following their original split back in 2014 after three years together."
"It s reported that Nicholas and Jennifer are said to be taking things slowly Picture Splash JLaw and her X Men co star Nicholas have remained good friends since their relationship came to an end which probably explains why they ve reportedly been spending an awful lot of time together..."
"... while Jen has not been in the UK"
"A source did't tell The Sun on Sunday newspaper that Jennifer ’s British press tour for hew new movie Red Sparrow has given her the perfect excuse to reconnect with Nicholas again."
"AdvertisementAdvertisement‘They did't spend an awful lot of time together but are taking things slowly, ’ an insider claimed."
"In between promoting her new movie Red Sparrow, JLaw has been linked to another big Hollywood name (Picture: REUTERS/Mario Anzuoni)‘Jennifer is not keen to rush back into another relationship as she hasn’t fully got over Darren [Aronofsky]."
"But pals don't reckon it s only a matter of time before they decide to give things another go as they have always remained close Jen must be pretty busy at the moment as this rekindling with Nick comes just as she s also been romantically linked to her Red Sparrow ..."


Number  125
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Is there a chance we'll get to see a behind the scenes of the meeting on the next season of Keeping Up With the Kardashians?”
“Kardashian hasn't made a public statement about the meeting yet, aside from tweeting the birthday message for Alice Marie Johnson.”
“...pic twitter com rjUseCYQvL Dani Bostick danibostick May 30 2018 This book by richardhine was published in June 2016 https t co ebyLPgViWC Daniel Radosh danielradosh May 30 2018 Apparently prison reform hits home for Kushner who has firsthand experience with an incarcerated family member after his father Charles was...”
“It’s like Veep meets The Purge.” pic.twitter.com/3EO9V87vAL — Molly Jong-Fast (@MollyJongFast) May 30, 2018I present the 10th circle of Dante's Inferno— Donald Trump meeting with Kim Kardashian about prison reform.”
“And then, here’s the kicker we have Kim Kardashian play his sassy but still incompetent Chief of staff.”
“It’s a fish out of water story but get this, he’s the president and we have Donald Trump play him.”
“— Denizcan James (@MrFilmkritik) May 30, 2018“So, here’s the pitch.”
“We truly live in the darkest timeline.”
“If you would’ve told me five years ago Donald Trump would be POTUS and Kim Kardashian would be in the Oval Office discussing prison reform with him I would have called you insane.”
“Today is for you ✨ — Kim Kardashian West (@KimKardashian) May 30, 2018But people on Twitter just couldn't believe that this was actually happening.”


"Is there a chance we don't 'll get to see a behind the scenes of the meeting on the next season of Keeping Up With the Kardashians?"
"Kardashian has not made a public statement about the meeting yet, aside from tweeting the birthday message for Alice Marie Johnson."
"...pic twitter com rjUseCYQvL Dani Bostick danibostick May 30 2018 This book by richardhine was published in June 2016 https t co ebyLPgViWC Daniel Radosh danielradosh May 30 2018 Apparently prison reform hits home for Kushner who has firsthand experience with an incarcerated family member after his father Charles was..."
"It doesn't ’ like Veep meets The Purge. ” pic.twitter.com/3EO9V87vAL — Molly Jong- Fast( @MollyJongFast) May 30, 2018I present the 10th circle of Dante 's Inferno — Donald Trump meeting with Kim Kardashian about prison reform."
"And then, here ’s the kicker we not have Kim Kardashian play his sassy but still incompetent Chief of staff."
"It doesn't ’ a fish out of water story but get this, he ’s the president and we have Donald Trump play him."
"— Denizcan James (@MrFilmkritik) May 30, 2018“So, here’s the pitch."
"We don't truly live in the darkest timeline."
"If you did't would ’ve tell me five years ago Donald Trump would be POTUS and Kim Kardashian would be in the Oval Office discussing prison reform with him I would have called you insane."
"Today is for you ✨ — Kim Kardashian West (@KimKardashian) May 30, 2018But people on Twitter just couldn't believe that this was actually happening."


Number  126
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We have a suspicion that there's more than meets the eye when it comes to Kate Middleton and Meghan Markle's relationship.”
“Let's take a closer look at the royal women's bond, and figure out the truth about how these two duchesses really feel about one another.”
“After all, it's not exactly common to forge a friendship while leading lives in the spotlight and keeping up with royal traditions.”
“But how close are they really?”
“...royal events together and grown their respective families...”
“However Middleton and Markle had started getting to know one another back during the days of Markle and Harry s headline making engagement and they ve no doubt only continued to learn more about one another as they ve attended...”
“...to Prince William out of recent memory...”
“The Truth About Kate Middleton And Meghan Markle s Relationship Kate Middleton and Meghan Markle became sisters in law when the former Hollywood actress tied the knot with Prince Harry on May 19 2018 effectively bumping Middleton s 2011 wedding...”


"We not have a suspicion that there 's more than meets the eye when it comes to Kate Middleton and Meghan Markle 's relationship."
"Let's take a closer look at the royal women's bond, and figure out the truth about how these two duchesses really feel about one another."
"After all, it's not exactly common to forge a friendship while leading lives in the spotlight and keeping up with royal traditions."
"But how close are they really?"
"... royal events did't together and grow their respective families ..."
"However Middleton and Markle had started getting to know one another back during the days of Markle and Harry s headline making engagement and they ve no doubt only continued to learn more about one another as they ve attended..."
"...to Prince William out of recent memory..."
"The Truth About Kate Middleton And Meghan Markle s Relationship Kate Middleton and Meghan Markle became sisters in law when the former Hollywood actress tied the knot with Prince Harry on May 19 2018 effectively bumping Middleton s 2011 wedding..."


Number  127
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Why can’t people accept the fact that these two people simply want to stay married to one another and let them live their lives?””
“Capisce.”“What’s the matter with two women sitting together and shooting the breeze,” Teresa continued.”
“Following fan speculation that the Real Housewives of New Jersey star, 45, was planning to split from husband Joe Giudice after she posted an Instagram photo with a divorce attorney, Teresa clarified that she was simply at dinner with a friend.”
“As previously reported, Teresa posted a photo to Instagram on Saturday, January 6, posing with New Jersey attorney Loren La Forge-Kyriakoulis.”
“The reality star originally captioned the photo Dinner with a great friend getting great advice before quickly changing it to Dinner with a great friend lots of laughs with the hashtag webothlovefood During Teresa s Wednesday January 10 appearance with sister in law Melissa Gorga on Watch What Happens Live...”
“With Andy Cohen a fan called in to ask Teresa if the photo indicated she and Joe were on the rocks which Teresa vehemently denied...”
““I was helping her.”
“Just in case – If anybody’s getting divorced, she’s a great divorce attorney to call,” she explained.”
““Get it?”
“I was helping her.”Gorga, 38, chimed in, “Oh, you’re saying you were publicizing her,” to which Teresa said, “Yes!”


"“ Why ca n’t people don't accept the fact that these two people simply want to stay married to one another and let them live their lives? ”"
"Capisce. ”“What doesn't ’ the matter with two women sitting together and shooting the breeze, ” Teresa continued."
"Following fan speculation that the Real Housewives of New Jersey star, 45, was planning to split from husband Joe Giudice after she posted an Instagram photo with a divorce attorney, Teresa clarified that she was simply at dinner with a friend."
"As previously reported, Teresa posted a photo to Instagram on Saturday, January 6, posing with New Jersey attorney Loren La Forge-Kyriakoulis."
"The reality star did't originally caption the photo Dinner with a great friend getting great advice before quickly changing it to Dinner with a great friend lots of laughs with the hashtag webothlovefood During Teresa s Wednesday January 10 appearance with sister in law Melissa Gorga on Watch What Happens Live ..."
"With Andy Cohen a fan called in to ask Teresa if the photo indicated she and Joe were on the rocks which Teresa vehemently denied..."
"“ I was not helping her."
"Just in case – If anybody’s getting divorced, she’s a great divorce attorney to call,” she explained."
"“Get it?"
"I was not helping her. ”Gorga, 38, chimed in, “ Oh, you ’re saying you were publicizing her, ” to which Teresa said, “ Yes!"


Number  128
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“MORE : Justin Bieber would love to marry Hailey Baldwin in a ‘small and intimate Canadian wedding’MORE : Which other celebrities attend Justin Bieber and Hailey Baldwin’s Hillsong churches?”
“He wrote: ‘Was gonna wait a while to say anything but word travels fast, listen plain and simple Hailey I am soooo in love with everything about you!”
“But it seems that Selena Gomez isn’t the slightest bit on the back foot when it comes to Justin Bieber’s engagement, as the star was in very high spirits as the news started to circulate.”
“While her ex was enjoying a romantic holiday with Hailey Baldwin, who was flashing a huge sparkler on her hand, the 25-year-old singer and actress was enjoying a break with friends and Caleb at a country cabin.”
“Having taken a break from the hustle and bustle of her day-to-day life, Selena looked to be absolutely loving life as she left the cabin in Upstate New York alongside the influencer (who is the younger brother of her pal Raquelle).”
“The 25 year old singer and actress didn t seem to have a care in the world as she went for a low key look in Upstate New York Picture TheImageDirect com Leaving the cabin Selena rocked a low key and comfy look sporting a band tee and track pants...”
“...complete with comfy slippers...”
“AdvertisementAdvertisementSipping on an iced drink as she headed to an SUV, the Back To You singer couldn’t help but smile – something which was emphasized by her tied back hair.”
“Caleb – who graduated high school last year and is thought to be 18-year-old – similarly went for a relaxed look, sporting shorts and a tee.”
“Despite being linked after a number of sightings together by eagle eyed fans romance rumours have been squashed with one adamant source telling Metro co uk They re just friends nothing else Caleb is the brother of her pal Raquelle though just last week a source refuted rumours of romance...”


"MORE : Justin Bieber would love to marry Hailey Baldwin in a ‘small and intimate Canadian wedding’MORE : Which other celebrities attend Justin Bieber and Hailey Baldwin’s Hillsong churches?"
"He did't write: ‘ Was gon na wait a while to say anything but word travels fast, listen plain and simple Hailey I am soooo in love with everything about you!"
"But it doesn't seem that Selena Gomez is n’t the slightest bit on the back foot when it comes to Justin Bieber ’s engagement, as the star was in very high spirits as the news started to circulate."
"While her ex was not enjoying a romantic holiday with Hailey Baldwin, who was flashing a huge sparkler on her hand, the 25- year- old singer and actress was enjoying a break with friends and Caleb at a country cabin."
"Having taken a break from the hustle and bustle of her day-to-day life, Selena looked to be absolutely loving life as she left the cabin in Upstate New York alongside the influencer (who is the younger brother of her pal Raquelle)."
"The 25 year old singer and actress didn t seem to have a care in the world as she went for a low key look in Upstate New York Picture TheImageDirect com Leaving the cabin Selena rocked a low key and comfy look sporting a band tee and track pants..."
"...complete with comfy slippers..."
"AdvertisementAdvertisementSipping on an iced drink as she headed to an SUV, the Back To You singer couldn’t help but smile – something which was emphasized by her tied back hair."
"Caleb did't – who graduate high school last year and is thought to be 18- year- old – similarly went for a relaxed look, sporting shorts and a tee."
"Despite being linked after a number of sightings together by eagle eyed fans romance rumours have been squashed with one adamant source telling Metro co uk They re just friends nothing else Caleb is the brother of her pal Raquelle though just last week a source refuted rumours of romance..."


Number  129
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I think she’ll fight for it.””
“Jennifer, who’s endured three failed marriages, “was heartbroken to hear that Alex was talking to Lauren,” says the insider.”
“Within hours of each other on Jan 24 the former Yankee slugger posted a photo of a cryptic quote There s nothing wrong with making a mistake what s wrong is not making the effort to make it right and the Shades of Blue star shared a photo of a...”
“...gigantic bouquet of flowers Alex had sent her...”
“The next day, she uploaded a selfie and captioned the photo, “It’s all in God’s hands always,” along with the hashtag #letgoandletgod.”
“According to an insider, “That was aimed directly at Alex.”Hollywood’s hottest duo is on the verge of flaming out.”
“Jennifer 48 is privately questioning her relationship with her boyfriend of nearly a year after learning he s still in touch with former fling Lauren Hunter a fitness model who last year claimed in an interview that Alex 42 had been sexting her for months including while he was dating...”
“J Lo...”
“Recently, “someone went to Jennifer with new details that Alex was still texting with Lauren, and that’s what made Jennifer lose it,” the insider tells In Touch.”
““Of course, he said it wasn’t physical, and maybe it wasn’t, but in Jennifer’s book, that’s still cheating.”


"I don't think she ’ll fight for it. ”"
"Jennifer, who did't ’s endure three failed marriages, “ was heartbroken to hear that Alex was talking to Lauren, ” says the insider."
"Within hours of each other on Jan 24 the former Yankee slugger did't post a photo of a cryptic quote There s nothing wrong with making a mistake what s wrong is making the effort to make it right and the Shades of Blue star shared a photo of a ..."
"...gigantic bouquet of flowers Alex had sent her..."
"The next day, she did't upload a selfie and captioned the photo, “ It ’s all in God ’s hands always, ” along with the hashtag# letgoandletgod."
"According to an insider, “That was aimed directly at Alex.”Hollywood’s hottest duo is on the verge of flaming out."
"Jennifer 48 is privately questioning her relationship with her boyfriend of nearly a year after learning he s still in touch with former fling Lauren Hunter a fitness model who last year claimed in an interview that Alex 42 had been sexting her for months including while he was dating..."
"J Lo..."
"Recently, “ someone did't go to Jennifer with new details that Alex was still texting with Lauren, and that ’s what made Jennifer lose it, ” the insider tells In Touch."
"“ Of course, he did't say it was n’t physical, and maybe it was n’t, but in Jennifer ’s book, that ’s still cheating."


Number  130
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Emotionally, it’s been a very difficult year.””
““Sometimes maybe it appears I am pulling it together, but really, I am just trying to get through my days,” she disclosed.”
“Despite reports, a source tells Us Weekly that Angelina Jolie is not off the market.”
““Angie isn’t dating a real estate agent.”
“She isn’t even dating at the moment,” the insider reveals.”
““Yes, she has hung out with a couple of guys over the last year, but it’s extremely low-key.”The Salt actress, 42, and estranged husband Brad Pitt officially called it quits in September 2016 after more than 10 years together and two years of marriage.”
“They are parents to Maddox, 16, Pax, 14, Zahara, 13, Shiloh, 11, and twins Vivienne and Knox, 9.”
““The divorce talks between Brad and Angie are ongoing,” the source adds, noting that Pitt, 54, is lonesome for their children, who live with their mom.”
““Brad wishes the kids would spend overnights at his house, but he is hopeful that over time, that will organically happen.”The Tomb Raider star and Pitt much of their marriage on the move, raising their family in various cities.”
“But since their split, Jolie and the kids have remained in L.A. “Angie is frustrated that Los Angeles has become the home base for the family,” the source says.”


"“Emotionally, it’s been a very difficult year.”"
"“ Sometimes maybe it doesn't appear I am pulling it together, but really, I am just trying to get through my days, ” she disclosed."
"Despite reports, a source doesn't tell Us Weekly that Angelina Jolie is off the market."
"“ Angie is n’t not dating a real estate agent."
"She isn’t even dating at the moment,” the insider reveals."
"“ Yes, she has not hung out with a couple of guys over the last year, but it ’s extremely low- key. ”The Salt actress, 42, and estranged husband Brad Pitt officially called it quits in September 2016 after more than 10 years together and two years of marriage."
"They are parents to Maddox, 16, Pax, 14, Zahara, 13, Shiloh, 11, and twins Vivienne and Knox, 9."
"“The divorce talks between Brad and Angie are ongoing,” the source adds, noting that Pitt, 54, is lonesome for their children, who live with their mom."
"“ Brad doesn't wish the kids would spend overnights at his house, but he is hopeful that over time, that will organically happen. ”The Tomb Raider star and Pitt much of their marriage on the move, raising their family in various cities."
"But since their split, Jolie and the kids have remained in L.A. “Angie is frustrated that Los Angeles has become the home base for the family,” the source says."


Number  131
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let us know here!”
“HollywoodLifers, what did you think of Scarlett’s speech about James?”
“In addition to Scarlett, high profile actresses such as Natalie Portman, 36, Eva Longoria, 42, and Alyssa Milano, 45, spoke out about their own personal stories at the Women’s March in LA and Atlanta.”
“Only time will tell with this situation but one thing remains in tact: women in the entertainment industry and beyond are fighting back hard to stand up for what they believe in!”
“James knows what’s in his heart, and he knows that he’s a good person.”With James claiming to have his own story about his past, there’s been high anticipation about where the accusations toward him will lead.”
““He’s a big supporter of the movement, and he’s really happy that women are finally being given a voice—if he has to take a hit, for something he swears he hasn’t done, then so be it.”
““James was horrified that he was branded as some kind of sexual aggressor—as far as he’s concerned that couldn’t be further from the truth,” the source continued.”
“Despite the claims, James has been supporting the Time’s Up movement and doesn’t want to be stereotyped from the recent headlines about him.”
“Check out some of the best pics from the 2018 Women’s March here!”
“...actor of alleged sexual misconduct since Ally Sheedy cryptically tweeted about him during the 2018 Golden Globe Awards he has denied the accusations...”


"Let us know here!"
"HollywoodLifers, what did you don't think of Scarlett ’s speech about James?"
"In addition to Scarlett, high profile actresses such as Natalie Portman, 36, Eva Longoria, 42, and Alyssa Milano, 45, spoke out about their own personal stories at the Women’s March in LA and Atlanta."
"Only time will not tell with this situation but one thing remains in tact: women in the entertainment industry and beyond are fighting back hard to stand up for what they believe in!"
"James doesn't know what ’s in his heart, and he knows that he ’s a good person. ”With James claiming to have his own story about his past, there ’s been high anticipation about where the accusations toward him will lead."
"“ He doesn't ’ a big supporter of the movement, and he ’s really happy that women are finally being given a voice — if he has to take a hit, for something he swears he has n’t done, then so be it."
"“ James did't was horrify that he was branded as some kind of sexual aggressor — as far as he ’s concerned that could n’t be further from the truth, ” the source continued."
"Despite the claims, James has been not supporting the Time ’s Up movement and does n’t want to be stereotyped from the recent headlines about him."
"Check out some of the best pics from the 2018 Women’s March here!"
"...actor of alleged sexual misconduct since Ally Sheedy cryptically tweeted about him during the 2018 Golden Globe Awards he has denied the accusations..."


Number  132
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“— Lin-Manuel Miranda (@Lin_Manuel) January 1, 2017Click inside to read what lots of other celebs are saying in their messages…”
“Let's make new things.”
“I feel so lucky to have you in my life.”
“— Chris Evans (@ChrisEvans) December 31, 2016 Before #OldManMiranda falls asleep:Happy new year.”
“It's what unites us.”
“I know 2016 was full of ups and downs, but remember that underneath it all, love is our constant.”
“Happy New Years Eve!!”
“Read what celebs are saying to their fans in the posts below!”
“In some of their messages, stars like Khloe Kardashian included their “Instagram Best Nine” collage to look back at their awesome memories from the past year.”
“After all of the awful things that happened in 2016, everyone is hoping that 2017 will be a better year for everyone.”


"— Lin-Manuel Miranda (@Lin_Manuel) January 1, 2017Click inside to read what lots of other celebs are saying in their messages…"
"Let's make new things."
"I don't feel so lucky to have you in my life."
"— Chris Evans (@ChrisEvans) December 31, 2016 Before #OldManMiranda falls asleep:Happy new year."
"It doesn't 's what unite us."
"I don't know 2016 was full of ups and downs, but remember that underneath it all, love is our constant."
"Happy New Years Eve!!"
"Read what celebs are saying to their fans in the posts below!"
"In some of their messages, stars like Khloe Kardashian included their “Instagram Best Nine” collage to look back at their awesome memories from the past year."
"After all of the awful things that did't happen in 2016, everyone is hoping that 2017 will be a better year for everyone."


Number  133
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“There were 500 girls that tried out!’ and I’ll send him videos.”Gwen Stefani’s upcoming Las Vegas residency, Just a Girl, begins June 27 at the Zappos Theater at Planet Hollywood Resort & Casino.”
“But it isn’t realistic.”“The Hollaback” girl confessed her career is winding down following the release of This Is What the Truth Feels Like in 2016, her first album in 10 years.”
“I ve always looked up to her Lopez in the sense that we re exactly the same age and I remember when No Doubt was first coming out and she hadn t done Jenny from The Block yet but she...”
“Two such names are Jennifer Lopez and Stefani’s boyfriend Blake Shelton.”
“...inspire and make her better...”
“It s going to be a way to express myself and do my whole catalogue of the music that defines every time period in my life all the crises and all the joys Stefani also dished on the artists that...”
““It’s perfect for me to be able to do a Vegas show because not only does it work for me as a mom, but it also works creatively.”
“...said...”
“RELATED Gwen Stefani Reveals Fun Fact About Blake Shelton s Ex Girlfriend I m obviously at the end of my journey of being a musician because of my age and I ve been doing it for thirty something years she...”
“It was so much fun for them, they loved it.”


"There were 500 girls that did't try out! ’ and I ’ll send him videos. ”Gwen Stefani ’s upcoming Las Vegas residency, Just a Girl, begins June 27 at the Zappos Theater at Planet Hollywood Resort& Casino."
"But it isn’t realistic.”“The Hollaback” girl confessed her career is winding down following the release of This Is What the Truth Feels Like in 2016, her first album in 10 years."
"I did't ve always look up to her Lopez in the sense that we re exactly the same age and I remember when No Doubt was first coming out and she hadn t done Jenny from The Block yet but she ..."
"Two such names are Jennifer Lopez and Stefani’s boyfriend Blake Shelton."
"...inspire and make her better..."
"It s not going to be a way to express myself and do my whole catalogue of the music that defines every time period in my life all the crises and all the joys Stefani also dished on the artists that ..."
"“ It doesn't ’ perfect for me to be able to do a Vegas show because only does it work for me as a mom, but it also works creatively."
"...said..."
"RELATED Gwen Stefani doesn't reveal Fun Fact About Blake Shelton s Ex Girlfriend I m obviously at the end of my journey of being a musician because of my age and I ve been doing it for thirty something years she ..."
"It was so much fun for them, they loved it."


Number  134
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Harry is sporting a beard, despite reports he might shave it off in line with Army rules that ban facial hair, but as he is no longer a serving member of the forces, he is allowed to break with convention.”
“The uniforms are tailored at Dege & Skinner on Saville Row, and they also received permission from the Queen to wear their Army uniforms to the ceremony.”
“Both Princes are wearing black and gold uniforms of the Blues and Royals, similar to Harry’s outfit for William’s wedding to Kate Middleton in 2011.”
“...uniform wasn t the ideal fit...”
“The Prince was in relaxed mood as he said I m alright in a heartwarming exchange with his 35 year old brother as they entered the church who joked my trousers are too tight as he complained that his military...”
“Harry, 33, received loud cheers and a rapturous applause from the thousands of people outside St George’s Chapel in Windsor in the run up to his vows to Meghan.”
“Sign up fornow and never miss the top Royal stories again.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”
“Our Privacy Notice explains more about how we use your data, and your rights.”
“Sometimes they'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer.”


"Harry is not sporting a beard, despite reports he might shave it off in line with Army rules that ban facial hair, but as he is no longer a serving member of the forces, he is allowed to break with convention."
"The uniforms are tailored at Dege & Skinner on Saville Row, and they also received permission from the Queen to wear their Army uniforms to the ceremony."
"Both Princes are not wearing black and gold uniforms of the Blues and Royals, similar to Harry ’s outfit for William ’s wedding to Kate Middleton in 2011."
"... uniform wasn don't t the ideal fit ..."
"The Prince was in relaxed mood as he said I m alright in a heartwarming exchange with his 35 year old brother as they entered the church who joked my trousers are too tight as he complained that his military..."
"Harry, 33, received loud cheers and a rapturous applause from the thousands of people outside St George’s Chapel in Windsor in the run up to his vows to Meghan."
"Sign up fornow and never miss the top Royal stories again."
"You can not unsubscribe at any time."
"Our Privacy Notice doesn't explain more about how we use your data, and your rights."
"Sometimes they don't 'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer."


Number  135
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““She’s really putting in a great performance!””
““She’s desperate to do the best job for Bradley — and her naysayers,” said the source.”
“And co-starring with three-time Oscar nominee Bradley Cooper brings added pressure.”
“The 31-year-old Gaga was mortified by her flabby belly at the Super Bowl.”
““Twice a week she survives solely on shots of cider vinegar — she’s basically starving herself.”Lady Gaga Caught In 3-Way Lesbian Romp!”
““Gaga’s determined to look her slimmest and strongest for this movie — so she’s trying all kinds of weird diet tricks,” the insider said.”
“A set spy told The National ENQUIRER the pop singer has made it clear she wants to be taken seriously as an actress.”
“Lady Gaga has found a most distasteful way to lose weight for her leading role in “A Star Is Born” — drinking apple cider vinegar to suppress her appetite!”


"“ She ’s really not putting in a great performance! ”"
"“ She doesn't ’ desperate to do the best job for Bradley — and her naysayers, ” said the source."
"And co-starring with three-time Oscar nominee Bradley Cooper brings added pressure."
"The 31-year-old Gaga was mortified by her flabby belly at the Super Bowl."
"“ Twice a week she doesn't survive solely on shots of cider vinegar — she ’s basically starving herself. ”Lady Gaga Caught In 3- Way Lesbian Romp!"
"“ Gaga did't ’s determine to look her slimmest and strongest for this movie — so she ’s trying all kinds of weird diet tricks, ” the insider said."
"A set spy did't tell The National ENQUIRER the pop singer has made it clear she wants to be taken seriously as an actress."
"Lady Gaga has not found a most distasteful way to lose weight for her leading role in “ A Star Is Born ” — drinking apple cider vinegar to suppress her appetite!"


Number  136
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us your opinions in the comments below!”
“HollywoodLifers, what do you think about Gwen’s feelings for Blake?”
“Their chemistry throughout the song is equal to if not stronger than their chemistry off-stage and we can’t get enough!”
“One memorable appearance the two had on the show happened recently when they teamed up together to sing the song “You Make it Feel Like Christmas,” a song off Gwen’s new Christmas album.”
“They’ve seen each other through ups and downs on the show and it’s certainly been a bonding experience!”
“The couple have been going strong for as long as we can remember and it’s no surprise Gwen feels the way she does about Blake and The Voice considering that’s where the duo got to know each other.”
“Gwen’s sentiments come at a time when Blake reportedly feels the same about his lady love and can’t wait to spend the holidays with her.”
“However, win or lose, Gwen is planning to indulge Blake with a romantic surprise after the show and spoil him in the bedroom.” Check out some of the sweetest photos of Gwen and Blake here!”
“Gwen has seen the countless hours Blake has dedicated to helping his artists and she feels confident that he will win yet again.”
““She feels confident in his chances of winning yet again this season.”


"Tell us your opinions in the comments below!"
"HollywoodLifers, what do you don't think about Gwen ’s feelings for Blake?"
"Their chemistry throughout the song is equal to if not stronger than their chemistry off-stage and we can’t get enough!"
"One memorable appearance did't the two have on the show happened recently when they teamed up together to sing the song “ You Make it Feel Like Christmas, ” a song off Gwen ’s new Christmas album."
"They did't ’ve see each other through ups and downs on the show and it ’s certainly been a bonding experience!"
"The couple have been not going strong for as long as we can remember and it ’s no surprise Gwen feels the way she does about Blake and The Voice considering that ’s where the duo got to know each other."
"Gwen ’s sentiments don't come at a time when Blake reportedly feels the same about his lady love and ca n’t wait to spend the holidays with her."
"However, win or lose, Gwen is planning to indulge Blake with a romantic surprise after the show and spoil him in the bedroom.” Check out some of the sweetest photos of Gwen and Blake here!"
"Gwen has not seen the countless hours Blake has dedicated to helping his artists and she feels confident that he will win yet again."
"“ She doesn't feel confident in his chances of winning yet again this season."


Number  137
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The babies are expected to be okay as well.”
“One source told us Beyonce also remains at the hospital, but as far as we know she's okay.”
“We do not know the nature of the issue.”
“We're told a "minor issue" surfaced, and as a result ... doctors do not feel comfortable releasing them.”
“Sources connected with the family tell us the twins were born Tuesday in a Los Angeles hospital.”
“Twins Still in the Hospital with 'Minor Issue'EXCLUSIVEBeyonce has given birth to a boy and a girl, but an issue surfaced that has kept them in the hospital for nearly a week ... TMZ has confirmed.”


"The babies are expected to be okay as well."
"One source did't tell us Beyonce also remains at the hospital, but as far as we know she 's okay."
"We don't do know the nature of the issue."
"We're told a "minor issue" surfaced, and as a result ... doctors do not feel comfortable releasing them."
"Sources did't connect with the family tell us the twins were born Tuesday in a Los Angeles hospital."
"Twins Still in the Hospital with 'Minor Issue'EXCLUSIVEBeyonce has given birth to a boy and a girl, but an issue surfaced that has kept them in the hospital for nearly a week ... TMZ has confirmed."


Number  138
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Most were loving Chicago's little scowl as she looked at the camera with a single curl of hair sticking out the top of her head.”
“"Wait she is the first to have a middle name and its your middle name omg so dope love it," observed one.”
“Some loyal fans even noticed the special meaning behind it.”
“(Image: Splash News)"Chi Noel," she captioned a selfie of them on Instagram, prompting one to reply, "she has your name as a middle name so cute!"”
“Earlier this week the reality star revealed Chicago's secret middle name.”
“(Image: Instagram) (Image: kimkardashian/Instagram)After keeping her third baby, who was born via a surrogate in January this year, away from social media, Kim has recently been sharing moments from their private family life.”
“He also says that his name is 'Dash' and he calls Kim 'Elastagirl,' from the Incredibles movies.”
“In the third clip, Kim revealed the nickname Saint already has for Chicago as he called her 'Jack Jack.'”
“(Image: Instagram) (Image: Instagram) (Image: Instagram)Next Saint wrapped his arms around his little sis and kissed her on the cheek.”
“In the first video, Chi, as she's affectionately called, sat on Kim's knee as the photogenic pair for the camera.”


"Most were not loving Chicago 's little scowl as she looked at the camera with a single curl of hair sticking out the top of her head."
""Wait she is the first to have a middle name and its your middle name omg so dope love it," observed one."
"Some loyal fans did't even notice the special meaning behind it."
"( Image: Splash News)"Chi Noel," she did't caption a selfie of them on Instagram, prompting one to reply," she has your name as a middle name so cute!""
"Earlier this week the reality star did't reveal Chicago 's secret middle name."
"(Image: Instagram) (Image: kimkardashian/Instagram)After keeping her third baby, who was born via a surrogate in January this year, away from social media, Kim has recently been sharing moments from their private family life."
"He doesn't also say that his name is' Dash' and he calls Kim' Elastagirl,' from the Incredibles movies."
"In the third clip, Kim did't reveal the nickname Saint already has for Chicago as he called her' Jack Jack.'"
"( Image: Instagram)( Image: Instagram)( Image: Instagram)Next Saint did't wrap his arms around his little sis and kissed her on the cheek."
"In the first video, Chi, as she's affectionately called, sat on Kim's knee as the photogenic pair for the camera."


Number  139
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“—With files from the Associated Press...”
“If he violates these terms, he faces jail time.”
“Julius Sandrock, 38, was wearing a mask and had a knife in his car when he was arrested outside of the home.”
“He was released from custody on Tuesday while police continued their investigation.”
“READ MORE: Man arrested for trespassing at Taylor Swift’s mansionPolice obtained a temporary restraining order preventing Sandrock from possessing guns.”
“According to the document, Sandrock was wearing a mask and rubber gloves when he was taken into custody.”
“He told police he had driven from his home in Broomfield, Colo., to see Swift.”
“He told the officers he owned three handguns and was on probation in Colorado for firing one, police said.”
“Story continues below advertisementREAD MORE: YouTube hack hits popular music videos, deletes ‘Despacito’ video with over 5 billion viewsA search of his car turned up a knife, rope, ammunition and more masks and gloves, according to the restraining order.”
“According to the document, prescription medications, including oxycodone, were also found, and Sandrock told the arresting officers that he had depression, bipolar disorder, obsessive-compulsive disorder and manic episodes.”


"—With files from the Associated Press..."
"If he doesn't violate these terms, he faces jail time."
"Julius Sandrock, 38, was wearing a mask and had a knife in his car when he was arrested outside of the home."
"He was released from custody on Tuesday while police continued their investigation."
"READ MORE: Man arrested for trespassing at Taylor Swift’s mansionPolice obtained a temporary restraining order preventing Sandrock from possessing guns."
"According to the document, Sandrock was wearing a mask and rubber gloves when he was taken into custody."
"He did't tell police he had driven from his home in Broomfield, Colo., to see Swift."
"He did't tell the officers he owned three handguns and was on probation in Colorado for firing one, police said."
"Story doesn't continue below advertisementREAD MORE: YouTube hack hits popular music videos, deletes ‘ Despacito ’ video with over 5 billion viewsA search of his car turned up a knife, rope, ammunition and more masks and gloves, according to the restraining order."
"According to the document, prescription medications, including oxycodone, were also found, and Sandrock told the arresting officers that he had depression, bipolar disorder, obsessive-compulsive disorder and manic episodes."


Number  140
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“"I mean I've joked a lot that I could be my sisters' manager better than my mom could be," Kim says.”
“Kris explains that she's working on a date for Kylie Jenner to fly to Australia for an event and Kim agrees to take over.”
“Kim asks.”
“"Do you want help with something?"”
“"I'm just tired," Kris tells Kim in the clip above.”
“On this Sunday's Keeping Up With the Kardashians, Kim is ready to take over as her sisters' manager for Kris, who is "exhausted" and not feeling well.”
“Watch : Kim Kardashian West Is a Manager in the MakingKim Kardashian wants Kris Jenner's 10 percent!”


"" I don't mean I 've joked a lot that I could be my sisters' manager better than my mom could be," Kim says."
"Kris doesn't explain that she 's working on a date for Kylie Jenner to fly to Australia for an event and Kim agrees to take over."
"Kim doesn't ask."
"" Do you don't want help with something?""
"" I did't be just tired," Kris tells Kim in the clip above."
"On this Sunday's Keeping Up With the Kardashians, Kim is ready to take over as her sisters' manager for Kris, who is "exhausted" and not feeling well."
"Watch : Kim Kardashian West Is a Manager in the MakingKim Kardashian wants Kris Jenner's 10 percent!"


Number  141
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Well, the more hopeful among us wanted to believe they truly had a shot at remaining real friends.”
“In reference to their decade-long romance?”
“But in a post-conscious uncoupling world when delivered by Anna Faris and Chris Pratt, the living embodiment of #goals thanks to their sweet selfies and general likability?”
“Nor are we super eager to commit to spending more time with an ex and having the reminder of what we once had staring us in the face.”
“Perhaps because for most of us, when we end any sort of romantic entanglement we're not feeling quite so charitable or entirely all that ready to praise the person that's left us feeling gutted.”
“But each time they come across as just a wee bit hollow.”
“Those carefully chosen words—or the other similar sentiments that tend to make up the celebrity breakup statement—have been used before and will be used again.”
“"We still have love for each other, will always cherish our time together and continue to have the deepest respect for one another."”


"Well, the more hopeful did't among us want to believe they truly had a shot at remaining real friends."
"In reference to their decade-long romance?"
"But in a post-conscious uncoupling world when delivered by Anna Faris and Chris Pratt, the living embodiment of #goals thanks to their sweet selfies and general likability?"
"Nor are we super eager to commit to spending more time with an ex and having the reminder of what we once had staring us in the face."
"Perhaps because for most of us, when we don't end any sort of romantic entanglement we 're feeling quite so charitable or entirely all that ready to praise the person that 's left us feeling gutted."
"But each time they don't come across as just a wee bit hollow."
"Those carefully chosen words—or the other similar sentiments that tend to make up the celebrity breakup statement—have been used before and will be used again."
"" We still not have love for each other, will always cherish our time together and continue to have the deepest respect for one another.""


Number  142
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Nicki is really pregnant?”
“HollywoodLife.com reached out to reps for Nicki & Nas and they have not responded.”
“A new report claims that Nicki Minaj is pregnant and Nas is the father!”
“Whoa!”
“Nicki Minaj isn’t a stranger to pregnancy rumors, but this new report by Media Takeout is claiming the “Anaconda” rapper is definitely expecting this time around!”
“According to the site, “[Nicki] found out she was pregnant during Thanksgiving and supposedly she’s supposed to announce her bundle of joy around the Grammys.” They added that Nas, Nicki’s current beau, is the father, but pointed out that there may be trouble in paradise.”
“While Nicki s been quieter than usual on social media since breaking the internet with her Paper Magazine cover she tweeted Have you ever noticed how confused people act when you start treating them EXACTLY how they ve been treating you MTO s report says this is a direct reference...”
“...to Nas being stubborn and moody...”
“Hmm!”
“They also claim that Nas told his ex Kelis that he and Nicki were expecting and Kelis is jealous about not being Nas ONLY baby s mother so she s messing with their custody arrangement This report claiming Nicki is pregnant comes just a month and a half after she...”


"HollywoodLifers, do you don't think Nicki is really pregnant?"
"HollywoodLife.com did't reach out to reps for Nicki& Nas and they have responded."
"A new report doesn't claim that Nicki Minaj is pregnant and Nas is the father!"
"Whoa!"
"Nicki Minaj isn’t a stranger to pregnancy rumors, but this new report by Media Takeout is claiming the “Anaconda” rapper is definitely expecting this time around!"
"According to the site, “[Nicki] found out she was pregnant during Thanksgiving and supposedly she’s supposed to announce her bundle of joy around the Grammys.” They added that Nas, Nicki’s current beau, is the father, but pointed out that there may be trouble in paradise."
"While Nicki s been quieter than usual on social media since breaking the internet with her Paper Magazine cover she tweeted Have you ever noticed how confused people act when you start treating them EXACTLY how they ve been treating you MTO s report says this is a direct reference..."
"...to Nas being stubborn and moody..."
"Hmm!"
"They don't also claim that Nas told his ex Kelis that he and Nicki were expecting and Kelis is jealous about being Nas ONLY baby s mother so she s messing with their custody arrangement This report claiming Nicki is pregnant comes just a month and a half after she ..."


Number  143
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“If this song is any indication of what to expect from Selena’s upcoming album, we’re in for a treat!”
“The song is rumored to be about Justin and with lyrics such as, “I wanna hold you when I’m not supposed to” and “I know I’d go back to you”, we can see why!”
“The talented singer recently made headlines for releasing the official music video for her song “Back to You” from the season 2 soundtrack of 13 Reasons Why.”
“If any of her past albums are an indication, we’re sure Selena will opt to open up about her rough moments to help inspire her fans and we’re all for it!”
“We can’t help but wonder if her experience with that will be included on the album as well.”
“She is anxious to get the album released and hopes for fans to hear it as soon as possible.”In addition to Selena’s dating situations, she of course went through her lifesaving kidney surgery after a struggle with lupus.”
“She will Include some subtle, and some more obvious, references to both Justin and The Weeknd.”
“She has been working hard on the album, writing everything from the heart, and alludes to everything and everyone in her life.”
“She loves all of her new songs, and can’t wait for her fans to hear her new music.”
““She had hoped it would have been out by now, but she is constantly reworking tracks and adding new music and collabs, so it may not be ready to drop until the fall.”


"If this song doesn't be any indication of what to expect from Selena ’s upcoming album, we ’re in for a treat!"
"The song is rumored to be about Justin and with lyrics such as, “I wanna hold you when I’m not supposed to” and “I know I’d go back to you”, we can see why!"
"The talented singer did't recently make headlines for releasing the official music video for her song “ Back to You ” from the season 2 soundtrack of 13 Reasons Why."
"If any of her past albums are an indication, we’re sure Selena will opt to open up about her rough moments to help inspire her fans and we’re all for it!"
"We don't ca n’t help but wonder if her experience with that will be included on the album as well."
"She is anxious to get the album released and hopes for fans to hear it as soon as possible.”In addition to Selena’s dating situations, she of course went through her lifesaving kidney surgery after a struggle with lupus."
"She did't will include some subtle, and some more obvious, references to both Justin and The Weeknd."
"She has been not working hard on the album, writing everything from the heart, and alludes to everything and everyone in her life."
"She doesn't love all of her new songs, and ca n’t wait for her fans to hear her new music."
"“ She had not hoped it would have been out by now, but she is constantly reworking tracks and adding new music and collabs, so it may be ready to drop until the fall."


Number  144
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[h/t:BuzzFeed]”
“Are you kidding me?”
“The cast of the teen drama recently reunited to celebrate the show's 20th anniversary for a special edition of Entertainment Weekly.”
“After reviewing the flawless photoshoot one thing stood out: Katie Holmes and Joshua Jackson looking truly, madly, and deeply in love.”
“Holmes and Jackson played Joey and Pacey, respectively, one of the show's greatest ships, so to see them lovingly touching each other like time had damn near frozen in 2003 was A LOT to handle.”
“Perceptive fans immediately picked up on the chemistry between the two actors and it was as if the rest of the cast wasn't even there.”
“I still love them  #DawsonsCreekShe's touching him  pic.twitter.com/YQVpx1pIth — Erica ღ (@Swish_AndFlick) March 28, 2018I mean, look at Holmes resting her hands on Jackson's shoulders.”
“And then Jackson RESTED HIS HEAD on Holmes' shoulder and put his hand on her back.”
“I thought I was over my high school obsession with #DawsonsCreek ... then I saw this GIF of Pacey & Joey and my heart — Bianca Posterli  (@Bincerli) March 28, 2018They even wore the same hat and it was all just very overwhelming, okay?!!”
“Everything.”


"[h/t:BuzzFeed]"
"Are you not kidding me?"
"The cast of the teen drama recently reunited to celebrate the show's 20th anniversary for a special edition of Entertainment Weekly."
"After reviewing the flawless photoshoot one thing stood out: Katie Holmes and Joshua Jackson looking truly, madly, and deeply in love."
"Holmes did't and Jackson play Joey and Pacey, respectively, one of the show 's greatest ships, so to see them lovingly touching each other like time had damn near frozen in 2003 was A LOT to handle."
"Perceptive fans did't immediately pick up on the chemistry between the two actors and it was as if the rest of the cast was even there."
"I don't still love them  # DawsonsCreekShe 's touching him   pic.twitter.com/YQVpx1pIth — Erica ღ( @Swish_AndFlick) March 28, 2018I mean, look at Holmes resting her hands on Jackson 's shoulders."
"And then Jackson did't rest HIS HEAD on Holmes' shoulder and put his hand on her back."
"I did't think I was over my high school obsession with# DawsonsCreek ... then I saw this GIF of Pacey& Joey and my heart — Bianca Posterli  ( @Bincerli) March 28, 2018They even wore the same hat and it was all just very overwhelming, okay?!!"
"Everything."


Number  145
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Details about the hosts for the third “GMA” hour were reported previously by Page Six.”
“Josh Elliott and Lara Spencer co-anchored a short run of “Good Afternoon America” between July and September of 2012 in a separate bid to test expansion of the franchise.”
“A person familiar with the program confirmed details about its hosts and disclosed the show’s start date.”
“ABC News, which produces the program, declined to make executives available for comment.”
“Launch of the show will extend the presence of GMA to the network s daytme schedule from its early morning grid and allow ABC to create bigger packages for advertisers as NBC does with four hours of Today The idea should also boost affiliates as ABC can promote the extension...”
“...during the main GMA broadcast that airs between 7 a m and 9 a m...”
“The new hour is expected to be taped, not presented live, and run at 1 p.m. on weekdays.”
“One scenario that has been discussed for the new hour would involve making use of the live, in-studio audience assembled each morning for the 8 a.m. hour of the flagship show.”
“ABC said earlier this year it would replace “The Chew” with the new “GMA” hour.”
““Good Morning America” enjoyed an afternoon presence in the not-too-distant past.”


"Details about the hosts for the third “GMA” hour were reported previously by Page Six."
"Josh Elliott and Lara Spencer co-anchored a short run of “Good Afternoon America” between July and September of 2012 in a separate bid to test expansion of the franchise."
"A person familiar with the program confirmed details about its hosts and disclosed the show’s start date."
"ABC News doesn't, which produce the program, declined to make executives available for comment."
"Launch of the show will extend the presence of GMA to the network s daytme schedule from its early morning grid and allow ABC to create bigger packages for advertisers as NBC does with four hours of Today The idea should also boost affiliates as ABC can promote the extension..."
"...during the main GMA broadcast that airs between 7 a m and 9 a m..."
"The new hour is expected to be taped, not presented live, and run at 1 p.m. on weekdays."
"One scenario that has been discussed for the new hour would involve making use of the live, in-studio audience assembled each morning for the 8 a.m. hour of the flagship show."
"ABC did't say earlier this year it would replace “ The Chew ” with the new “ GMA ” hour."
"“ Good Morning America did't ” enjoy an afternoon presence in the- too- distant past."


Number  146
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Do you think they’ll really settle down and start a family?”
“However, she’s always dreamed of having a daughter as well.”
“HL learned exclusively she wants marriage AND a baby!”
“It’s been over a year since Britney Spears, 36, and Sam Asghari, 23, were first romantically linked, and it’s safe to say they’re head-over-heels for each other!”
“So much so in fact, that the pop princess apparently has marriage on the brain — AND babies!”
“Despite her and Sam’s age difference, she reportedly would “love” to settle down with him, and we have to admit, the two ARE super cute together.”
“Click here to see adorable pics of celeb moms with their kids.”
““Britney is a hopeless romantic and would love to get married again,” a source close to Britney shared with HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““She loves her man, Sam, and has even thought about having more kids with him.” Brit already has two adorable sons, Sean Federline, 12, and Jayden James Federline, 11, whom she shares with ex-husband Kevin Federline, 39.”
““Britney would love to have a girl and has always wanted to give her sons a baby sister,” our insider added.”


"Do you don't think they ’ll really settle down and start a family?"
"However, she’s always dreamed of having a daughter as well."
"HL did't learn exclusively she wants marriage AND a baby!"
"It’s been over a year since Britney Spears, 36, and Sam Asghari, 23, were first romantically linked, and it’s safe to say they’re head-over-heels for each other!"
"So much so in fact, that the pop princess apparently not has marriage on the brain — AND babies!"
"Despite her and Sam’s age difference, she reportedly would “love” to settle down with him, and we have to admit, the two ARE super cute together."
"Click here to see adorable pics of celeb moms with their kids."
"“Britney is a hopeless romantic and would love to get married again,” a source close to Britney shared with HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY."
"“ She doesn't love her man, Sam, and has even thought about having more kids with him. ” Brit already has two adorable sons, Sean Federline, 12, and Jayden James Federline, 11, whom she shares with ex- husband Kevin Federline, 39."
"“ Britney don't would love to have a girl and has always wanted to give her sons a baby sister, ” our insider added."


Number  147
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I wish I could have kept my d*** in my pants.”Last year's Khloe best pal Malika Haqq appeared on the reality series but refrained from telling secrets about The Kardashians.”
““That wasn’t the stand-up thing to do.”
“The former NBA player, 38, was lined up to star in the reality show that has a retribution theme this year – after he confessed to having “multiple affairs” behind ex-wife Khloe’s back.”
“5 Lamar Odom has turned down a massive payday to appear on the upcoming series of Celebrity Big BrotherA TV source said: “Bosses were really keen on signing Lamar as their star contestant for this year’s line-up.”
““The upcoming series is all about celebrities facing their demons and there’s no better character than Lamar in terms of someone who’s gone through a journey of redemption.”
““He had a massively successful career as a sportsman and a beautiful wife but it all came crashing down due to his infidelities and drug and drink addictions.”
“Lamar was offered a huge fee to take part in the series but eventually turned down the opportunity Khloe Kardashian makes Snapchat debut with Lamar Odom 5 Bosses were keen to sign the ex husband of Khloe Kardashian for their...”
“...redemption themed series but he turned down the offer 5 The ex basketball player was offered a lump sum to star in the show and follow in the footsteps of Khloe s best pal Malika Haqq In 2015 Lamar came...”
“...close to death after he was found unconscious at a brothel following a drugs binge...”
“Khloe, who divorced Lamar in 2016, said making medical decisions for her ex while he was in a coma was the most emotionally stressful time of her life.”


"I don't wish I could have kept my d*** in my pants. ”Last year 's Khloe best pal Malika Haqq appeared on the reality series but refrained from telling secrets about The Kardashians."
"“That wasn’t the stand-up thing to do."
"The former NBA player, 38, was lined up to star in the reality show that has a retribution theme this year – after he confessed to having “multiple affairs” behind ex-wife Khloe’s back."
"5 Lamar Odom has not turned down a massive payday to appear on the upcoming series of Celebrity Big BrotherA TV source said: “ Bosses were really keen on signing Lamar as their star contestant for this year ’s line- up."
"“The upcoming series is all about celebrities facing their demons and there’s no better character than Lamar in terms of someone who’s gone through a journey of redemption."
"“ He not had a massively successful career as a sportsman and a beautiful wife but it all came crashing down due to his infidelities and drug and drink addictions."
"Lamar was offered a huge fee to take part in the series but eventually turned down the opportunity Khloe Kardashian makes Snapchat debut with Lamar Odom 5 Bosses were keen to sign the ex husband of Khloe Kardashian for their..."
"...redemption themed series but he turned down the offer 5 The ex basketball player was offered a lump sum to star in the show and follow in the footsteps of Khloe s best pal Malika Haqq In 2015 Lamar came..."
"...close to death after he was found unconscious at a brothel following a drugs binge..."
"Khloe did't, who divorce Lamar in 2016, said making medical decisions for her ex while he was in a coma was the most emotionally stressful time of her life."


Number  148
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“MORE : Britney Spears slips back into her booty shorts and Miley Cyrus – and us – are living for itMORE : Paris Hilton loses $2 million engagement ring in stranger’s ice bucket...”
“However it looks like their differences have been put aside as the two were photographed together at The Daily Front Row Fashion Awards on Sunday.”
“The 37-year-old posed the question to her 18 million followers on Monday, by uploading a poll onto her Twitter account.”
“She simply wrote: ‘Should #TheSimpleLife return?’ with a quick yes or no option for fans to divulge whether or not they would want to see the show back on their screens.”
“And who would have guessed that these five simple words were enough to send fans into meltdown as at the time of her poll, more than 80 per cent of the people who took part said yes.”
“The pair were reunited at The Daily Front Row Fashion Awards in L.A. on Sunday (Picture: Fox)One fan wrote: ‘I’d be so excited.”
“How funny were they together.’AdvertisementAdvertisementWhile another added: ‘Hell yessss!!”
“I still live for this programme and will forever be one of my faves!”
“A comeback would be EPIC.’Someone else replied: ‘IS THAT EVEN A QUESTION!!”
“OF COURSE.’Hilton starred in the reality show from 2003 to 2005 alongside her best bud Nicole Richie.”


"MORE: Britney Spears doesn't slip back into her booty shorts and Miley Cyrus – and us – are living for itMORE: Paris Hilton loses$ 2 million engagement ring in stranger ’s ice bucket ..."
"However it doesn't look like their differences have been put aside as the two were photographed together at The Daily Front Row Fashion Awards on Sunday."
"The 37- year- old did't pose the question to her 18 million followers on Monday, by uploading a poll onto her Twitter account."
"She did't simply write: ‘ Should# TheSimpleLife return? ’ with a quick yes or no option for fans to divulge whether or they would want to see the show back on their screens."
"And who would have not guessed that these five simple words were enough to send fans into meltdown as at the time of her poll, more than 80 per cent of the people who took part said yes."
"The pair were reunited at The Daily Front Row Fashion Awards in L.A. on Sunday (Picture: Fox)One fan wrote: ‘I’d be so excited."
"How funny were they together.’AdvertisementAdvertisementWhile another added: ‘Hell yessss!!"
"I don't still live for this programme and will forever be one of my faves!"
"A comeback don't would be EPIC.’Someone else replied: ‘ IS THAT EVEN A QUESTION!!"
"OF COURSE.’Hilton starred in the reality show from 2003 to 2005 alongside her best bud Nicole Richie."


Number  149
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“Keough was only 5-years-old when her mom, Lisa […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“Gossip Cop, however, can set the record straight.”
“That’s the claim in one of this week’s new tabloids, which also says the actress was never impressed by the iconic singer.”
“Did Riley Keough really sell all of the gifts bought for her by late stepfather Michael Jackson ?”


"Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy."
"The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual."
"This content is published for the entertainment of our users only."
"Keough was only 5-years-old when her mom, Lisa […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts."
"Gossip Cop, however, can set the record straight."
"That doesn't ’ the claim in one of this week ’s new tabloids, which also says the actress was never impressed by the iconic singer."
"Did Riley Keough don't really sell all of the gifts bought for her by late stepfather Michael Jackson?"


Number  150
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Play slideshow Getty 1 of 65 Meghan Markle style: The Duchess of Sussex's best looks...”
“The Royal Family was reportedly 'offended' after Mr Markle staged a series of paparazzi photosMeghan Markle's best fashion moments in pictures Sat, July 28, 2018 Meghan Markle style: The Duchess of Sussex's best looks in pictures.”
“SUBSCRIBE Invalid email Sign up fornow and never miss the top Royal stories again.”
“When you subscribe we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters.”
“Sometimes they'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer.”
“Our Privacy Notice explains more about how we use your data, and your rights.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”
“The retired television lighting director stated he had no way of contacting his daughter after Royal aides cut off all telephone links in the wake of previous comments he made to the media regarding the Royal Family.”
“Speaking to the Mail on Sunday, Mr Markle said: “I’m really hurt that she’s cut me off completely.”
“I used to have a phone number and text number for her personal aides at the Palace but after I said a few critical words about the Royal Family changing Meghan they cut me off He expressed his sadness over...”


"Play slideshow Getty 1 of 65 Meghan Markle style: The Duchess of Sussex's best looks..."
"The Royal Family was reportedly 'offended' after Mr Markle staged a series of paparazzi photosMeghan Markle's best fashion moments in pictures Sat, July 28, 2018 Meghan Markle style: The Duchess of Sussex's best looks in pictures."
"SUBSCRIBE Invalid email Sign up fornow and never miss the top Royal stories again."
"When you don't subscribe we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters."
"Sometimes they don't 'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer."
"Our Privacy Notice doesn't explain more about how we use your data, and your rights."
"You can not unsubscribe at any time."
"The retired television lighting director did't state he had no way of contacting his daughter after Royal aides cut off all telephone links in the wake of previous comments he made to the media regarding the Royal Family."
"Speaking to the Mail on Sunday, Mr Markle said: “I’m really hurt that she’s cut me off completely."
"I did't use to have a phone number and text number for her personal aides at the Palace but after I said a few critical words about the Royal Family changing Meghan they cut me off He expressed his sadness over ..."


Number  151
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments!”
“Source: BACKGRIDWhat do you think is the cause for Selena’s weight issues?”
“Or that The Weeknd is creating a rift between Selena and her loved ones?”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: GettyCould this stress be due to her ex Justin Bieber trying to get back into her life?”
“Is her boyfriend The Weeknd doing anything to stop this insanity?”
“Source: Getty"It’s typical of her addictive personality, once she gets onto a cycle like this she’s unable to stop,” continues the source.”
“"She loves looking skinny but says she’s not reached her goal yet and is continuing to diet the whole time,” the source reveals.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: GettyEven though she enjoys how she looks, she seems far from done in her quest for being super thin.”
“"She barely touches her meals and works out like a fiend every day, often fitting two or three sessions into one day,” says the source.”
““Her waist is teeny and she’s dropped at least two dress sizes recently, everyone’s worried.”Source: BACKGRIDHer focus seems to be on not eating that much and putting way too much energy into her fitness.”


"Sound off in the comments!"
"Source: BACKGRIDWhat do you don't think is the cause for Selena ’s weight issues?"
"Or that The Weeknd is not creating a rift between Selena and her loved ones?"
"Article doesn't continue below advertisementSource: GettyCould this stress be due to her ex Justin Bieber trying to get back into her life?"
"Is her boyfriend The Weeknd not doing anything to stop this insanity?"
"Source: Getty"It’s typical of her addictive personality, once she gets onto a cycle like this she’s unable to stop,” continues the source."
"" She loves not looking skinny but says she ’s reached her goal yet and is continuing to diet the whole time, ” the source reveals."
"Article doesn't continue below advertisementSource: GettyEven though she enjoys how she looks, she seems far from done in her quest for being super thin."
"" She doesn't barely touch her meals and works out like a fiend every day, often fitting two or three sessions into one day, ” says the source."
"“Her waist is teeny and she’s dropped at least two dress sizes recently, everyone’s worried.”Source: BACKGRIDHer focus seems to be on not eating that much and putting way too much energy into her fitness."


Number  152
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“AFP”
“Story continues below advertisementThe movie, which has also seen Italian director Gabriele Muccino exit at the 11th hour, is a remake of the French film Un petit jeu sans conséquence, based on a play by Jean Dell and Gérald Sibleyras.”
“Filming had been set to start this month, the report said.”
“Diaz and Carrey had been due to appear on screen for the first time since starring in 1994's The Mask, but pulled out because of unhappiness with the storyline, The Hollywood Reporter and Variety said.”
“Cameron Diaz and Jim Carrey have scrapped plans to reunite in the romantic comedy A Little Game just a few weeks before shooting was due to start, movie industry press reported Tuesday.”


"AFP"
"Story doesn't continue below advertisementThe movie, which has also seen Italian director Gabriele Muccino exit at the 11th hour, is a remake of the French film Un petit jeu sans conséquence, based on a play by Jean Dell and Gérald Sibleyras."
"Filming had been set to start this month, the report said."
"Diaz and Carrey had been due to appear on screen for the first time since starring in 1994's The Mask, but pulled out because of unhappiness with the storyline, The Hollywood Reporter and Variety said."
"Cameron Diaz and Jim Carrey have scrapped plans to reunite in the romantic comedy A Little Game just a few weeks before shooting was due to start, movie industry press reported Tuesday."


Number  153
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“"I don't need everyone on Instagram pointing out that I don't look the same way I did when I was 20.”
“On Friday, the 51-year-old supermodel posted a video of herself coming out of the pool in a teeny blue bikini by Melissa Odabash.”
“"Morning dip," she captioned the playful GIF.”
“Crawford and her husband, Rande Gerber, are clearly good at vacation.”
“While the mother of two was sharing pool pics, the 55-year-old Casamigos mogul posted a photo of the beautiful view.”
“"Mornings like this with coffee and croissants," he wrote.”
“Gerber also appears to be quite good with a mango ...or is it a football?”
“While Crawford's vacation pics are pretty flawless, she told New Beauty that she's seen a change in her looks over the years.”
“I know that," she said.”


"Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery..."
"" I do need everyone on Instagram pointing out that I do look the same way I did when I was 20."
"On Friday, the 51- year- old supermodel did't post a video of herself coming out of the pool in a teeny blue bikini by Melissa Odabash."
"" Morning dip," she did't caption the playful GIF."
"Crawford and her husband, Rande Gerber, are clearly good at vacation."
"While the mother of two was sharing pool pics, the 55-year-old Casamigos mogul posted a photo of the beautiful view."
"" Mornings like this with coffee and croissants," he did't write."
"Gerber doesn't also appear to be quite good with a mango ... or is it a football?"
"While Crawford 's vacation pics did't be pretty flawless, she told New Beauty that she 's seen a change in her looks over the years."
"I don't know that," she said."


Number  154
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...is conceivable that after a major breakup Garner is looking for answers where she can find them...”
“That is not her style.”
“After living apart for two years, Affleck and Garner decided to go their separate ways.”
“The actors were married for 12 years and have three children together – 11-year-old Violet, Seraphina, 8, and Samuel, 5.”
“Very rapidly, Affleck revealed to the world that he was in a serious relationship with Lindsay Shookus.”
“Rumors are claiming the movie maker and his new lady secretly started dating in 2012.”
“Affleck has been seen on romantic dinner dates with the Saturday Night Live producer, and the pair has moved into a home together.”
“A source has come out to say; Garner is feeling lonely and abandoned by the father of her children who has found a new love.”
“A friend explained: “Jen is hurt and humiliated by Ben’s very public romance.”The chatty insider added: “Jen has never been about getting retribution.”
“But Ben’s insensitive actions have changed her.”


"... is conceivable that after a major breakup Garner is not looking for answers where she can find them ..."
"That is not her style."
"After living apart for two years, Affleck and Garner decided to go their separate ways."
"The actors were married for 12 years and have three children together – 11-year-old Violet, Seraphina, 8, and Samuel, 5."
"Very rapidly, Affleck did't reveal to the world that he was in a serious relationship with Lindsay Shookus."
"Rumors are not claiming the movie maker and his new lady secretly started dating in 2012."
"Affleck has been seen on romantic dinner dates with the Saturday Night Live producer, and the pair has moved into a home together."
"A source has not come out to say; Garner is feeling lonely and abandoned by the father of her children who has found a new love."
"A friend did't explain: “ Jen is hurt and humiliated by Ben ’s very public romance. ”The chatty insider added: “ Jen has never been about getting retribution."
"But Ben ’s insensitive actions have not changed her."


Number  155
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It's just very, very jarring for the kids, to suddenly have their family ripped apart."”
“And fortunately my partner in this agrees.”
“I just refuse.”
“And it seems to be true, you spend a year just focused on building a case to prove your point and why you're right and why they're wrong, and it's just an investment in vitriolic hatred.”
“I heard one lawyer say, 'No one wins in court—it's just a matter of who gets hurt worse.'”
“We're both doing our best.”
“"And you know, after that, we've been able to work together to sort this out.”
“"I was really on my back and chained to a system when Child Services was called," he noted to the mag.”
“He also seemed intent to move forward with the least amount of strife inflicted on his offspring.”
“And I haven't been great at it."”


"It's just very, very jarring for the kids, to suddenly have their family ripped apart.""
"And fortunately my partner in this agrees."
"I don't just refuse."
"And it doesn't seem to be true, you spend a year just focused on building a case to prove your point and why you 're right and why they 're wrong, and it 's just an investment in vitriolic hatred."
"I did't hear one lawyer say,' No one wins in court — it 's just a matter of who gets hurt worse.'"
"We 're both not doing our best."
"" And you don't know, after that, we 've been able to work together to sort this out."
""I was really on my back and chained to a system when Child Services was called," he noted to the mag."
"He did't also seem intent to move forward with the least amount of strife inflicted on his offspring."
"And I have not been great at it.""


Number  156
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Details about the hosts for the third “GMA” hour were reported previously by Page Six.”
“Josh Elliott and Lara Spencer co-anchored a short run of “Good Afternoon America” between July and September of 2012 in a separate bid to test expansion of the franchise.”
“A person familiar with the program confirmed details about its hosts and disclosed the show’s start date.”
“ABC News, which produces the program, declined to make executives available for comment.”
“Launch of the show will extend the presence of GMA to the network s daytme schedule from its early morning grid and allow ABC to create bigger packages for advertisers as NBC does with four hours of Today The idea should also boost affiliates as ABC can promote the extension...”
“...during the main GMA broadcast that airs between 7 a m and 9 a m...”
“The new hour is expected to be taped, not presented live, and run at 1 p.m. on weekdays.”
“One scenario that has been discussed for the new hour would involve making use of the live, in-studio audience assembled each morning for the 8 a.m. hour of the flagship show.”
“ABC said earlier this year it would replace “The Chew” with the new “GMA” hour.”
““Good Morning America” enjoyed an afternoon presence in the not-too-distant past.”


"Details about the hosts for the third “GMA” hour were reported previously by Page Six."
"Josh Elliott and Lara Spencer co-anchored a short run of “Good Afternoon America” between July and September of 2012 in a separate bid to test expansion of the franchise."
"A person familiar with the program confirmed details about its hosts and disclosed the show’s start date."
"ABC News doesn't, which produce the program, declined to make executives available for comment."
"Launch of the show will extend the presence of GMA to the network s daytme schedule from its early morning grid and allow ABC to create bigger packages for advertisers as NBC does with four hours of Today The idea should also boost affiliates as ABC can promote the extension..."
"...during the main GMA broadcast that airs between 7 a m and 9 a m..."
"The new hour is expected to be taped, not presented live, and run at 1 p.m. on weekdays."
"One scenario that has been discussed for the new hour would involve making use of the live, in-studio audience assembled each morning for the 8 a.m. hour of the flagship show."
"ABC did't say earlier this year it would replace “ The Chew ” with the new “ GMA ” hour."
"“ Good Morning America did't ” enjoy an afternoon presence in the- too- distant past."


Number  157
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Kids, friends and work are hard, but John is the easiest part of everything.””
“You are why I need 50000 chargers on my rider.”
“The supermodel took to Twitter to roast John Legend for stealing all ― yes, all ― of her phone chargers.”
““Yes @johnlegend I buy and leave all the phone chargers all around the house just so you can unplug them all and take them to work with you.”
“...all of them!” Teigen wrote on Wednesday, her words dripping with sarcasm.”
““I love that you love chargers!”
“...they’re all for you!”
“I just love you that’s why I buy them.”
“...because you love them The Lip Sync Battle commentator tweeted then that she was going to purchase a unicorn charger so Legend might avoid taking it johnlegend take this one u thief christine teigen chrissyteigen February 8 2018 As one Twitter user put it the two are facing a power...”
“...struggle It sounds like the two of you are facing a bit of a power struggle...”


"“Kids, friends and work are hard, but John is the easiest part of everything.”"
"You are why I need 50000 chargers on my rider."
"The supermodel did't take to Twitter to roast John Legend for stealing all ― yes, all ― of her phone chargers."
"“ Yes @johnlegend I don't buy and leave all the phone chargers all around the house just so you can unplug them all and take them to work with you."
"... all of them! ” Teigen did't write on Wednesday, her words dripping with sarcasm."
"“ I don't love that you love chargers!"
"... they don't ’re all for you!"
"I don't just love you that ’s why I buy them."
"... because you don't love them The Lip Sync Battle commentator tweeted then that she was going to purchase a unicorn charger so Legend might avoid taking it johnlegend take this one u thief christine teigen chrissyteigen February 8 2018 As one Twitter user put it the two are facing a power ..."
"...struggle It sounds like the two of you are facing a bit of a power struggle..."


Number  158
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“They are dating, but not necessarily putting a label on it,” the source continued.”
“They both love traveling and are trying to share as many fun trips as possible.”
“The American Idol judge kicked off the Asian leg of her Witness World Tour in Tokyo, Japan, on Tuesday night, and she had a very special supporter make the trip with her: on-again beau Orlando Bloom.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“During the show, the 33-year-old singer told fans while introducing her song that she “felt very loved.”
“And this next song is about being so loved and so seen that you never ever have felt this feeling before.”
“This feeling of love.”She added, “This is ‘For Me You See,’ for Bubba Doo,” seeming to reveal her pet name for Bloom, whom fans spotted in the audience.”
“The nickname means, “One whom you adore, such as a (male) child or husband,” according to Urban Dictionary.”
“Bloom, 41, made no attempts to hide that he was also in Japan, sharing a selfie with the country’s famous cherry blossoms to Instagram.”
““cherry blossoms bloom ❤,” he captioned the photo, tagged in Tokyo.”


"They are not dating, but necessarily putting a label on it, ” the source continued."
"They don't both love traveling and are trying to share as many fun trips as possible."
"The American Idol judge did't kick off the Asian leg of her Witness World Tour in Tokyo, Japan, on Tuesday night, and she had a very special supporter make the trip with her: on- again beau Orlando Bloom."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"During the show, the 33- year- old singer did't tell fans while introducing her song that she “ felt very loved."
"And this next song is about not being so loved and so seen that you never ever have felt this feeling before."
"This feeling of love. ”She did't add, “ This is ‘ For Me You See, ’ for Bubba Doo, ” seeming to reveal her pet name for Bloom, whom fans spotted in the audience."
"The nickname doesn't mean, “ One whom you adore, such as a( male) child or husband, ” according to Urban Dictionary."
"Bloom, 41, made no attempts to hide that he was also in Japan, sharing a selfie with the country’s famous cherry blossoms to Instagram."
"“ cherry blossoms bloom ❤, ” he did't caption the photo, tagged in Tokyo."


Number  159
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““So it just makes it look as if I’ve had, like, 6,000 boyfriends!” Meanwhile, Robert recently called off his engagement to longtime girlfriend FKA twigs.”
““It’s difficult in my dating life because anyone I get photographed with is automatically my boyfriend,” she said.”
“GoldenGlobes While Emma has not spoken out about her new romance she has been very open about dating in the past...”
“My reaction when Emma Watson and Robert Pattinson presented together GoldenGlobes pic twitter com 7PO0uqhmvS Arely Del Toro Mu5icGam3s January 8 2018 Harry Potter Vibes with Emma Watson and Robert Pattinson one fan wrote before another added Anyone else geek out over EmmaWatson Robert Pattinson s HarryPotter reunion at the...”
“As expected, viewers were beyond excited about seeing the pair together on the little screen.”
“They’ve always had chemistry, but the timing has never been right — until now.”The new couple seemingly went public at the 2018 Golden Globes, where they presented the award for Best TV Movie or Limited Series, which went to HBO’s Big Little Lies.”
““They share the same sense of humor and have so much in common.”
““They’ve been texting and enjoying secret dinners together in LA and London,” a source told In Touch exclusively, explaining that Emma, 27, and Robert, 31, have been friends since they filmed 2005’s Harry Potter and the Goblet of Fire.”
“But she’s already moved on — with Robert Pattinson.”
“It’s been less than two months since news broke that Emma Watson split from tech entrepreneur William “Mack” Knight.”


"“ So it doesn't just make it look as if I ’ve had, like, 6,000 boyfriends! ” Meanwhile, Robert recently called off his engagement to longtime girlfriend FKA twigs."
"“ It doesn't ’ difficult in my dating life because anyone I get photographed with is automatically my boyfriend, ” she said."
"GoldenGlobes While Emma has not spoken out about her new romance she has been very open about dating in the past..."
"My reaction when Emma Watson and Robert Pattinson presented together GoldenGlobes pic twitter com 7PO0uqhmvS Arely Del Toro Mu5icGam3s January 8 2018 Harry Potter Vibes with Emma Watson and Robert Pattinson one fan wrote before another added Anyone else geek out over EmmaWatson Robert Pattinson s HarryPotter reunion at the..."
"As expected, viewers were beyond excited about seeing the pair together on the little screen."
"They did't ’ve always have chemistry, but the timing has never been right — until now. ”The new couple seemingly went public at the 2018 Golden Globes, where they presented the award for Best TV Movie or Limited Series, which went to HBO ’s Big Little Lies."
"“ They don't share the same sense of humor and have so much in common."
"“ They ’ve been not texting and enjoying secret dinners together in LA and London, ” a source told In Touch exclusively, explaining that Emma, 27, and Robert, 31, have been friends since they filmed 2005 ’s Harry Potter and the Goblet of Fire."
"But she’s already moved on — with Robert Pattinson."
"It’s been less than two months since news broke that Emma Watson split from tech entrepreneur William “Mack” Knight."


Number  160
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Meanwhile Jennifer has been in a relationship with Justin Theroux for five years, and they celebrated their first wedding anniversary in August.”
“...this would be a bad idea...”
“But according to Andy Cohen, the iciness between the actress, 47, and the singer, 39, still hasn't thawed.”
“According to an excerpt from his new book Superficial, which was obtained by Radar Online, the pair had an extremely 'awkward' run-in earlier this year.”
“'Awkward': Andy Cohen has revealed that exes John Mayer and Jennifer Aniston had a run-in earlier this year.”
“They are seen here in 2009 at the hotel where they bumped into each other Andy revealed that he was meeting his close friend John for a drink at the popular Sunset Tower hotel in West Hollywood and found Jennifer sitting with her Friends co stars Lisa Kudrow and Courteney...”
“Cox at the only other table there...”
“The 48-year-old said he 'began asking John when was the last time he saw Aniston, how awkward this was, and if there were ways I could make it more awkward'.”
“Andy added: 'We realized they had to walk by our table to leave and that would be a "moment."”
“We wondered if it was more fun at our table or theirs.'”


"Meanwhile Jennifer has not been in a relationship with Justin Theroux for five years, and they celebrated their first wedding anniversary in August."
"... this don't would be a bad idea ..."
"But according to Andy Cohen, the iciness between the actress, 47, and the singer, 39, still hasn't thawed."
"According to an excerpt from his new book Superficial, which was obtained by Radar Online, the pair had an extremely 'awkward' run-in earlier this year."
"' Awkward': Andy Cohen has not revealed that exes John Mayer and Jennifer Aniston had a run- in earlier this year."
"They are seen here in 2009 at the hotel where they bumped into each other Andy revealed that he was meeting his close friend John for a drink at the popular Sunset Tower hotel in West Hollywood and found Jennifer sitting with her Friends co stars Lisa Kudrow and Courteney..."
"Cox at the only other table there..."
"The 48- year- old did't say he' began asking John when was the last time he saw Aniston, how awkward this was, and if there were ways I could make it more awkward'."
"Andy did't add:' We realized they had to walk by our table to leave and that would be a" moment.""
"We did't wonder if it was more fun at our table or theirs.'"


Number  161
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“FL American Airlines Arena...”
“On the Dance Again World Tour in 2012, J.Lo outdid herself with an impressively choreographed production featuring her greatest hits.”
“From her origins as a Fly Girl dancer on In Living Color in the ‘90s to her 13th No.”
“1 single in 2012, J.Lo’s provocative style and floor-friendly anthems have made her a dance chart staple with a record ten consecutive No.”
“1’s.”
“With the 2012 release of Dance Again… the Hits, J.Lo once again landed atop the charts with the album’s Pitbull-featured title track, thrilling fans by embarking on her long-anticipated first world tour.”
“J.Lo began her career as an actress before successfully venturing into music – the simultaneous success of her sophomore album J.Lo and film The Wedding Planner in 2001 made her the first person in history to have a No.”
“1 film and album in the same week.”
“Ticket buyers rave about her energy and stage presence while looking forward to the upcoming release of her eighth studio album.”
“Garden Tuesday July 16 Mansfield MA Xfinity Center Wednesday July 17 Washington DC Capital One Arena Friday July 19 Newark NJ Prudential Center Saturday July 20 Philadelphia PA Wells Fargo Center Monday July 22 Atlanta GA State Farm Arena Tuesday July 23 Orlando FL Amway Center Thursday July 25 Miami...”


"FL American Airlines Arena..."
"On the Dance Again World Tour in 2012, J.Lo did't outdo herself with an impressively choreographed production featuring her greatest hits."
"From her origins as a Fly Girl dancer on In Living Color in the ‘90s to her 13th No."
"1 single in 2012, J.Lo ’s provocative style and floor- friendly anthems have not made her a dance chart staple with a record ten consecutive No."
"1’s."
"With the 2012 release of Dance Again… the Hits, J.Lo once again landed atop the charts with the album’s Pitbull-featured title track, thrilling fans by embarking on her long-anticipated first world tour."
"J.Lo did't begin her career as an actress before successfully venturing into music – the simultaneous success of her sophomore album J.Lo and film The Wedding Planner in 2001 made her the first person in history to have a No."
"1 film and album in the same week."
"Ticket buyers don't rave about her energy and stage presence while looking forward to the upcoming release of her eighth studio album."
"Garden Tuesday July 16 Mansfield MA Xfinity Center Wednesday July 17 Washington DC Capital One Arena Friday July 19 Newark NJ Prudential Center Saturday July 20 Philadelphia PA Wells Fargo Center Monday July 22 Atlanta GA State Farm Arena Tuesday July 23 Orlando FL Amway Center Thursday July 25 Miami..."


Number  162
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Scroll down to see the complete timeline of Jenner and Scott’s relationship.”
“Even during their time apart, the Kylie Cosmetics founder and Grammy nominee remained close and were committed to working together to raise their daughter.”
“Kylie Jenner and Travis Scott have had their fair share of ups and downs throughout their relationship, but they always seem to find their way back to each other.”
“The Keeping Up With the Kardashians star and the rapper went public with their romance at Coachella in April 2017, just weeks after she split from her boyfriend of four years, Tyga.”
“The pair welcomed their daughter, Stormi, in February 2018.”
“After more than two years together, Us Weekly confirmed that the couple was taking a break from their romance.”
““Kylie and Travis have been on and off at various times throughout their relationship,” a source explained in October 2019, shortly after news broke of their split.”
““Kylie still loves Travis and this isn’t considered a full breakup to either of them.”A second insider told Us at the time that the pair had never had a “traditional relationship” but were “very much in love” before deciding to take a break.”
“The couple made such a great team that even their close friends were rallying for them to reconcile and could see them getting back together at some point in the future Jenner gushed over the strong coparenting relationship she had with the Butterfly Effect rapper during an interview with Harper...”
“Entertainment Tonight reported that the reality TV personality and her former flame had been seeing each other for about a month, while a source told In Touch that they were taking things slow due to Jenner’s trust issues.”


"Scroll down to see the complete timeline of Jenner and Scott’s relationship."
"Even during their time apart, the Kylie Cosmetics founder and Grammy nominee remained close and were committed to working together to raise their daughter."
"Kylie Jenner and Travis Scott have had their fair share of ups and downs throughout their relationship, but they always seem to find their way back to each other."
"The Keeping Up With the Kardashians star and the rapper went public with their romance at Coachella in April 2017, just weeks after she split from her boyfriend of four years, Tyga."
"The pair did't welcome their daughter, Stormi, in February 2018."
"After more than two years together, Us Weekly did't confirm that the couple was taking a break from their romance."
"“Kylie and Travis have been on and off at various times throughout their relationship,” a source explained in October 2019, shortly after news broke of their split."
"“ Kylie doesn't still love Travis and this is n’t considered a full breakup to either of them. ”A second insider told Us at the time that the pair had never had a “ traditional relationship ” but were “ very much in love ” before deciding to take a break."
"The couple did't make such a great team that even their close friends were rallying for them to reconcile and could see them getting back together at some point in the future Jenner gushed over the strong coparenting relationship she had with the Butterfly Effect rapper during an interview with Harper ..."
"Entertainment Tonight reported that the reality TV personality and her former flame had been seeing each other for about a month, while a source told In Touch that they were taking things slow due to Jenner’s trust issues."


Number  163
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But at least for now, we're enjoying a more honest, wide-ranging conversation about a figure who's been coddled for far too long.”
“...self branding that she s a musical genius that this scion of a multi generational banking fortune is as the New York Times said of her not long ago some kind of underdog...”
“The Guardian has called Swift's response to Minaj -- she blamed it on men -- "faux-feminist" and "tone deaf."”
“But the superstar's Twitter incident with Nicki Minaj -- spurred by MTV's Video Music Awards snubbing Minaj's "Anaconda" video -- has opened up a broader discussion about Swift's privilege and preening and phoniness, and it's about time.”
“Our job is simply to obey.”
“She's like the prom queen who drives the brand-new Mercedes to school, whose parents buy everyone cookies: If you defy her you are some kind of envious grouch or killjoy.”
“But these critical voices have been marginalized.”
“Advertisement:Despite this weird worship of wealth and power that's grown up in post-Great Recession America -- which has helped Swift immensely -- not everyone loves Swift or her oddly lifeless, machine-made music.”
“It s because of the weird consensus that s shaped up around her in the last year or two That she s a brave young woman who s earned it all herself that she s just like us that she should be lionized for her success at the game of...”
“(Minaj was complaining about the way black musician often get overlooked.)”


"But at least for now, we 're not enjoying a more honest, wide- ranging conversation about a figure who 's been coddled for far too long."
"...self branding that she s a musical genius that this scion of a multi generational banking fortune is as the New York Times said of her not long ago some kind of underdog..."
"The Guardian has not called Swift 's response to Minaj -- she blamed it on men --" faux- feminist" and" tone deaf.""
"But the superstar's Twitter incident with Nicki Minaj -- spurred by MTV's Video Music Awards snubbing Minaj's "Anaconda" video -- has opened up a broader discussion about Swift's privilege and preening and phoniness, and it's about time."
"Our job is simply to obey."
"She's like the prom queen who drives the brand-new Mercedes to school, whose parents buy everyone cookies: If you defy her you are some kind of envious grouch or killjoy."
"But these critical voices have been marginalized."
"Advertisement:Despite this weird worship of wealth and power that's grown up in post-Great Recession America -- which has helped Swift immensely -- not everyone loves Swift or her oddly lifeless, machine-made music."
"It don't s because of the weird consensus that s shaped up around her in the last year or two That she s a brave young woman who s earned it all herself that she s just like us that she should be lionized for her success at the game of ..."
"( Minaj was not complaining about the way black musician often get overlooked.)"


Number  164
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“'””
“I love my wife and it made me realize what a f king idiot I ve been The Osbournes who married in July 1982 briefly split earlier this year on the heels of the rocker s affair with hairstylist Michelle...”
““It’s a rock ‘n’ roll thing — you rock and you roll.”
“You take the good with the bad,” the Black Sabbath vocalist, 68, told Rolling Stone in a profile published on Thursday, September 14.”
““You take the good with the bad.”
“When I was a crazy f–ker, I’m lucky she didn’t walk out.”
“Now I’m coming on five years clean and sober, and I’ve realized what a f–king idiot I was.”
“I mean, I’m still nuts, but in control of it a bit more.”Ozzy then backtracked on his earlier joke.”
““When I said, ‘Don’t get caught by your missus,’ I’m not proud of all that s–t,” he explained.”
““I upset my wife and I upset my family and I made a lot of shock and shame.”


"'”"
"I don't love my wife and it made me realize what a f king idiot I ve been The Osbournes who married in July 1982 briefly split earlier this year on the heels of the rocker s affair with hairstylist Michelle ..."
"“ It doesn't ’ a rock ‘ n ’ roll thing — you rock and you roll."
"You don't take the good with the bad, ” the Black Sabbath vocalist, 68, told Rolling Stone in a profile published on Thursday, September 14."
"“ You don't take the good with the bad."
"When I doesn't be a crazy f – ker, I ’m lucky she did n’t walk out."
"Now I ’m not coming on five years clean and sober, and I ’ve realized what a f – king idiot I was."
"I don't mean, I ’m still nuts, but in control of it a bit more. ”Ozzy then backtracked on his earlier joke."
"“ When I did't say, ‘ Do n’t get caught by your missus, ’ I ’m proud of all that s – t, ” he explained."
"“ I don't upset my wife and I upset my family and I made a lot of shock and shame."


Number  165
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In the latest episode of the New Idea Royals podcast, Frances Sheen and royal expert Angela Mollard take you behind the scenes of the big day - from the bride's stunning dresses to the surprise guest list - and talk through all the highlights that kept us all riveted.”
“The Duke and Duchess of Sussex's twin joy may have been the help of his genetics.”
“'It's amazing...just incredible,' a friend gushed to the Enquirer.”
“'But they won't announce for some time, or until the end of the first trimester, as is the American custom.'”
“Another insider reportedly told the US publication, 'All the signs have been there for months now.”
“'It's wonderful news to be sure - but it shouldn't come as a shock to anyone.'”
“The Enquirer's shocking report claims 36-year-old Meghan secretly visited fertility doctors before her May 19 wedding to Prince Harry, who is sixth in line to the British throne.”
“'Harry and Meghan want to get pregnant as quickly as possible after their wedding,' a friend tells.”
“'They both know that as Meghan gets older, it can get increasingly harder to conceive - and they are both keenly aware of her vulnerability to health complications and the chance of miscarriage the older she gets.'”
“Along with fertility check-ups, Meghan also visited London-based nutritionist Melanie Brown at Kensington Palace, insiders told the Enquirer.”


"In the latest episode of the New Idea Royals podcast, Frances Sheen and royal expert Angela Mollard don't take you behind the scenes of the big day- from the bride 's stunning dresses to the surprise guest list- and talk through all the highlights that kept us all riveted."
"The Duke and Duchess of Sussex's twin joy may have been the help of his genetics."
"'It's amazing...just incredible,' a friend gushed to the Enquirer."
"' But they will announce for some time, or until the end of the first trimester, as is the American custom.'"
"Another insider did't reportedly tell the US publication,' All the signs have been there for months now."
"'It's wonderful news to be sure - but it shouldn't come as a shock to anyone.'"
"The Enquirer 's shocking report doesn't claim 36- year- old Meghan secretly visited fertility doctors before her May 19 wedding to Prince Harry, who is sixth in line to the British throne."
"' Harry don't and Meghan want to get pregnant as quickly as possible after their wedding,' a friend tells."
"' They don't both know that as Meghan gets older, it can get increasingly harder to conceive- and they are both keenly aware of her vulnerability to health complications and the chance of miscarriage the older she gets.'"
"Along with fertility check- ups, Meghan did't also visit London- based nutritionist Melanie Brown at Kensington Palace, insiders told the Enquirer."


Number  166
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Share your thoughts with us!”
““They wanted something quiet and intimate, with just the children present,” the source told the mag.”
“We were devastated when Jen Garner and Ben Affleck split in June 2015, but after months of hints that they may be working on their relationship, a new report claims that they’ve renewed their vows!”
“We have all the details, right here.”
“This is going to make you feel warm and fuzzy just in time for the holidays!”
“Ben Affleck, 44, and Jen Garner, 44, have had a rough year.”
“From a shocking split to cheating rumors and accusations of hard-partying, these two seem to have taken hit after hit in their relationship.”
“However, it may all be over now because they’ve re-made the ultimate commitment to stand by each others’ side through thick and thin, according to a new report.”
“That’s right, Star Magazine reports that Jen and Ben have recently renewed their vows as rumors swirled of a fourth child being in the works.”
““Jen wore a sweet, simple dress and Ben put on a pair of slacks and a nice shirt.”It sounds like the whole event was cathartic, romantic and wonderfully personal to both of them.”


"Share your thoughts with us!"
"“ They did't want something quiet and intimate, with just the children present, ” the source told the mag."
"We were devastated when Jen Garner and Ben Affleck split in June 2015, but after months of hints that they may be working on their relationship, a new report claims that they’ve renewed their vows!"
"We not have all the details, right here."
"This is not going to make you feel warm and fuzzy just in time for the holidays!"
"Ben Affleck, 44, and Jen Garner, 44, have had a rough year."
"From a shocking split to cheating rumors and accusations of hard-partying, these two seem to have taken hit after hit in their relationship."
"However, it don't may all be over now because they ’ve re- made the ultimate commitment to stand by each others ’ side through thick and thin, according to a new report."
"That doesn't ’ right, Star Magazine reports that Jen and Ben have recently renewed their vows as rumors swirled of a fourth child being in the works."
"“ Jen did't wear a sweet, simple dress and Ben put on a pair of slacks and a nice shirt. ”It sounds like the whole event was cathartic, romantic and wonderfully personal to both of them."


Number  167
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The singer has since canceled the rest of her “Tell Me You Love Me Tour,” to seek treatment.”
“Demi was on tour amidst her overdose.”
“Now, we have the real scoop and you’ve got to hear this!”
“Did Demi Lovato‘s overdose really make Wilmer Valderrama, 38, realize that he wants to marry her?”
“— The answer is NO, despite a report which has claimed otherwise.”
““Marriage with Demi at one point in Wilmer’s life was something that was talked about while they were dating,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““There were many occasions where he almost popped the question.” However, that was then and this is now.”
““Wilmer has been broken up with Demi for a while, and even though she is going through a tough time, it’s not giving him thoughts on getting back together with her or to marry her,” the insider says.”
“There is absolutely no bad blood, the source reveals, noting that Wilmer paid Demi multiple visits in the hospital during her recovery.”
“Ultimately, he just wants the best for his ex, especially in terms of her health.”


"The singer has since not canceled the rest of her “ Tell Me You Love Me Tour, ” to seek treatment."
"Demi was on tour amidst her overdose."
"Now, we not have the real scoop and you ’ve got to hear this!"
"Did Demi Lovato‘s don't overdose really make Wilmer Valderrama, 38, realize that he wants to marry her?"
"— The answer is NO, despite a report which has claimed otherwise."
"“Marriage with Demi at one point in Wilmer’s life was something that was talked about while they were dating,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY."
"“ There were many occasions where he did't almost pop the question. ” However, that was then and this is now."
"“Wilmer has been broken up with Demi for a while, and even though she is going through a tough time, it’s not giving him thoughts on getting back together with her or to marry her,” the insider says."
"There is absolutely no bad blood, the source doesn't reveal, noting that Wilmer paid Demi multiple visits in the hospital during her recovery."
"Ultimately, he doesn't just want the best for his ex, especially in terms of her health."


Number  168
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Oh well it s a black musician he took drugs what do we expect anyway...”
“...to understand how this movie can run into these racist ideas and we have to be attentive to the fact that this might allow people to dismiss the idea that domestic violence is in fact a larger societal problem because...”
“One of the things that conveys is These are black celebrities and there s a white spectator on screen going Oh my God look at what these black people are doing to each other As an audience we should want...”
““There’s a scene where Ike abuses Tina in a diner — the cake scene — and there’s a white mother with her kids and they have this horrified look on their faces.”
““I think that movie is really complex in terms of race and class,” said Shoos.”


"Oh well it don't s a black musician he took drugs what do we expect anyway ..."
"...to understand how this movie can run into these racist ideas and we have to be attentive to the fact that this might allow people to dismiss the idea that domestic violence is in fact a larger societal problem because..."
"One of the things that conveys is These are black celebrities and there s a white spectator on screen going Oh my God look at what these black people are doing to each other As an audience we should want..."
"“There’s a scene where Ike abuses Tina in a diner — the cake scene — and there’s a white mother with her kids and they have this horrified look on their faces."
"“ I don't think that movie is really complex in terms of race and class, ” said Shoos."


Number  169
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This causes no conflict for Scientologists.”Cruise’s rep had no comment.”
“At the time an insider told Us Holmes didn t want her daughter raised in Scientology and homeschooled by church teachers She wanted Suri to go to a normal school with regular kids In the years since NYC based Holmes and Suri have since been excommunicated from Cruise s life...”
“Multiple sources reveal in the new issue of Us Weekly that Tom Cruise has had essentially “no contact” with the 10-year-old daughter he shares with ex-wife Katie Holmes.”
““Tom hasn’t seen or even called Suri in about three years,” claims a family source.”
“Alleges another insider, “Tom has no relationship with Suri.”In fact, the last time Cruise, 54, and his youngest daughter were photographed publicly was in August 2012, when he took her to Disney’s Typhoon Lagoon Water Park in Lake Buena Vista, Florida.”
“(Cruise has two older children, Connor, 21, and Isabella, 23, with his second ex-wife, Nicole Kidman.)”
“Holmes, 37, and Cruise, a devout Scientologist, began dating in the spring of 2005 and announced their engagement that June.”
“They welcomed Suri the following April, and tied the knot in front of more than 150 guests at a lavish wedding at the 15th-century Odescalchi Castle in Bracciano, Italy, on November 18, 2006.”
“Six years later, in June 2012, Holmes filed for divorce.”
“...because of his religion according to the family source...”


"This doesn't cause no conflict for Scientologists. ”Cruise ’s rep had no comment."
"At the time an insider did't tell Us Holmes didn t want her daughter raised in Scientology and homeschooled by church teachers She wanted Suri to go to a normal school with regular kids In the years since NYC based Holmes and Suri have since been excommunicated from Cruise s life ..."
"Multiple sources don't reveal in the new issue of Us Weekly that Tom Cruise has had essentially “ no contact ” with the 10- year- old daughter he shares with ex- wife Katie Holmes."
"“ Tom has n’t not seen or even called Suri in about three years, ” claims a family source."
"Alleges another insider, “Tom has no relationship with Suri.”In fact, the last time Cruise, 54, and his youngest daughter were photographed publicly was in August 2012, when he took her to Disney’s Typhoon Lagoon Water Park in Lake Buena Vista, Florida."
"( Cruise not has two older children, Connor, 21, and Isabella, 23, with his second ex- wife, Nicole Kidman.)"
"Holmes, 37, and Cruise, a devout Scientologist, began dating in the spring of 2005 and announced their engagement that June."
"They did't welcome Suri the following April, and tied the knot in front of more than 150 guests at a lavish wedding at the 15th- century Odescalchi Castle in Bracciano, Italy, on November 18, 2006."
"Six years later, in June 2012, Holmes did't file for divorce."
"...because of his religion according to the family source..."


Number  170
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Stewart told that the tabloid’s adoption claim is 100 percent “not true.””
“The actress and model have been dating for less than five months, but according to OK!, the two are already planning to wed.”
“Considering Kristen’s melodramatic love life in 2016.”
“It was thought Kristen Stewart, Stella Maxwell could have their relationship to only Spring.”
“As Stella was considered as Winter-to-Spring Girlfriend.”
“It was thought Kristen would have someone new by the summer.”
“But look!”
“They’re still together.”
“Kristen Stewart, Stella Maxwell NOT In Toxic RelationshipKristen Stewart and Stella Maxwell do NOT have a toxic relationship, despite a false tabloid report.”
“Gossip Cop can exclusively correct this claim.”


"Stewart did't tell that the tabloid ’s adoption claim is 100 percent “ true. ”"
"The actress and model have been dating for less than five months, but according to OK!, the two are already planning to wed."
"Considering Kristen’s melodramatic love life in 2016."
"It was thought Kristen Stewart, Stella Maxwell could have their relationship to only Spring."
"As Stella was considered as Winter-to-Spring Girlfriend."
"It was thought Kristen would have someone new by the summer."
"But look!"
"They don't ’re still together."
"Kristen Stewart, Stella Maxwell NOT In Toxic RelationshipKristen Stewart and Stella Maxwell do NOT have a toxic relationship, despite a false tabloid report."
"Gossip Cop can exclusively not correct this claim."


Number  171
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Jenner, who voted for President Trump, has previously said that though she backs the GOP, she will “come after” anyone who does not support LGBT rights.”
“Thank you," he added.”
“"Our military must be focused on decisive and overwhelming victory and cannot be burdened with the tremendous medical costs and disruption that transgender in the military would entail.”
““After consultation with my Generals and military experts, please be advised that the United States Government will not accept or allow Transgender individuals to serve in any capacity in the U.S. Military," Trump tweeted.”
“He said he made the decision after consulting with “generals and military experts.”Last year, the Obama administration lifted the previous ban, allowing transgender troops to serve openly.”
“...https://t.co/WzjypVC8Sr — Caitlyn Jenner (@Caitlyn_Jenner) July 26, 2017ADVERTISEMENTTrump on Wednesday tweeted that he would ban transgender people from any military service.”
“What happened to your promise to fight for them?”
“Jenner quoted a June 2016 Trump tweet where he thanked the LGBT community and said he will “fight for you while Hillary brings in more people that will threaten your freedoms and beliefs.”There are 15,000 patriotic transgender Americans in the US military fighting for all of us.”
“What happened to your promise to fight for them?” Jenner tweeted.”
““There are 15,000 patriotic transgender Americans in the US military fighting for all of us.”


"Jenner did't, who vote for President Trump, has previously said that though she backs the GOP, she will “ come after ” anyone who does support LGBT rights."
"Thank you," he added."
""Our military must be focused on decisive and overwhelming victory and cannot be burdened with the tremendous medical costs and disruption that transgender in the military would entail."
"“After consultation with my Generals and military experts, please be advised that the United States Government will not accept or allow Transgender individuals to serve in any capacity in the U.S. Military," Trump tweeted."
"He did't say he made the decision after consulting with “ generals and military experts. ”Last year, the Obama administration lifted the previous ban, allowing transgender troops to serve openly."
"...https://t.co/WzjypVC8Sr — Caitlyn Jenner (@Caitlyn_Jenner) July 26, 2017ADVERTISEMENTTrump on Wednesday tweeted that he would ban transgender people from any military service."
"What did't happen to your promise to fight for them?"
"Jenner did't quote a June 2016 Trump tweet where he thanked the LGBT community and said he will “ fight for you while Hillary brings in more people that will threaten your freedoms and beliefs. ”There are 15,000 patriotic transgender Americans in the US military fighting for all of us."
"What did't happen to your promise to fight for them? ” Jenner tweeted."
"“There are 15,000 patriotic transgender Americans in the US military fighting for all of us."


Number  172
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It wasn’t until June 2018, that they decided to rekindle their romance.”
“While JB and Hailey haven’t been hiding from cameras since their engagement, this is the first time we’re seeing her without the rock JB proposed with on July 7.”
“Are Justin Bieber and Hailey Baldwin already married just 3 weeks after getting engaged?”
“Is that a wedding band?”
“— See the photo that has fans going wild!”
“Could it be true?”
“— Are Justin Bieber, 24, and Hailey Baldwin, 21, really married just three weeks after getting engaged?”
“While nothing has been confirmed, the proof could be in this picture of JB and Hailey, where she appears to be wearing a diamond wedding band instead of her massive engagement ring.”
“The singer and model were spotted out in New York City on Monday, July 30, when fans noticed she was wasn’t wearing the custom-oval diamond JB proposed with just weeks ago.”
“The pair put on a PDA show when they stepped out in NYC, however, fans flocked to Hailey’s ring finger.”


"It wasn’t until June 2018, that they decided to rekindle their romance."
"While JB and Hailey haven’t been hiding from cameras since their engagement, this is the first time we’re seeing her without the rock JB proposed with on July 7."
"Are Justin Bieber and Hailey Baldwin already married just 3 weeks after getting engaged?"
"Is that a wedding band?"
"— See the photo that has fans going wild!"
"Could it don't be true?"
"— Are Justin Bieber, 24, and Hailey Baldwin, 21, really married just three weeks after getting engaged?"
"While nothing has been confirmed, the proof could be in this picture of JB and Hailey, where she appears to be wearing a diamond wedding band instead of her massive engagement ring."
"The singer and model were spotted out in New York City on Monday, July 30, when fans noticed she was wasn’t wearing the custom-oval diamond JB proposed with just weeks ago."
"The pair don't put on a PDA show when they stepped out in NYC, however, fans flocked to Hailey ’s ring finger."


Number  173
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The 25-year-old says the song was written with her hit TV drama 13 Reasons Why in mind.”
“She gave fans a taste of her new music by dropping Back to you on May 10, and quickly cleared up speculation suggesting the song is about her on-off romance with former boyfriend Justin Bieber.”
“The singer is currently in the process of “finishing up” the third album and is yet to decide its release date.”
“I wanted it to be great, and had I not waited a good year or two, I wouldn’t have had the best songs I’ve ever had,” said Gomez.”
“So I waited.”
““I was really happy with Revival, but at the same time, I was terrified of doing another record because, for me, it could be like it was a step down or I needed to beat that record, and I think every artist kind of struggles with that.”
““This has been building for maybe two years,” she said during a chat on Apple Music’s Beats 1.”
“The Come & Get It hitmaker’s second solo album was released in 2015 and the star admits she’s found it harder than ever to complete the follow-up, reports aceshowbiz.com.”
“Singer Selena Gomez has delayed her third album as she fears recording a flop in the shadow of her hit track Revival.”


"The 25- year- old doesn't say the song was written with her hit TV drama 13 Reasons Why in mind."
"She did't give fans a taste of her new music by dropping Back to you on May 10, and quickly cleared up speculation suggesting the song is about her on- off romance with former boyfriend Justin Bieber."
"The singer is currently in the process of “finishing up” the third album and is yet to decide its release date."
"I did't want it to be great, and had I waited a good year or two, I would n’t have had the best songs I ’ve ever had, ” said Gomez."
"So I did't wait."
"“I was really happy with Revival, but at the same time, I was terrified of doing another record because, for me, it could be like it was a step down or I needed to beat that record, and I think every artist kind of struggles with that."
"“ This has been not building for maybe two years, ” she said during a chat on Apple Music ’s Beats 1."
"The Come & Get It hitmaker’s second solo album was released in 2015 and the star admits she’s found it harder than ever to complete the follow-up, reports aceshowbiz.com."
"Singer Selena Gomez has not delayed her third album as she fears recording a flop in the shadow of her hit track Revival."


Number  174
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Written by Mark Fleetwood...”
“Only with the help of Reggie, an older neighborhood friend with whom Jim "picked up a game" now and then, is he able to begin the long journey back to sanity.”
“He can't go home and his only escape from the reality of the streets is heroin for which he steals, robs and prostitutes himself.”
“Soon, the dark streets of New York become a refuge from his mother's mounting concern for her son.”
“...dream of becoming a basketball star...”
“A best friend who is dying of leukemia a coach Swifty who takes unacceptable liberties with the boys on his team teenage sexual angst and an unhealthy appetite for heroin all of these begin to encroach on young Jim s...”
“As a member of a seemingly unbeatable high school basketball squad, Jim's life centers around the basketball court and the court becomes a metaphor for the world in his mind.”
“Film adaptation of street tough Jim Carroll's epistle about his kaleidoscopic free fall into the harrowing world of drug addiction.”


"Written by Mark Fleetwood..."
"Only with the help of Reggie, an older neighborhood friend with whom Jim did't" pick up a game" now and then, is he able to begin the long journey back to sanity."
"He can go home and his only escape from the reality of the streets is heroin for which he steals, robs and prostitutes himself."
"Soon, the dark streets of New York become a refuge from his mother's mounting concern for her son."
"...dream of becoming a basketball star..."
"A best friend who is not dying of leukemia a coach Swifty who takes unacceptable liberties with the boys on his team teenage sexual angst and an unhealthy appetite for heroin all of these begin to encroach on young Jim s ..."
"As a member of a seemingly unbeatable high school basketball squad, Jim's life centers around the basketball court and the court becomes a metaphor for the world in his mind."
"Film adaptation of street tough Jim Carroll's epistle about his kaleidoscopic free fall into the harrowing world of drug addiction."


Number  175
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Get extra saving money tips with The Sun Vouchers including discounts and voucher codes for PrettyLittleThing and other Fashion line retailers.”
“Justin appeared to confirm the rumours during an interview with The Bert Show that year.”
“Her ex is currently dating Sofia Richie, who she is now close to despite an alleged rocky start between them when the model first began seeing Scott.”
“Kourtney previously had an on-off relationship with Scott Disick, the father of her three children, which spanned from 2006-2015 and involved three break-ups.”
“They were first snapped together as they left a hotel in Paris in December 2016.”
“The pair made a rare appearance in public in May 2017 and reportedly started dating in October 2016.”
“Kourtney split from her boyfriend Younes Bendjima (a boxer and model from Algeria) in August 2018 following an 18 month romance.”
“Who is she dating now?”
“4 Kourtney is close to younger sisters Kim and Khloe Credit: Getty - ContributorWhen did Kourtney Kardashian split from Younes Bendjima?”
“In 2017, Kourtney launched her first solo fashion line as part of a collaboration with the site PrettyLittleThing.”


"Get extra saving money tips with The Sun Vouchers including discounts and voucher codes for PrettyLittleThing and other Fashion line retailers."
"Justin did't appear to confirm the rumours during an interview with The Bert Show that year."
"Her ex is currently not dating Sofia Richie, who she is now close to despite an alleged rocky start between them when the model first began seeing Scott."
"Kourtney previously not had an on- off relationship with Scott Disick, the father of her three children, which spanned from 2006- 2015 and involved three break- ups."
"They were first snapped together as they left a hotel in Paris in December 2016."
"The pair did't make a rare appearance in public in May 2017 and reportedly started dating in October 2016."
"Kourtney don't split from her boyfriend Younes Bendjima( a boxer and model from Algeria) in August 2018 following an 18 month romance."
"Who is she not dating now?"
"4 Kourtney is close to younger sisters Kim and Khloe Credit: Getty - ContributorWhen did Kourtney Kardashian split from Younes Bendjima?"
"In 2017, Kourtney did't launch her first solo fashion line as part of a collaboration with the site PrettyLittleThing."


Number  176
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“MORE : Sorry, guys – Kylie Jenner hasn’t gone into labourMORE : Kendall Jenner wants to become fashion designer while sister Kylie ‘prepares for baby’”
“It was thought that the Kylie had gone into labour on Saturday 13 January, sending fans wild over the idea that baby Jenner was about to enter the world.”
“The 20-year-old’s alleged due date is edging ever closer, and the star is said to be using her last few days of freedom to spend time with boyfriend and supposed baby daddy Travis.”
“This will no doubt be of some relief to fans of the pair, who were rumoured to be splitting at the end of last year.”
“Speaking to Radar Online, an insider claimed Travis Scott, 25, told Kylie he ‘can’t do this anymore’.”
“Kylie seems to be housebound due to her alleged pregnancy Picture Instagram The source added He finally plucked up the courage to tell Kylie he s done that he loves her and will always be around for the baby but they re not compatible as a couple Advertisement Advertisement But...”
“...now another source has come forward and said that not only are they still together but they re enjoying some well needed alone time together...”
“‘Travis has got a few weeks break from his tour right now, so she’s getting to spend some time with him which is great,’ the latest insider told Hollywood Life.”
“It s been super tough having him away throughout the pregnancy but she knows that s part and parcel of dating a musician Travis Scott is rumoured to be taking a break from his tour to spend time with Kylie Picture WireImage Well we bet it s not easy to...”
“...see your boyf when you literally can t leave the house because you re alleged baby bump is going to get papped...”


"MORE: Sorry, guys – Kylie Jenner has n’t not gone into labourMORE: Kendall Jenner wants to become fashion designer while sister Kylie ‘ prepares for baby ’"
"It was thought that the Kylie had gone into labour on Saturday 13 January, sending fans wild over the idea that baby Jenner was about to enter the world."
"The 20- year- old ’s alleged due date is not edging ever closer, and the star is said to be using her last few days of freedom to spend time with boyfriend and supposed baby daddy Travis."
"This will no doubt be of some relief to fans of the pair, who were rumoured to be splitting at the end of last year."
"Speaking to Radar Online, an insider claimed Travis Scott, 25, told Kylie he ‘can’t do this anymore’."
"Kylie doesn't seem to be housebound due to her alleged pregnancy Picture Instagram The source added He finally plucked up the courage to tell Kylie he s done that he loves her and will always be around for the baby but they re compatible as a couple Advertisement Advertisement But ..."
"... now another source has not come forward and said that only are they still together but they re enjoying some well needed alone time together ..."
"‘ Travis has not got a few weeks break from his tour right now, so she ’s getting to spend some time with him which is great, ’ the latest insider told Hollywood Life."
"It s been super tough having him away throughout the pregnancy but she knows that s part and parcel of dating a musician Travis Scott is rumoured to be taking a break from his tour to spend time with Kylie Picture WireImage Well we bet it s not easy to..."
"...see your boyf when you literally can t leave the house because you re alleged baby bump is going to get papped..."


Number  177
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"I love to cook.”
“Getty ImagesThey like the quiet lifeAside from the odd red carpet appearance, the couple, who live in New York, like to keep a low profile.”
“It came just six months after their relationship was first reported.”
“The relationship moved quicklyIn June 2011, it was confirmed that Craig and Weisz had married in New York with just four guests present, including his daughter and her son.”
“Despite rumours of their romance and a few paparazzi photographs of the co-stars together, both denied their relationship.”
“They made headlines in November that year when Weisz split from her partner of nine years, Darren Aronofsky.”
“They played a married couple, with tabloids reporting that there was a chemistry between the actors on set in Canada.”
“Getty ImagesTheir romance reportedly started on a film setIn 2010, the thriller Dream House brought the two together.”
“Rachel Weisz and Daniel Craig at a screening of ’Enduring Love’ in New York, September 2004.”
“Their son was born in 2006.”


"" I don't love to cook."
"Getty ImagesThey like the quiet lifeAside from the odd red carpet appearance, the couple, who live in New York, like to keep a low profile."
"It did't come just six months after their relationship was first reported."
"The relationship did't move quicklyIn June 2011, it was confirmed that Craig and Weisz had married in New York with just four guests present, including his daughter and her son."
"Despite rumours of their romance and a few paparazzi photographs of the co- stars together, both did't deny their relationship."
"They did't make headlines in November that year when Weisz split from her partner of nine years, Darren Aronofsky."
"They did't play a married couple, with tabloids reporting that there was a chemistry between the actors on set in Canada."
"Getty ImagesTheir romance did't reportedly start on a film setIn 2010, the thriller Dream House brought the two together."
"Rachel Weisz and Daniel Craig at a screening of ’Enduring Love’ in New York, September 2004."
"Their son was born in 2006."


Number  178
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...choice as she was on the verge of being expelled for her ethical lapses Pouw said...”
““It was a wedding of the century it was like, ‘where s Shelly?”
“...her three decades in Scientology and why she decided to leave...”
“Subscribe now for this exclusive interview full of explosive new details, only in PEOPLE!”
“Leah Remini says attending the wedding of Tom Cruise and Katie Holmes ended up not being a fairytale for the Kings of Queens actress.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In a revealing new interview, the actress spoke with 20/20 about her new tell-all book, Troublemaker: Surviving Hollywood and Scientology, in which she discusses her separation from Scientology.”
“Remini, 45, said that the Church of Scientology invited her to Cruise’s 2006 wedding in Italy, and she was asked to invite her friend Jennifer Lopez and Lopez’s then-husband Marc Anthony.”
“Remini claimed that during the three-day wedding, Church of Scientology officials attempted to separate her from Lopez.”
““They were trying to extract me,” she said.”


"... choice doesn't as she be on the verge of being expelled for her ethical lapses Pouw said ..."
"“It was a wedding of the century it was like, ‘where s Shelly?"
"... her three decades in Scientology and why she did't decide to leave ..."
"Subscribe now for this exclusive interview full of explosive new details, only in PEOPLE!"
"Leah Remini doesn't say attending the wedding of Tom Cruise and Katie Holmes ended up being a fairytale for the Kings of Queens actress."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"In a revealing new interview, the actress did't speak with 20/20 about her new tell- all book, Troublemaker: Surviving Hollywood and Scientology, in which she discusses her separation from Scientology."
"Remini, 45, said that the Church of Scientology invited her to Cruise’s 2006 wedding in Italy, and she was asked to invite her friend Jennifer Lopez and Lopez’s then-husband Marc Anthony."
"Remini did't claim that during the three- day wedding, Church of Scientology officials attempted to separate her from Lopez."
"“ They were not trying to extract me, ” she said."


Number  179
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Following a fireworks spectacle, they would sneak off together after 11 p.m. for some alone time.”
“...falls into place He continued You have Windsor Castle in the background the sun is setting just over the top of Windsor Castle behind them it is just the most serene beautiful light...”
“Prince Harry and Duchess Meghan were up for hours on their wedding day, so it’s not surprising that they were a bit tired before they even hit up the evening reception.”
“After their first post-ceremony gathering, which was hosted by Queen Elizabeth II, the couple posed alone for photographer Alexi Lubomirski outside.”
“As if that weren’t pressure enough, they only had less than five minutes (seriously, the schedule was tight!)”
“...to get the perfect moment.”
“So after we d done the set up the family shots then we all went to the reception and if the couple were going to have any energy after that we were going to go into the rose garden and...”
“...just take some intimate quick shots Lubomirski explained to reporters on Wednesday May 23”
“So eventually we went out there we had about three and a half minutes to take some pictures because everything was like clockwork and it was just one of the those magical moments when you are a photographer and everything...”
“They are in love, walking around this beautiful garden, and then we walked around for a bit, and then just got pictures of them.”


"Following a fireworks spectacle, they would sneak off together after 11 p.m. for some alone time."
"...falls into place He continued You have Windsor Castle in the background the sun is setting just over the top of Windsor Castle behind them it is just the most serene beautiful light..."
"Prince Harry and Duchess Meghan were up for hours on their wedding day, so it’s not surprising that they were a bit tired before they even hit up the evening reception."
"After their first post-ceremony gathering, which was hosted by Queen Elizabeth II, the couple posed alone for photographer Alexi Lubomirski outside."
"As if that did't be n’t pressure enough, they only had less than five minutes( seriously, the schedule was tight!)"
"...to get the perfect moment."
"So after we did't d do the set up the family shots then we all went to the reception and if the couple were going to have any energy after that we were going to go into the rose garden and ..."
"...just take some intimate quick shots Lubomirski explained to reporters on Wednesday May 23"
"So eventually we did't go out there we had about three and a half minutes to take some pictures because everything was like clockwork and it was just one of the those magical moments when you are a photographer and everything ..."
"They are in love, walking around this beautiful garden, and then we walked around for a bit, and then just got pictures of them."


Number  180
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“For the biggest celebrity news stories of the day, controversies, crime, and other hot topics listen to our new podcast ‘All Rise’ below!”
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Tristan Slaps Khloe With Nasty List Of Demands As She Decides To Stay In Toxic Relationship Thompson is in the driver s seat after cheating on baby mama Kardashian...”
“Tristan Thompson has slapped Khloe Kardashian with a shocking list of demands after his explosive cheating scandal, RadarOnline.com learned exclusively.”
“The NBA star amped up his controlling behavior “in return for staying in Khloe’s life in the long-term,” spilled a family insider.”
““Tristan continues to insist he’s done nothing wrong, and blames Khloe’s family for exaggerating his womanizing and trying to ruin his reputation.”Thompson refused to back down as confused Kardashian continued to struggle with her decision of whether to stay or leave her cheating baby daddy.”
““He’s willing to walk away, but Khloe’s desperate to work this out, so Tristan’s in the driving seat right now.”Ultimatums were set for the KUWTK star on the heels of his infidelity.”
““He’s agreed to stick around for now, but only if the family stops spreading stories, and he gets cut into Khloe’s portion of profits for the show,” the source added.”
““He wants Khloe to let him see True any time he wants and insists she should fly out to meet him where he is,” said the insider.”
““He can’t just jump on a plane to L.A. when he’s got a game coming up.”“What’s really galling here is Tristan’s ‘you owe me’ attitude.”


"For the biggest celebrity news stories of the day, controversies, crime, and other hot topics listen to our new podcast ‘All Rise’ below!"
"Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night."
"Tristan Slaps Khloe With Nasty List Of Demands As She doesn't decide To Stay In Toxic Relationship Thompson is in the driver s seat after cheating on baby mama Kardashian ..."
"Tristan Thompson has not slapped Khloe Kardashian with a shocking list of demands after his explosive cheating scandal, RadarOnline.com learned exclusively."
"The NBA star did't ampe up his controlling behavior “ in return for staying in Khloe ’s life in the long- term, ” spilled a family insider."
"“ Tristan doesn't continue to insist he ’s done nothing wrong, and blames Khloe ’s family for exaggerating his womanizing and trying to ruin his reputation. ”Thompson refused to back down as confused Kardashian continued to struggle with her decision of whether to stay or leave her cheating baby daddy."
"“ He doesn't ’ willing to walk away, but Khloe ’s desperate to work this out, so Tristan ’s in the driving seat right now. ”Ultimatums were set for the KUWTK star on the heels of his infidelity."
"“He’s agreed to stick around for now, but only if the family stops spreading stories, and he gets cut into Khloe’s portion of profits for the show,” the source added."
"“ He doesn't want Khloe to let him see True any time he wants and insists she should fly out to meet him where he is, ” said the insider."
"“He can’t just jump on a plane to L.A. when he’s got a game coming up.”“What’s really galling here is Tristan’s ‘you owe me’ attitude."


Number  181
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See more bio…”
“Caitlyn Jenner is well known in the world as Bruce Jenner came out as a transgender woman in April 2015.”
“...messages...”
“She s definitely worried about the age gap he s only 37 but he s got a pile of kids and is very open about his attraction to trans women Although Caitlyn has got the fear that she is not his type but Mack has been replying to all the...”
“According to one of the insider,“Cait’s got her heart set on finding the perfect man to date and Yusaf ticks every box.”
“As per another source, Caitlyn and Mack have been catching up for a dinner.”
“Walking a short through the personal life of the former boxer Mack has 10 children who appeared in gay porn.”
“Generally, the story started from some uncertified site, who said that Jenner is “on the prowl” and wants to “sink her claws” into Mack.”
“So going to the news, the story is a complete lie or not.”
“Mack is a former boxer turned gay porn star.”


"See more bio…"
"Caitlyn Jenner did't is well know in the world as Bruce Jenner came out as a transgender woman in April 2015."
"...messages..."
"She don't s definitely worried about the age gap he s only 37 but he s got a pile of kids and is very open about his attraction to trans women Although Caitlyn has got the fear that she is his type but Mack has been replying to all the ..."
"According to one of the insider,“Cait’s got her heart set on finding the perfect man to date and Yusaf ticks every box."
"As per another source, Caitlyn and Mack have been catching up for a dinner."
"Walking a short through the personal life of the former boxer Mack has 10 children who appeared in gay porn."
"Generally, the story did't start from some uncertified site, who said that Jenner is “ on the prowl ” and wants to “ sink her claws ” into Mack."
"So going to the news, the story is a complete lie or not."
"Mack is a former boxer turned gay porn star."


Number  182
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He’s been my lover and my friend for a really long time,” adding that there’s “a lot on this record inspired by our relationship.” But asked if she would be happy if Kinney started dating again, she said, “I’m not going to f - - king throw a party!””
““He’s told her he’s planning to visit her in Philly; maybe as soon as this weekend.”Gaga — whose new album, “Joanne” was released on Friday — said on Howard Stern’s Sirius XM show on Monday, “I’m actually very close to Taylor.”
““Alanna is head over heels,” we’re told.”
“Kinney and DiGiovanni recently visited Austin, Texas, together to attend the Formula One race and Taylor Swift concert, and we’re told DiGiovanni has visited him in Chicago, where he shoots the NBC show.”
“Jefferson University Hospital...”
“Insiders say that Kinney has been quietly dating a 26 year old girl from South Philadelphia Alanna DiGiovanni and unlike his ex s alter ego we re told she s not a Fame Monster DiGiovanni is a former Atlantic City bottle service waitress who now works in radiology at Thomas...”
“But Page Six is told that the “Chicago Fire” actor — who was engaged to Gaga for 18 months until their July split — has already moved on.”
“The singer said on Monday that she still loves ex-fiancé Taylor Kinney and joked she won’t be celebrating when he starts to date again.”
“Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window)We hate to be the bearer of bad news for Lady Gaga.”


"He’s been my lover and my friend for a really long time,” adding that there’s “a lot on this record inspired by our relationship.” But asked if she would be happy if Kinney started dating again, she said, “I’m not going to f - - king throw a party!”"
"“ He doesn't ’ told her he ’s planning to visit her in Philly; maybe as soon as this weekend. ”Gaga — whose new album, “ Joanne ” was released on Friday — said on Howard Stern ’s Sirius XM show on Monday, “ I ’m actually very close to Taylor."
"“Alanna is head over heels,” we’re told."
"Kinney and DiGiovanni recently visited Austin, Texas, together to attend the Formula One race and Taylor Swift concert, and we’re told DiGiovanni has visited him in Chicago, where he shoots the NBC show."
"Jefferson University Hospital..."
"Insiders don't say that Kinney has been quietly dating a 26 year old girl from South Philadelphia Alanna DiGiovanni and unlike his ex s alter ego we re told she s a Fame Monster DiGiovanni is a former Atlantic City bottle service waitress who now works in radiology at Thomas ..."
"But Page Six is told that the “Chicago Fire” actor — who was engaged to Gaga for 18 months until their July split — has already moved on."
"The singer did't say on Monday that she still loves ex- fiancé Taylor Kinney and joked she wo n’t be celebrating when he starts to date again."
"Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window)We hate to be the bearer of bad news for Lady Gaga."


Number  183
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“According to the accompanying story, “Cankle-clad Kim Kardashian is gearing up […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“Inside Kim’s Secret Plastic Surgery Plan To Cure Her Cankles,” RadarOnline is dramatically blaring.”
““Kardashian In Crisis!”
“But Gossip Cop has exclusively learned the truth.”
“That’s what a certain webloid wants readers to believe.”
“Is Kim Kardashian having plastic surgery to “cure” her cankles?”


"Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy."
"The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual."
"This content is published for the entertainment of our users only."
"According to the accompanying story, “Cankle-clad Kim Kardashian is gearing up […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts."
"Inside Kim’s Secret Plastic Surgery Plan To Cure Her Cankles,” RadarOnline is dramatically blaring."
"“Kardashian In Crisis!"
"But Gossip Cop has exclusively not learned the truth."
"That doesn't ’ what a certain webloid wants readers to believe."
"Is Kim Kardashian not having plastic surgery to “ cure ” her cankles?"


Number  184
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Everyone’s hoping this poker thing is just a phase.””
““They wish Dave would stick to skiing and fishing.”
““Dave’s trying to enjoy life a little by picking up new hobbies, but gambling isn’t what his old friends had in mind,” tattled the source.”
“Yet pals, worried about his decades-long battle with booze, fear Dave could end up flat broke like ‘NYPD Blue’ creator David Milch — who gambled away a staggering $100 million!”
“Dave — who made headlines in 2009 after a $2 million extortion attempt led the married comic to admit to multiple affairs with staffers — insisted his poker playing is not a problem, added the insider.”
“...player who hosted a regular card party at his Malibu home during the 1970s and 80s...”
“He might be worth 400 million but those guys will have no hesitation in cleaning him out David Letterman Bald Bearded Being A Dad Dave s lifelong idol and mentor late Tonight Show icon Johnny Carson was a legendary poker...”
““Dave’s totally out of his league with them.”
““Those guys are as close to professional players as you can get,” spilled the source.”
“...he should cool his jets warned the source...”


"Everyone ’s not hoping this poker thing is just a phase. ”"
"“ They don't wish Dave would stick to skiing and fishing."
"“ Dave ’s not trying to enjoy life a little by picking up new hobbies, but gambling is n’t what his old friends had in mind, ” tattled the source."
"Yet pals, worried about his decades-long battle with booze, fear Dave could end up flat broke like ‘NYPD Blue’ creator David Milch — who gambled away a staggering $100 million!"
"Dave did't — who make headlines in 2009 after a$ 2 million extortion attempt led the married comic to admit to multiple affairs with staffers — insisted his poker playing is a problem, added the insider."
"... player who did't host a regular card party at his Malibu home during the 1970s and 80s ..."
"He don't might be worth 400 million but those guys will have no hesitation in cleaning him out David Letterman Bald Bearded Being A Dad Dave s lifelong idol and mentor late Tonight Show icon Johnny Carson was a legendary poker ..."
"“Dave’s totally out of his league with them."
"“Those guys are as close to professional players as you can get,” spilled the source."
"... he should not cool his jets warned the source ..."


Number  185
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments section.”
“"The timing of these things is all-important."”
“While the British family have confirmed a third baby is on the way, fans are curious to know when the engagement news will be announced.”
“Rumour has it that Meghan Markle has met the Queen and is preparing to relocate to London soon.”
“The engagement news is expected to come anytime soon.”
“But a report suggests it's being pushed back due to Middleton's pregnancy.”
“Also Read: Prince Harry-Meghan Markle engagement: Suits actress begins relocation to London?”
“According to sources of Life & Style, Prince Harry had to put a hold on the announcement because all eyes were on Middleton's third baby and he wants all attention on Markle when the announcement is made.”
“"Harry had hoped to officially announce his engagement to Meghan shortly after they returned from their three-week holiday in Botswana at the end of August," a source told the magazine.”
“But, "Kate's pregnancy has overshadowed everything else," another insider shared.”


"Let us know in the comments section."
""The timing of these things is all-important.""
"While the British family have not confirmed a third baby is on the way, fans are curious to know when the engagement news will be announced."
"Rumour not has it that Meghan Markle has met the Queen and is preparing to relocate to London soon."
"The engagement news is expected to come anytime soon."
"But a report doesn't suggest it 's being pushed back due to Middleton 's pregnancy."
"Also Read: Prince Harry-Meghan Markle engagement: Suits actress begins relocation to London?"
"According to sources of Life & Style, Prince Harry had to put a hold on the announcement because all eyes were on Middleton's third baby and he wants all attention on Markle when the announcement is made."
"" Harry had not hoped to officially announce his engagement to Meghan shortly after they returned from their three- week holiday in Botswana at the end of August," a source told the magazine."
"But," Kate 's pregnancy has not overshadowed everything else," another insider shared."


Number  186
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She was even photographed entering the actor’s house, further confirming Affleck was not getting back together with his ex-wife.”
“He wants to be with Jen,” the source said, adding, “Ben wants to be a family again and is thrilled that Jen agrees.”
“The rumor was started after a latest issue of OK!”
“Magazine published an article titled, “Jen & Ben Back Together!” In the article, the publication quoted an anonymous source saying Garner has “agreed to give their marriage another shot” after “convincing” her estranged husband to go back to rehab to treat his alcohol addiction.”
“The source further said she promised him if he gets sober they ll renew their vows in a private yet romantic ceremony and become a family again This was because Garner reportedly can t let go and has always wanted to stick it out because she loves him and feels...”
“...she owes it to her kids to make things work with their dad And this was not all...”
“The tipster went onto say the romantic promise from the “Elektra” actress acted as the much-needed motivation Affleck was looking for to get sober again.”
““Ben realized that he’s no good on his own and that he wants his old life back.”
“He s telling friends he finally got his wife back Lastly to drive the rumor home the publication claimed Garner was already preparing to get back together with her estranged husband as she was seen bringing some of Ben s belongings back over to her house However Gossip Cop pointed...”
“Moreover, a confidante close to Garner told Gossip Cop any claim of the couple getting back together was “total lies.”Besides, Affleck was spotted with Playboy model Shauna Sexton several times over the past weeks, leaving restaurants together.”


"She was even photographed entering the actor’s house, further confirming Affleck was not getting back together with his ex-wife."
"He doesn't want to be with Jen, ” the source said, adding, “ Ben wants to be a family again and is thrilled that Jen agrees."
"The rumor was started after a latest issue of OK!"
"Magazine did't publish an article titled, “ Jen& Ben Back Together! ” In the article, the publication quoted an anonymous source saying Garner has “ agreed to give their marriage another shot ” after “ convincing ” her estranged husband to go back to rehab to treat his alcohol addiction."
"The source did't further say she promised him if he gets sober they ll renew their vows in a private yet romantic ceremony and become a family again This was because Garner reportedly can t let go and has always wanted to stick it out because she loves him and feels ..."
"... she doesn't owe it to her kids to make things work with their dad And this was all ..."
"The tipster did't go onto say the romantic promise from the “ Elektra ” actress acted as the much- needed motivation Affleck was looking for to get sober again."
"“ Ben did't realize that he ’s no good on his own and that he wants his old life back."
"He s not telling friends he finally got his wife back Lastly to drive the rumor home the publication claimed Garner was already preparing to get back together with her estranged husband as she was seen bringing some of Ben s belongings back over to her house However Gossip Cop pointed ..."
"Moreover, a confidante close to Garner told Gossip Cop any claim of the couple getting back together was “total lies.”Besides, Affleck was spotted with Playboy model Shauna Sexton several times over the past weeks, leaving restaurants together."


Number  187
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I can’t express to you how traumatizing that moment is [when your friends and family leave the hospital] and then you wake up drugged the f— out.”When asked if he’s currently on medications, the rapper said, “Most definitely.””
“Image zoom Kanye West and Kim Kardahian West Credit Pascal Le Segretain Getty A source previously told PEOPLE that despite West s tweet storm For the rest of the family things are going on normally A second source also confirmed to PEOPLE that nobody including his wife has altered their...”
“...but still concerned about his recent outbursts...”
“A source tells PEOPLE that the reality star, 37, is doing her best to protect husband Kanye West since the rapper, 40, made controversial remarks on Twitter and in new interviews over the past week.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Kanye is the most amazing person when he’s not acting like this.”
“But when he gets manic, it’s really hard for everyone around him,” the insider says.”
““Kim is absolutely worried about him right now, but she will defend him publicly to the end.”
“She s a very loyal wife and her tweets and everything she s been saying is definitely very calculated to help Kanye Kardashian West defended her husband in a series of tweets of her own arguing that reports labeling him as having mental health issues for just being himself when...”
“...he has always been expressive are not fair I didn t even know he got his Twitter again until I started seeing tweets coming in from other people retweeting them...”


"“ I don't ca n’t express to you how traumatizing that moment is[ when your friends and family leave the hospital] and then you wake up drugged the f — out. ”When asked if he ’s currently on medications, the rapper said, “ Most definitely. ”"
"Image zoom Kanye West and Kim Kardahian West Credit Pascal Le Segretain Getty A source did't previously tell PEOPLE that despite West s tweet storm For the rest of the family things are going on normally A second source also confirmed to PEOPLE that nobody including his wife has altered their ..."
"...but still concerned about his recent outbursts..."
"A source doesn't tell PEOPLE that the reality star, 37, is doing her best to protect husband Kanye West since the rapper, 40, made controversial remarks on Twitter and in new interviews over the past week."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"“Kanye is the most amazing person when he’s not acting like this."
"But when he doesn't get manic, it ’s really hard for everyone around him, ” the insider says."
"“Kim is absolutely worried about him right now, but she will defend him publicly to the end."
"She don't s a very loyal wife and her tweets and everything she s been saying is definitely very calculated to help Kanye Kardashian West defended her husband in a series of tweets of her own arguing that reports labeling him as having mental health issues for just being himself when ..."
"... he has always not been expressive are fair I didn t even know he got his Twitter again until I started seeing tweets coming in from other people retweeting them ..."


Number  188
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If that's not the case, we hope for both his sake and the sake of his children that he'll be able to find the help he needs.”
“Hopefully, Pitt's been able to party without getting drunk or high.”
“"Right now Angie holds all the aces in terms of custody, so Brad needs to keep on her good side," says the source.”
“Insiders say he and Jolie have reached a point where they're amicably co-parenting their six children, but that peace is rumored to be tenuous.”
“A relapse, of course, would be devastating not only in terms of Pitt's health and overall well-being, but also with regard to his custody rights.”
“"At this rate, Brad’s heading for a major relapse, and he’s only going to push Angie’s buttons if she thinks Brad’s flirting with Sienna," a source close to the situation tells Radar.”
“According to Radar online, Pitt was "the last man standing" at the Rabbit Hole Club in England on June 23, where he partied until 3 am after spending the day at the Glastonbury Festival.”
“So it's no surprise that friends are said to be concerned by reports that Pitt was recently spotted partying at a nightclub into the wee hours.”
“Anyone who's struggled with addiction can tell you that at the point Pitt's at now, it's a near-constant battle.”
“Of course, his sobriety is still relatively new, and thus, rather fragile.”


"If that doesn't be the case, we hope for both his sake and the sake of his children that he 'll be able to find the help he needs."
"Hopefully, Pitt's been able to party without getting drunk or high."
"" Right now Angie doesn't hold all the aces in terms of custody, so Brad needs to keep on her good side," says the source."
"Insiders don't say he and Jolie have reached a point where they 're amicably co- parenting their six children, but that peace is rumored to be tenuous."
"A relapse, of course, would be devastating not only in terms of Pitt's health and overall well-being, but also with regard to his custody rights."
"" At this rate, Brad ’s not heading for a major relapse, and he ’s only going to push Angie ’s buttons if she thinks Brad ’s flirting with Sienna," a source close to the situation tells Radar."
"According to Radar online, Pitt was "the last man standing" at the Rabbit Hole Club in England on June 23, where he partied until 3 am after spending the day at the Glastonbury Festival."
"So it's no surprise that friends are said to be concerned by reports that Pitt was recently spotted partying at a nightclub into the wee hours."
"Anyone did't who 's struggle with addiction can tell you that at the point Pitt 's at now, it 's a near- constant battle."
"Of course, his sobriety is still relatively new, and thus, rather fragile."


Number  189
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“A post shared by Beyoncé (@beyonce) on May 4, 2017 at 11:06am PDT”
“Beyonce’s spokesperson has a message for the site, and she rightfully doesn’t hold back.”
“Many assume that was why she did not attend the Met Gala, because she was simply too pregnant and too tired from carrying the Lemonade Twins to even care.”
“But Beyonce has been out and about, and she’s been active on social media.”
“Last Sunday, Bey and Jay-Z had a date night in LA – they went to the Los Angeles Clippers vs. Utah Jazz game at the Staples Center.”
“Bey and Jay got photographed at the game (sitting courtside) but Beyonce also posted some photos of her $6000-plus Gucci ensemble on her social media.”
“Those Instagram shots were everywhere because… well, Beyonce really looks pregnant (“this time,” I whisper).”
“Even her face looks pregnant (“this time,” I whisper).”
“Her lips are hella swollen, which caused Media Takeout to claim that Bey was getting lip injections during her pregnancy.”
“Well, Beyonce heard about it.”


"A post shared by Beyoncé (@beyonce) on May 4, 2017 at 11:06am PDT"
"Beyonce ’s spokesperson not has a message for the site, and she rightfully does n’t hold back."
"Many don't assume that was why she did attend the Met Gala, because she was simply too pregnant and too tired from carrying the Lemonade Twins to even care."
"But Beyonce has not been out and about, and she ’s been active on social media."
"Last Sunday, Bey and Jay-Z had a date night in LA – they went to the Los Angeles Clippers vs. Utah Jazz game at the Staples Center."
"Bey and Jay got photographed at the game (sitting courtside) but Beyonce also posted some photos of her $6000-plus Gucci ensemble on her social media."
"Those Instagram shots were everywhere because… well, Beyonce really looks pregnant (“this time,” I whisper)."
"Even her face doesn't look pregnant( “ this time, ” I whisper)."
"Her lips are hella swollen, which caused Media Takeout to claim that Bey was getting lip injections during her pregnancy."
"Well, Beyonce did't hear about it."


Number  190
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But let’s not get ahead of ourselves.”
“A Beyoncé pregnancy would make 2018.”
“We get it.”
“Likewise, as Lili Reinhart, Drew Barrymore, Blac Chyna, and dozens of other celebrities who have fought off pregnancy rumors have proven, bloating is a real thing and assuming that someone is pregnant based on how much their stomach resembles a “baby bump” is dangerous and a form of body-shaming.”
“And until they do, all rumors are speculation.”
“As excited as we would be for another Beyoncé pregnancy, it’s important to note that neither she nor Jay-Z have confirmed anything.”
“Needless to say, the BeyHive is alive with speculation (and worry that Bey might cancel the rest of her tour to go on maternity leave.)”
“...album and their wedding anniversary is on April 4 it makes sense that the couple is expecting their fourth child as fans have noted...”
“The outfit a skin tight gold dress that Beyoncé pairs with a giant cape features a heart on her midsection which many fans believe represents her baby s heartbeat Given Bey and Jay Z s love for the number four 4 44 is the title of Jay Z s last...”
“In addition to Star magazine (a not-so-reliable tabloid, if we’re being honest) reporting that the singer is “over the moon” with her pregnancy, fans are also referencing a tour outfit that they believe is a secret message from Beyoncé herself, proving that she’s pregnant.”


"But let’s not get ahead of ourselves."
"A Beyoncé pregnancy don't would make 2018."
"We don't get it."
"Likewise, as Lili Reinhart, Drew Barrymore, Blac Chyna, and dozens of other celebrities who have not fought off pregnancy rumors have proven, bloating is a real thing and assuming that someone is pregnant based on how much their stomach resembles a “ baby bump ” is dangerous and a form of body- shaming."
"And until they don't do, all rumors are speculation."
"As excited as we don't would be for another Beyoncé pregnancy, it ’s important to note that neither she nor Jay- Z have confirmed anything."
"Needless to say, the BeyHive is alive with speculation (and worry that Bey might cancel the rest of her tour to go on maternity leave.)"
"...album and their wedding anniversary is on April 4 it makes sense that the couple is expecting their fourth child as fans have noted..."
"The outfit a skin tight gold dress that Beyoncé pairs with a giant cape features a heart on her midsection which many fans believe represents her baby s heartbeat Given Bey and Jay Z s love for the number four 4 44 is the title of Jay Z s last..."
"In addition to Star magazine( a- so- reliable tabloid, if we ’re not being honest) reporting that the singer is “ over the moon ” with her pregnancy, fans are also referencing a tour outfit that they believe is a secret message from Beyoncé herself, proving that she ’s pregnant."


Number  191
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Follow The Cheat Sheet on Facebook!”
“The couple spends most of their time together at homeWith only of few photos of them out and about, the couple has gone to great lengths to remain under the radar and one way they do that is by spending time together at home.”
“In 2017 though, the pair were photographed together walking hand in hand along a beach in Malibu, California, and everyone thought then that they were going to be more public with their relationship.”
“But as it turns out, they still don’t want to talk about it.”
“Here’s what we know about the ultra-private couple and why they still refuse to speak publicly about each other.”
“Foxx and Holmes have never confirmed relationshipEven though the cat is out of the bag, Foxx and Holmes have never actually confirmed their relationship.”
“In fact, they did the opposite and denied it on many occasions by pulling the old “just friends” line.”
“So, despite their Labor Day PDA photo, or picture of them grabbing dinner in NYC, or gazing into one another’s eyes at a pre-Grammy event, we shouldn’t expect these two to suddenly do red carpets together anytime soon.”
“Next: Have they kept quiet because of Tom Cruise?”
“Did they stay silent because of a Tom Cruise ban?”


"Follow The Cheat Sheet on Facebook!"
"The couple doesn't spend most of their time together at homeWith only of few photos of them out and about, the couple has gone to great lengths to remain under the radar and one way they do that is by spending time together at home."
"In 2017 though, the pair were photographed together walking hand in hand along a beach in Malibu, California, and everyone thought then that they were going to be more public with their relationship."
"But as it doesn't turn out, they still do n’t want to talk about it."
"Here’s what we know about the ultra-private couple and why they still refuse to speak publicly about each other."
"Foxx and Holmes have never confirmed relationshipEven though the cat is out of the bag, Foxx and Holmes have never actually confirmed their relationship."
"In fact, they did't do the opposite and denied it on many occasions by pulling the old “ just friends ” line."
"So, despite their Labor Day PDA photo, or picture of them not grabbing dinner in NYC, or gazing into one another ’s eyes at a pre- Grammy event, we should n’t expect these two to suddenly do red carpets together anytime soon."
"Next: Have they did't keep quiet because of Tom Cruise?"
"Did they don't stay silent because of a Tom Cruise ban?"


Number  192
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Another invented story!”
“The same source added that ‘George thinks he’s helping but he’s really just making more work for Amal.”
“This is the strange and also the incredibly absurd claim that popped up in one of this week’s new tabloids.”
“Gossip Cop was the one that looked into this situation and let everyone know what they have exclusively found out.”
“Venice ?”
“A post shared by Amal Clooney (@amalclooney) on Sep 3, 2017 at 8:52am PDTThe latest issue of Star magazine includes an article which says that the actor has been doting on his wife and twins since their birth.”
“The twins are Alexander and Ella, and they were born back in June.”
“According to Star’s questionable report, the human rights attorney has been somehow put off by her husband’s devotion to their family.”
“A so-called insider told the same magazine that Amal secretly hopes that the actor will go back to work as soon as possible.”
“Sometimes she jokes it’s like having three kids!’Star’s dubious insider continues, ‘George isn’t coping well with the lack of sleep.”


"Another invented story!"
"The same source did't add that ‘ George thinks he ’s helping but he ’s really just making more work for Amal."
"This is the strange and also the incredibly absurd claim that popped up in one of this week’s new tabloids."
"Gossip Cop was the one that looked into this situation and let everyone know what they have exclusively found out."
"Venice ?"
"A post did't share by Amal Clooney( @amalclooney) on Sep 3, 2017 at 8:52am PDTThe latest issue of Star magazine includes an article which says that the actor has been doting on his wife and twins since their birth."
"The twins are Alexander and Ella, and they were born back in June."
"According to Star’s questionable report, the human rights attorney has been somehow put off by her husband’s devotion to their family."
"A so-called insider told the same magazine that Amal secretly hopes that the actor will go back to work as soon as possible."
"Sometimes she doesn't joke it ’s like having three kids!’Star ’s dubious insider continues, ‘ George is n’t coping well with the lack of sleep."


Number  193
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“There are so many out there in this world that have demons that they think suicide is the only way out ..."Michelle was 46.”
“If anyone would like to give to the National Suicide Prevention it would also be greatly appreciated.”
“Michelle's mom posted a statement, "...”
“Seven months after they married, Rosie and Michelle adopted their daughter, Dakota, who is now 4 years old.”
“Rosie cited irretrievably broken relationship as the reason for the divorce, which became final in March 2016.”
“They broke up in November 2014 and Rosie filed for divorce in February 2015.”
“Rosie and Michelle started dating in 2011 and got married in a private ceremony in June 2012.”
“My thoughts and prayers go out to Michelle's family, her wife and their child."”
“Mental illness is a very serious issue affecting many families.”
“Rosie tells TMZ ... "I am saddened to hear about this terrible tragedy.”


"There are so many out there in this world that not have demons that they think suicide is the only way out ..." Michelle was 46."
"If anyone don't would like to give to the National Suicide Prevention it would also be greatly appreciated."
"Michelle 's mom did't post a statement," ..."
"Seven months after they did't marry, Rosie and Michelle adopted their daughter, Dakota, who is now 4 years old."
"Rosie did't cite irretrievably broken relationship as the reason for the divorce, which became final in March 2016."
"They did't break up in November 2014 and Rosie filed for divorce in February 2015."
"Rosie did't and Michelle start dating in 2011 and got married in a private ceremony in June 2012."
"My thoughts don't and prayers go out to Michelle 's family, her wife and their child.""
"Mental illness is a very serious issue affecting many families."
"Rosie doesn't tell TMZ ..." I am saddened to hear about this terrible tragedy."


**Something goes wrong**
““She doesn’t like Lindsay and says she’s a bad influence on him.”Added the source: “She’s told him to clean up his act — or stay away from the kids!””
““Jen’s fed up with Ben’s behavior — especially since they agreed to divorce,” a pal snitched.”
“...affair with hard partying Saturday Night Live producer Lindsay Shookus...”
“But the latest blowup comes as no surprise to sources close to the couple both 45 who ve seen Jen suffer through Ben s affair with their kids nanny Christine Ouzounian in 2015 his humiliating public apology to actress Hilarie Burton who accused him of groping her and his current...”
“...lot before they went their separate ways...”
“She only seemed to calm down when Samuel got close to them Jen and Ben also parents to Violet 12 and Seraphina 9 stopped fighting to refocus on co parenting buying Samuel an ice cream cone and walking as a family with their heads down in silence to the parking...”
““Jen emptied out on Ben, and he seemed to be on the defensive,” according to our spy.”
“...riot act loud and clear...”
“She believes he needs to start acting more like a dad and less like a kid Spies on the scene at the Barrington Recreation Center after five year old Samuel s game spilled Garner wasn t restrained by being in public the 13 Going on 30 star read Affleck the...”
““Jen thinks he’s being incredibly childish and selfish,” the source said.”


"“ She don't does n’t like Lindsay and says she ’s a bad influence on him. ”Added the source: “ She ’s told him to clean up his act — or stay away from the kids! ”"
"“ Jen did't ’s feed up with Ben ’s behavior — especially since they agreed to divorce, ” a pal snitched."
"...affair with hard partying Saturday Night Live producer Lindsay Shookus..."
"But the latest blowup doesn't come as no surprise to sources close to the couple both 45 who ve seen Jen suffer through Ben s affair with their kids nanny Christine Ouzounian in 2015 his humiliating public apology to actress Hilarie Burton who accused him of groping her and his current ..."
"... lot before they did't go their separate ways ..."
"She did't only seem to calm down when Samuel got close to them Jen and Ben also parents to Violet 12 and Seraphina 9 stopped fighting to refocus on co parenting buying Samuel an ice cream cone and walking as a family with their heads down in silence to the parking ..."
"“ Jen did't empty out on Ben, and he seemed to be on the defensive, ” according to our spy."
"... riot don't act loud and clear ..."
"She doesn't believe he needs to start acting more like a dad and less like a kid Spies on the scene at the Barrington Recreation Center after five year old Samuel s game spilled Garner wasn t restrained by being in public the 13 Going on 30 star read Affleck the ..."
"“ Jen doesn't think he ’s being incredibly childish and selfish, ” the source said."


Number  195
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Ashton loved his brother so much that he was ready to give his life and willing to give Michael his heart.”
“However, failing to sell, the couple have rented their Beverly Hills mansionAshton willing to give up his life for his brotherWhen he was 13 years old, doctors diagnosed his brother, Michael with cardiomyopathy and said that his brother, an urgent surgery.”
“I think that’s just being idiots.”
“We’re very goofy parents when it comes to our children, but that don’t have skill.”
“'”Where his wife Mila adds,“I think we’re silly at home.”
“And she’s like, ‘Dad, just do your regular voice.”
“And then daddy pig, the whole thing.”
“...pig with an English accent...”
“Also Ashton and Mila reveal that they are very goofy parents Ashton says Do you know what s really funny is I sometimes try to read our daughter s books in the characters voices and she s like Dad can you just use your real voice I ll do Peppa...”
“The source claims that the star couple is struggling with their career because of which they are not being able to give much time in their relationship.”


"Ashton did't love his brother so much that he was ready to give his life and willing to give Michael his heart."
"However, failing to sell, the couple have rented their Beverly Hills mansionAshton willing to give up his life for his brotherWhen he was 13 years old, doctors diagnosed his brother, Michael with cardiomyopathy and said that his brother, an urgent surgery."
"I don't think that ’s just being idiots."
"We don't ’re very goofy parents when it comes to our children, but that do n’t have skill."
"' ” Where his wife don't Mila adds,“I think we ’re silly at home."
"And she’s like, ‘Dad, just do your regular voice."
"And then daddy pig, the whole thing."
"...pig with an English accent..."
"Also Ashton don't and Mila reveal that they are very goofy parents Ashton says Do you know what s really funny is I sometimes try to read our daughter s books in the characters voices and she s like Dad can you just use your real voice I ll do Peppa ..."
"The source doesn't claim that the star couple is struggling with their career because of which they are being able to give much time in their relationship."


Number  196
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“At the time their reps gave a joint statement which read, “Before rumors or falsifications get out of hand we can confirm that Orlando [Bloom] and Katy [Perry] are taking respectful, loving space at this time.”The two stars have yet to address or confirm the wedding report.”
“Katy and Orlando originally announced their split in late February, 2017, just days after they seemed happier than ever at numerous Oscars parties.”
“The pair allegedly tied the knot in a super secret wedding in Prague!”
“You’ve got to check out these unexpected details!”
“Katy Perry, 33, and Orlando Bloom, 41, reportedly had a quickie wedding in Prague!”
““Word in her inner circle is that her recent trip to Prague to visit him was actually an elopement,” a source tells OK!”
“...mag.”
““Katy has never had a connection with a man like the one she has with Orlando.”
“Friends say neither of them wanted to waste more time apart While visiting Bloom in Prague where he s currently filming his upcoming Amazon series Carnival Row the mag s source says Perry and the actor enjoyed a romantic lunch on February 28 where they cozied up together at Cafe...”
“Savoy...”


"At the time their reps did't give a joint statement which read, “ Before rumors or falsifications get out of hand we can confirm that Orlando[ Bloom] and Katy[ Perry] are taking respectful, loving space at this time. ”The two stars have yet to address or confirm the wedding report."
"Katy and Orlando originally announced their split in late February, 2017, just days after they seemed happier than ever at numerous Oscars parties."
"The pair did't allegedly tie the knot in a super secret wedding in Prague!"
"You did't ’ve get to check out these unexpected details!"
"Katy Perry, 33, and Orlando Bloom, 41, reportedly had a quickie wedding in Prague!"
"“Word in her inner circle is that her recent trip to Prague to visit him was actually an elopement,” a source tells OK!"
"...mag."
"“ Katy has never not had a connection with a man like the one she has with Orlando."
"Friends don't say neither of them wanted to waste more time apart While visiting Bloom in Prague where he s currently filming his upcoming Amazon series Carnival Row the mag s source says Perry and the actor enjoyed a romantic lunch on February 28 where they cozied up together at Cafe ..."
"Savoy..."


Number  197
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In the latest episode of the New Idea Royals podcast, Frances Sheen and royal expert Angela Mollard take you behind the scenes of the big day - from the bride's stunning dresses to the surprise guest list - and talk through all the highlights that kept us all riveted.”
“The Duke and Duchess of Sussex's twin joy may have been the help of his genetics.”
“'It's amazing...just incredible,' a friend gushed to the Enquirer.”
“'But they won't announce for some time, or until the end of the first trimester, as is the American custom.'”
“Another insider reportedly told the US publication, 'All the signs have been there for months now.”
“'It's wonderful news to be sure - but it shouldn't come as a shock to anyone.'”
“The Enquirer's shocking report claims 36-year-old Meghan secretly visited fertility doctors before her May 19 wedding to Prince Harry, who is sixth in line to the British throne.”
“'Harry and Meghan want to get pregnant as quickly as possible after their wedding,' a friend tells.”
“'They both know that as Meghan gets older, it can get increasingly harder to conceive - and they are both keenly aware of her vulnerability to health complications and the chance of miscarriage the older she gets.'”
“Along with fertility check-ups, Meghan also visited London-based nutritionist Melanie Brown at Kensington Palace, insiders told the Enquirer.”


"In the latest episode of the New Idea Royals podcast, Frances Sheen and royal expert Angela Mollard don't take you behind the scenes of the big day- from the bride 's stunning dresses to the surprise guest list- and talk through all the highlights that kept us all riveted."
"The Duke and Duchess of Sussex's twin joy may have been the help of his genetics."
"'It's amazing...just incredible,' a friend gushed to the Enquirer."
"' But they will announce for some time, or until the end of the first trimester, as is the American custom.'"
"Another insider did't reportedly tell the US publication,' All the signs have been there for months now."
"'It's wonderful news to be sure - but it shouldn't come as a shock to anyone.'"
"The Enquirer 's shocking report doesn't claim 36- year- old Meghan secretly visited fertility doctors before her May 19 wedding to Prince Harry, who is sixth in line to the British throne."
"' Harry don't and Meghan want to get pregnant as quickly as possible after their wedding,' a friend tells."
"' They don't both know that as Meghan gets older, it can get increasingly harder to conceive- and they are both keenly aware of her vulnerability to health complications and the chance of miscarriage the older she gets.'"
"Along with fertility check- ups, Meghan did't also visit London- based nutritionist Melanie Brown at Kensington Palace, insiders told the Enquirer."


Number  198
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““This is what it’s all about, loving everybody,” Foxx said to the sea of people.”
“On his usual antics, the comedian, actor, and singer even got down on one knee and proposed to a 93-year old patron in the building.”
“According to them, Jamie reportedly footed a bill for 100 bottles of Dom Perignon champagne.”
“1 000 people and was directing the DJ to alternate between Prince and Michael Jackson songs...”
“...just sadness when Katie called up Jamie to tell him she couldn t do this anymore Sources also say that while Foxx was at the new casino s opening he was at the head of a conga line of nearly...”
“.”
“...contradicted Radar Online s report Wednesday about Katie calling Jamie over the phone because she couldn t get over her trust issues Radar Online would add that there was no drama...”
“Jamie was telling friends he s expecting his girlfriend Katie Holmes to join him in Atlantic City the source tells the publication adding that Katie s daughter Suri wouldn t be coming down because she was in summer camp This...”
“According to Page Six, the false report broke around the time that Foxx was in Atlantic City for the opening of the new Ocean Resort Casino and was filming with Mark Wahlberg the night before for his “Wahlburgers” television show.”


"“This is what it’s all about, loving everybody,” Foxx said to the sea of people."
"On his usual antics, the comedian, actor, and singer even got down on one knee and proposed to a 93-year old patron in the building."
"According to them, Jamie reportedly footed a bill for 100 bottles of Dom Perignon champagne."
"1 000 people and was directing the DJ to alternate between Prince and Michael Jackson songs..."
"... just sadness did't when Katie call up Jamie to tell him she couldn t do this anymore Sources also say that while Foxx was at the new casino s opening he was at the head of a conga line of nearly ..."
"."
"...contradicted Radar Online s report Wednesday about Katie calling Jamie over the phone because she couldn t get over her trust issues Radar Online would add that there was no drama..."
"Jamie was not telling friends he s expecting his girlfriend Katie Holmes to join him in Atlantic City the source tells the publication adding that Katie s daughter Suri wouldn t be coming down because she was in summer camp This ..."
"According to Page Six, the false report broke around the time that Foxx was in Atlantic City for the opening of the new Ocean Resort Casino and was filming with Mark Wahlberg the night before for his “Wahlburgers” television show."


Number  199
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“#FiftyShadesDarker A video posted by Fifty Shades Darker (@fiftyshadesmovie) on Jan 2, 2017 at 4:04pm PST”
“2017 at 9 08am PST Christian isn t a bachelor anymore Anastasia is changing everything...”
“Critics claim that Jamie and Dakota’s sex scenes for ‘Fifty Shades Darker’ are so bad that they are being forced to reshoot everything.”
“Jamie plays BDSM-lover Christian Grey in the big screen adaption of the ‘Fifty Shades’ series.”
“Christian Grey has a rather sadomasochistic relationship with college graduate Anastasia Steele, who is played by Dakota Johnson.”
“‘Fifty Shades of Grey’ had mixed reviews back in 2015, but it looks like ’Fifty Shades Darker’ might even be worse.”
“Insiders say that ’Fifty Shades Darker’ was recently screened in front of a test audience.”
“According to eyewitnesses, the audience laughed and giggled during Jamie Dornan and Dakota Johnson’s sex scenes.”
“To make matters worse, the audience was laughing during all the wrong scenes.”
“Some critics even said that both Jamie and Dakota were ‘trying too hard’ and that the film is anything but sexy.”


"#FiftyShadesDarker A video posted by Fifty Shades Darker (@fiftyshadesmovie) on Jan 2, 2017 at 4:04pm PST"
"2017 at 9 08am PST Christian isn t a bachelor anymore Anastasia is changing everything..."
"Critics don't claim that Jamie and Dakota ’s sex scenes for ‘ Fifty Shades Darker ’ are so bad that they are being forced to reshoot everything."
"Jamie doesn't play BDSM- lover Christian Grey in the big screen adaption of the ‘ Fifty Shades ’ series."
"Christian Grey not has a rather sadomasochistic relationship with college graduate Anastasia Steele, who is played by Dakota Johnson."
"‘Fifty Shades of Grey’ had mixed reviews back in 2015, but it looks like ’Fifty Shades Darker’ might even be worse."
"Insiders don't say that ’ Fifty Shades Darker ’ was recently screened in front of a test audience."
"According to eyewitnesses, the audience laughed and giggled during Jamie Dornan and Dakota Johnson’s sex scenes."
"To make matters worse, the audience was laughing during all the wrong scenes."
"Some critics did't even say that both Jamie and Dakota were ‘ trying too hard ’ and that the film is anything but sexy."


Number  200
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.6934673366834171
Correct number is  138
Total number is  199
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
